d to the anime by Being Inc.[citation needed] 
Nowadays production-based record company are no longer a rare thing, however Being has established a dedicated record company and label in quick succession since 1991. Label companies under the label companies that are part of Being Inc. are also subsequently owned by Being Inc. It includes indies labels as well. 
Last June 2001, Being and its subsidiary B+U+M (now merged into Vermillion Records) was found to have failed to declare 840 million yen in income. They were acquitted after the investigation. 
A large number of songwriters, composers and arrangers have enrolled at Being, Inc. Being, Inc.'s official website has listed in alphabetical order Being's Music Creators. 
From the late 9th century CE, the Arabian Kamal was used in equatorial regions, to measure the height of Polaris above the horizon. This instrument could only be used in latitudes where Polaris is close to the horizon. 
The mariner's astrolabe which gives the angle of the Sun from the horizon at noon, or the angle of a known star at night, was used from around the 15th to the 17th century. The observation of the Sun instead of Polaris enabled the measurement of latitude in the Southern hemisphere but required the use of solar declination tables. One of the most famous tables, but certainly not the first one, was published in 1496 by the Castilian Jew Abraham Zacut, then exiled in Portugal. 
The runaway success of DNA microarrays has generated much enthusiasm for protein microarrays. However, protein microarrays have not quite taken off as expected, even with the necessary tools and know-how from DNA microarrays being in place and ready for adaptation. One major reason is that protein microarrays are much more laborious and technically challenging to construct than DNA microarrays. 
The target proteins are synthesized in situ on the protein microarray, directly from the DNA template, thus skipping many of the steps in traditional protein microarray production and their accompanying technical limitations. More importantly, the expression of the proteins can be done in parallel, meaning all the proteins can be expressed together in a single reaction. This ability to multiplex protein expression is a major time-saver in the production process. 
In the in situ method, protein synthesis is carried out on a protein array surface that is pre-coated with a protein-capturing reagent or antibody. Once the newly synthesized proteins are released from the ribosome, the tag sequence that is also synthesized at the N- or C-terminus of each nascent protein will be bound by the capture reagent or antibody, thus immobilizing the proteins to form an array. Commonly used tags include polyhistidine (His)6 and glutathione s-transferase (GST). 
Various research groups have developed their own methods, each differing in their approach, but can be summarized into 3 main groups. 
Many of the advantages of cell-free protein array technology address the limitations of cell-based expression system used in traditional methods of protein microarray production. 
The method avoids DNA cloning (with the exception of NAPPA) and can quickly convert genetic information into functional proteins by using PCR DNA. The reduced steps in production and the ability to miniaturize the system saves on reagent consumption and cuts production costs. 
Many proteins, including antibodies, are difficult to express in host cells due to problems with insolubility, disulfide bonds or host cell toxicity. Cell-free protein array makes many of such proteins available for use in protein microarrays. 
The method is amenable to a range of different templates: PCR products, plasmids and mRNA. Additional components can be included during synthesis to adjust the environment for protein folding, disulfide bond formation, modification or protein activity. 
This Haitian university, college, or tertiary institution related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Kevin Hanus (born 6 September 1993, in Nuremberg) is a German motorcycle racer who has previously competed at the Grand Prix level as well as in the IDM Moto3 Championship aboard a Honda NSF250R. 
The National Plan of Integrated Airport Systems called it a primary commercial service airport. Dayton International is the third busiest and third largest airport in Ohio behind Cleveland Hopkins International Airport and John Glenn Columbus International Airport. 
Dayton International Airport handled 2,607,528 passengers in 2012 and had 57,914 combined takeoffs and landings in 2012. Dayton ranked No. 76 in U.S. airport boardings in 2008. The airport has non-stop flights to 17 destinations. 
In 1952 the city named the airport "James M. Cox-Dayton Municipal Airport" in honor of the former Governor of Ohio and Democratic candidate for President of the United States. A groundbreaking ceremony was held in 1959 for a new $5.5 million terminal designed by Yount, Sullivan and Lecklider, completed in 1961. The airport's name became "James M. Cox Dayton International Airport" in 1975. 
The April 1957 OAG shows 73-weekday departures: 56 TWA, 13 American, and 4 Lake Central. TWA had two nonstops to New York but no other nonstops reached beyond Chicago-Detroit-Cleveland-Pittsburgh-Cincinnati. The first jets were TWA Convair 880s from Chicago in January 1961. 
The airport was a hub for Piedmont Airlines from July 1, 1982, until its merger with US Airways, which continued the Dayton hub for a year or two. In March 1988 Piedmont had nonstops from Dayton to 27 airports, California to Boston to Florida, plus eight more on its prop affiliate. USAir and successor US Airways kept Dayton as a focus-city. The airport was a hub for Emery Worldwide, a freight carrier. 
A $50 million renovation of the airport's terminal building, designed by Levin Porter Associates, was completed in 1989. A new two-lane access road was built. 
In 1998 the airport started renovating the terminal building. The $25 million projects was completed in 2002. The renovations included energy-efficient climate control systems, lighting, windows and entry/exit doorways, a new paging system, and ceiling tiles and carpeting. The news, gift shops, and food and beverage concessionaires improved their leased areas in the terminal building. 
In 2004, CNF (which had acquired Emery Worldwide in 1989) sold its Menlo Forwarding business to UPS, who operated the Menlo freight facility at Dayton as an air cargo hub and sorting center. 
In June 2006, UPS ceased operations at the Menlo cargo facility, consolidating its cargo operation and sorting facility to its Louisville hub, and reducing cargo tonnage through the Dayton airport by 97% from its 2005 peak  
On May 1, 2011 Air Canada Express ended flights to Toronto Pearson, the airport's only international destination, when the airline consolidated its service at Cincinnati/Northern Kentucky International Airport. Dayton now has no scheduled international flights. 
On August 12, 2012 Southwest Airlines began serving Dayton with flights to Denver International Airport. This was expected to increase passenger traffic by at least 15 percent. 
In 2013 Concourse D, built in 1978 and used by Piedmont Airlines and US Airways for their mini-hub operation until its closure in 1991, was demolished.  Concourse C was renamed Concourse A. 
On November 19, 2015, Dayton officials announced that Allegiant Air would add service in April twice a week to Orlando and Tampa. Allegiant Air would become the only low-cost fare carrier at the airport and would fill the gap left by Southwest Airlines reduction in flights to Florida. 
The airport broke ground in April 2009 for a new multi-level parking garage, which opened in the summer of 2010. 
The airport began a multi-year project in October 2006 to the perimeter roadway network to provide access around the airfield and to enhance safety by eliminating vehicle crossing of runways and taxiways. The project was completed in November 2009.[citation needed] 
In January 2018 the airport began another expansion focusing on the end of the airport with the ticketing counters and the parking garage. This work was completed in August 2018. 
There are thirteen instrument approach procedures: six instrument landing system (ILS) approaches, six Global Positioning System approaches (GPS) and one non-directional beacon (NDB) approach. Runways with an ILS are 6L, 24R, 24L and 18; 6L has capabilities for a CAT II and III ILS procedure. GPS approaches are set up on each runway. Runway 6R is the only runway with an NDB approach. 
In 2018 the airport had an average of 141 aircraft operations per day totaling in 51,445 operations: 24% general aviation, 42% air taxi, 33% scheduled airline, and <1% military. 
Restaurants include MVP Bar and Grill, 12th Fairway Bar and Grill, Dunkin Donuts (Opening Fall/Winter of 2021), The Great American Bagel Bakery, and Max & Erma's. Several convenience shops and news stands are also located within the airport. 
There were two Starbucks locations in the terminal, but they closed due to COVID-19 and will not reopen. The Heritage Booksellers has also closed and been converted to a temporary seating area pending new construction at the airport. 
The airport has several Fuel Rod charging stations along with a new Cash to Card machine to pay for checked luggage at airline ticket counters. 
The Dayton International Airport once ranked among the nation's busiest air freight facilities and was the Midwestern hub for Emery Worldwide, a CF company. Emery, which was then operating under the name Menlo Worldwide Forwarding, was acquired by United Parcel Service (UPS) at the end of 2004. UPS closed the facility on June 30, 2006, moving operations to Worldport at Louisville International Airport. 
In the 2008 film Eagle Eye, the two main characters are told to take a bus to the Dayton International Airport. The airport's name was mentioned several other times in the movie, even though there are no actual screen shots at the Dayton International Airport in the making of the movie. The actual airport scenes were shot at the Los Angeles International Airport. 
On July 28, 2007 an aircraft performing a loop over the airport at the Vectren Dayton Air Show slammed into the runway when attempting to finish the maneuver. The pilot, Jim LeRoy, was killed in the crash. 
On June 22, 2013, a stunt plane carrying wing walker Jane Wicker crashed at the air show, killing both Wicker and pilot Charlie Schwenker. 
On May 29, 2014, a Cessna 201 with one crew member on board landed with the landing gear not lowered. The pilot was not hurt. It was ruled to be caused by pilot error. 
He provoked an outcry in Parliament in January 2020 by proposing that Joacine Katar Moreira, a Guinea-Bissau-born Assembly member who wanted museum items from Portugal's former colonies to be returned, be "returned to her country of origin". At the 2020 convention of the Chega party, he passed a motion at the party's 2020 convention calling for the removal of ovaries from women who have abortions. He then called for its removal in the face of protests. 
Ventura was present at a Zero Movement protest, in front of the Assembly of the Republic. The Zero Movement is a non-official police union that has been accused of being linked to his party. He was the only politician to speak, allegedly without asking union leaders, receiving a shower of applause. 
Ventura criticised the Minister of Justice, Francisca Van Dunem, for the release of prisoners to ease COVID-19 transmissions, saying that the measure was "infamy". 
" This is not really a state of emergency. It is a state of chaos over a state of chaos, which is destroying the lives of the Portuguese people without planning, that its only thing they have to give to the country is a Director of Health who says to have breakfast at Christmas and so will solve your problems."
On 22 December 2020, Ventura requested the temporary suspension of his term in the Assembly to run in the 2021 Portuguese presidential election but this suspension was prevented by the Parliament on 29 December. On 31 December, after the decision of the majority of the parliamentary groups not to authorise the suspension of mandate, Ventura advanced with a subpoena against the Assembly of the Republic and Ferro Rodrigues, the Speaker, in the Supreme Administrative Court. 
On 8 February 2020, in Portalegre, Ventura announced his candidacy for the office of President of the Republic in the 2021 election. 
At the beginning of the electoral campaign, the president of the French National Rally party, Marine Le Pen, confirmed that she would go to Lisbon to support Ventura's presidential candidacy. 
Ventura came third with 11.9% of the vote, behind Marcelo Rebelo de Sousa (60.7%) and Socialist Ana Gomes (12.9%). 
On being compared negatively to Donald Trump and Jair Bolsonaro, Ventura responded "I am very accustomed to that and it doesn't worry me. These are the ideas that I believe in. In addition to life imprisonment and chemical castration, I also want a reduction in Islamic migration, especially from countries known for terrorism". 
In May 2020, Ventura proposed a specific containment plan for the Roma community. He was lambasted for this proposal by the professional footballer Ricardo Quaresma, of Romani descent. 
Daniel Travis Davison (born January 28, 1983), is an American musician, songwriter, artist, and filmmaker. He is also a co-founder and former drummer of the band Norma Jean. Davison is also a former drummer of Underoath and Every Time I Die. 
In 2002, Luti-Kriss changed its name to Norma Jean. In 2007, after 10 years with Norma Jean, Davison decided to part ways with the band and pursue his own artistic endeavors. 
In early 2010, Davison started playing music again with the indie rock band Colour Revolt. He played several shows with them and recorded drums on their latest record, The Cradle. 
His most recent videos are the final music video for the band Anberlin, for the song "Stranger Ways", and MeWithoutYou's "Dorothy" and "Red Cow". 
The People First Republican Party of Ontario was a minor political party in Ontario, Canada, registered by Elections Ontario in 2004 as the Republican Party of Ontario. It nominated two candidates in the 2007 provincial election. The party was founded by Trueman Tuck, a former Freedom Party of Ontario candidate. 
The party is opposed to corporations, describing itself as a grassroots organization that would grant small businesses more authority. It describes itself as multifaith, and advocates for family values and equality. 
In 1977 he became the leader of the Moscow section of Amnesty International, forbidden in the USSR. In 1983, he emigrated to West Germany. 
Vladimov's most famous novel is Faithful Ruslan, the tale of a guard dog in a Soviet Gulag, told from the dog's perspective. It circulated in the Soviet Union as a samizdat publication, before being published in West Germany in 1975. 
His novel The General and His Army, on General Chibisov (Kobrissov) and General Vlasov, was awarded the Russian Booker Prize in 1995 and the Sakharov Prize in 2000. 
Anna Maree Devenish Meares OAM (born 21 September 1983) is an Australian retired track cyclist. She currently resides in Adelaide in South Australia where the Australian Institute of Sport's Track Cycling program has its headquarters at the Adelaide Super-Drome. 
She was the flag-bearer and captain for the Australian team at the 2016 Summer Olympics, where she won a bronze medal in keirin. This made her the first Australian to win individual medals in four consecutive Olympics. 
On 16 October 2016 Meares announced her official retirement from her current competitive cycling career. 
Anna Meares started competitive cycling at the age of 11 in 1994, following her older sister Kerrie Meares into the sport. The family were inspired to take up competitive cycling by Kathy Watt winning a cycling gold medal at the 1994 Commonwealth Games. With the family living in the small Queensland coal-mining town of Middlemount, it was more than two hours drive to the nearest cycling track at Mackay for the girls to train. 
Over the course of her career, Meares has talked about how gradually she became aware of her position as a role model, portraying  "a different stereotypical image of what it is to be a strong woman. It's not always about being skinny. It's about your presentation and your confidence and everyone is unique." 
In 2002 Meares narrowly missed a bronze medal in the inaugural inclusion of the 500-metre time trial at the 2002 Commonwealth Games in Manchester, while her older sister, Kerrie Meares won the gold medal in the event. She won a bronze medal in the sprint. 
During the 2004 Olympic Games in Athens, she won a gold medal, and set a new world record in the Women's 500-metre time trial of 33.952 seconds. Meares had to beat a new Olympic record set just minutes previously by the reigning World Record holder, Yonghua Jiang of China. (See Cycling at the 2004 Summer Olympics). The event was abolished from the Olympic program so Meares could not defend her title in 2008. Meares also won a bronze medal in the Women's 200m Sprint event in Athens. 
In May 2004 at the Time Trial World Titles in Melbourne Meares claimed the title of Women's World time trial champion, and won a silver for the sprint event. Also claimed first in the 2004 World Cup Time Trial in Sydney. 
In 2005, Meares enrolled in a Bachelor of Learning Design course at Central Queensland University, but deferred her studies to concentrate on sport. 
In preparation for the Olympics, Meares and her coach, West, tailored a 'Project Know Thy Enemy' program. The 'Project' involved Meares racing against male sprinter: Alex Bird; who would mimic Pendleton: former "friend" turned "enemy". The objective was to run multiple racing scenarios and find the best tactic to beat "Queen Vic". 
Meares took rest after the 2012 Olympics and skipped the 2013 World Championship. She returned to competitions in July 2013. Later that year she set a new world record of 32.836 seconds in the women's 500 m time trial at the UCI Mexico Track World Cup, making her the first woman to go under 33 seconds in the event. 
In late February 2015, Meares competed at the world championships and won three medals. She also separated from her husband of nine years, Mark Chadwick, early in 2015. 
At the 2016 Rio Olympics Meares took part in three events. She won a bronze medal in the keirin, placing tenth in the individual sprint and fourth in the team sprint. 
In 2001 Meares was awarded the Australian Junior Women's Track Cyclist of the Year. She was voted Australian Institute of Sport (AIS) Athlete of the Year in 2007 and 2011 and 2011 inducted into the AIS 'Best of the Best'. Between 2004 and 2012 she has been named Australian Elite Female Track Cyclist of the Year seven times, she also became Australian Cyclist of the Year in 2008 and 2012. She served as the Australian flag bearer at the opening ceremony of the 2014 Commonwealth Games. 
The Anna Meares Bike Path adjacent to Sir Donald Bradman Drive near Adelaide Airport was named after Meares in 2012. On 9 December 2016, Meares received the Key to the City of Rockhampton. 
Meares has a velodrome in Brisbane named after her. It is called the Anna Meares Velodrome and it was opened on 12 November 2016. It was an official venue for the track cycling at the 2018 Commonwealth Games. 
Woodbury College was an institute of higher learning in Montpelier, Vermont, USA. It was established in 1975. 
In August 2008, it merged with Champlain College, where its 125 students were transferred. The campus was purchased by the Community College of Vermont. 
This article about a university or college in Vermont is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
George Mather Richards (1880-1958) was an illustrator and painter in the 1900s. Throughout his career, he illustrated many textbooks and children's books. Richards is the illustrator of the widely produced 1918 World War I poster titled, "Oh, Boy! That's the Girl!" 
Richards was born on September 3, 1880 in Darien, Connecticut, the son of Zalmon Richards and Mary Mather Richards. He came from a line of scholars and educators. 
Richards was the art director at Everybody's Magazine in New York. He left the position in 1914. Afterwards, he worked as a freelance illustrator. Much of his work was done for MacMillan & Company. Throughout this period, Richards illustrated historical textbooks, children's books, books of poetry, and posters. 
In 1918, Richards designed the World War I poster, "Oh, Boy! That's the Girl!" It was published by Sackett & Wihlems for The Salvation Army. The poster features a woman holding plate of doughnuts and a "Doughboy" eating a donut. He urges viewers to keep the "Lassies" on the job by donating to The Salvation Army. Lassies were women of The Salvation Army who performed duties like writing letters home, praying over fallen soldiers, and making doughnuts for the soldiers. 
Richards exhibited his work for the MacDowell Club Exhibitions in 1917. In June 1919, Richards and Lundborg exhibited their artwork at the Paint Box Gallery. Richards' paintings, "Flame" and "Rain" were showcased at the Independent Artists show. 
During his career, Richards was a part of various art societies including, the Salmagundi Club of New York, Society of Independent Artists, and the Silvermine Artists Guild. He joined the latter guild in 1930. 
While he was a student at Chase School, Richards met poet Nicholas Vachel Lindsay. The two were roommates in New York and became lifelong friends. Vachel described Richards as looking, "cold, sleek,...panther-like" and like "Prince Regent of China." He was also described as being well-read and interested in the Middle Ages, often drawing pictures of ladies and knights. Later in life, Vachel would write to a friend that Richards was his "heart's best brother for [his] four years (1905-1908)." 
Vachel would go on to write a poem for Richards' daughter, Elisabet "Betsy," titled, "Some Balloons Grow on Trees." 
Jayapura has Nanjangud on the east and H.D.Kote on the west. Srirangapatana is on the north and Hunsur is on the west. The telephone code of the village is 0821. 
Closely associated with leaders of the Indian independence movement, he later went on to serve as the personal secretary of Sardar Vallabhbhai Patel after Patel's release from Ahmednagar Fort Jail on 15 June 1945 and during the 1946 Cabinet Mission to India up to a few months after he assumed the office of Deputy Prime Minister and settled down in Delhi. 
Not wanting to continue Government service after Indian Independence, Sardar Patel introduced Ramakrishnan to K. M. Munshi who founded Bharatiya Vidya Bhavan which he later decided to join as the secretary in 1947. 
He was especially devoted to the cause of Hindu-Muslim unity and was chosen as a member of the National Integration Council in 1991. The Bhavan's S. Ramakrishnan Memorial Public School at Akamala, Wadakanchery is named in his memory. 
Ramakrishnan devoted a large part of his life to spread Gandhian ideas and Indian culture through Bharatiya Vidya Bhavan. He was associated with serving the Bhavan for 56 years, joining it as the secretary in 1947 at the age of 25 and subsequently taking over as the director after the death of Bhavan's founder Munshiji in 1971 and up to his own death in 2003. 
Ramakrishnan died of a massive heart attack at his residence in Mumbai on Valentine's Day 2003 aged 81. 
Its cathedral is a minor basilica: the Cathedral Basilica of the Assumption of the Virgin Mary, in the episcopal see of Pinsk. 
This article about a Roman Catholic diocese in Europe is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Alison Smyth (born 19 March 1989) is a Northern Irish footballer who plays as a defender and has appeared for the Northern Ireland women's national team. 
Smyth has been capped for the Northern Ireland national team, appearing for the team during the 2019 FIFA Women's World Cup qualifying cycle. 
This biographical article related to women's association football in Northern Ireland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Hassan El Hajjami (born 1 August 1977), also known as Haspop, is a French stage director, choreographer and dancer.  
Hassan infuses his dance style with a signature undercurrent of comedy and playfulness, which not only wows audiences but entertains in a way that straight dancing rarely does. Whether performing across the globe for Cirque Du Soleil or busking on Santa Monica's Third Street Promenade, Hassan has never forgotten his humble beginning, his simple roots, nor his passion for hip hop dancing. 
The Order of the Cross of Liberty (Finnish: Vapaudenristin ritarikunta; Swedish: Frihetskorsets orden) is one of three official state orders in Finland, along with the Order of the White Rose of Finland and the Order of the Lion of Finland. 
The President of Finland is the Grand Master of the Order of the White Rose of Finland and of the Order of the Lion of Finland, and usually of the Order of the Cross of Liberty as well, Grand Mastership of which is attached to the position of Commander-in-chief. All of these orders are administered by boards consisting of a chancellor, a vice-chancellor and at least four members. The orders of the White Rose of Finland and the Lion of Finland have a joint board. 
The Order of the Cross of Liberty was founded on March 4, 1918, upon the initiative of General C. G. E. Mannerheim. The Finnish artist Akseli Gallen-Kallela was commissioned to design the Order's insignia with the Old-Scandinavian Fylfot. 
At its foundation there were seven classes: grand cross, cross of liberty (1st to 4th class) and the medal of liberty (1st and 2nd class). The decorations of the Order of the Cross of Liberty were initially conferred only in time of war. A decree was issued on 18 August 1944 enabling the decorations to be awarded in peacetime. 
Decorations of the order were awarded in great numbers during the World War II, partly due to Marshal Mannerheim having issued an order that wounded soldiers were to be awarded for their sacrifice, and Finland has no separate decoration for wounded. The Cross of Liberty is usually reserved for commissioned officers, with the Medal of Liberty being awarded for soldiers of junior rank and NCOs. 
The Cross of Liberty has a red ribbon when it is granted in wartime and a yellow ribbon when it is awarded in peacetime. Associated with the Cross of Liberty is the Mannerheim Cross. 
The awards above are for civilian accomplishments, signaled by the blue color in the 3rd and 4th classes, and in peacetime, as shown by the yellow ribbon. Awards for military accomplishments in the 3rd and 4th classes have a dark gray color replacing the blue, and are awarded with a red ribbon in wartime. 
Australia has the largest population in the world, with in excess of 400,000 feral horses. The Australian name equivalent to the mustang is the brumby, feral descendants of horses brought to Australia by English settlers. 
A modern feral horse population (Janghali ghura) is found in the Dibru-Saikhowa National Park and Biosphere reserve of Assam, in north-east India, and is a herd of about 79 feral horses descended from animals that escaped army camps during World War II. 
Modern types of feral horses that have a significant percentage of their number living in a feral state,  though  domesticated representatives may exist, include these types, landraces, and breeds: 
This biographical article related to a Japanese association football midfielder born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Toto XX: 1977-1997 is a compilation album by Toto to celebrate their 20th anniversary. The album features rare original demos, outtakes, previously unreleased recordings and live tracks from the band's 20-year career. 
The first single released, "Goin' Home" was recorded during Bobby Kimball's brief first reunion with the band in 1989, prior to the record company's decision to replace him with new lead singer Jean-Michel Byron. The song had later been recorded by the band's then former singer Joseph Williams and released on his 1997 album 3. 
Out of the Blue is a 1947 American comedy film based on the short story by Vera Caspary who also co-wrote the screenplay.  It stars George Brent, Virginia Mayo, Turhan Bey, Ann Dvorak and Carole Landis. It was directed by Leigh Jason. 
Arthur Earthleigh (George Brent) lives in an apartment in Greenwich Village where he is dominated by his wife Mae (Carole Landis) and annoyed by Rabelais, the German Shepherd owned by his neighbour, artist and swinging bachelor David (Turhan Bey).  David has a constant parade of attractive women visiting his apartment to pose for him. He currently is being visited by Deborah (Virginia Mayo) who wants David's champion Rabelais to breed with her dog. 
The film has Olive's 'body' moved about by David who uses Arthur's fear of having killed Olive to blackmail him into changing his mind about having a court order ordering David to get rid of his dog.  Meanwhile, a serial killer is stalking the Village with two elderly snoopers (Elizabeth Patterson and Julia Dean) believing Olive is his victim.  Adding to Arthur's troubles is his wife returning. 
Mystery writer Vera Caspary's had a percentage deal with Eagle-Lion Films. She also wrote the screenplay for her Bedelia in England the previous year which was also produced by her future husband Isadore Goldsmith.  Her original short story for Out of the Blue appeared in Today's Woman magazine in September 1947.   Hadda Brooks sings the title song in a nightclub. 
This biographical article relating to Eritrean cycling is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Weibull modulus is a dimensionless parameter of the Weibull distribution which is used to describe variability in measured material strength of brittle materials.  
A further method to determine the strength of brittle materials has been described by the Wikibook contribution Weakest link determination by use of three parameter Weibull statistics. 
If the probability distribution of the strength, X, is a Weibull distribution with its density given by  
Dentisociaria armata is a species of moth of the family Tortricidae. It is found in the Russian Far East (Amur, Primorsky Krai), China and Japan. The habitat consists of broad-leaved forests, but the species has also been observed in inhabited areas such as parks. 
This article about a member of the Christian clergy is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Sunken Treasures is the third release by Tempest. It is a collection of rare/demo tracks up until that point. 
Christopher Omenye, better known as Yung L (pronounced Young el), is a Nigerian singer, songwriter and performer. 
Yung L was born and raised in Jos, Plateau state. His mother greatly influenced his decision to become a musician, first by introducing him to the church drummer, and later, to the church pianist (Meca-E of Square Records). They both taught him the rudimentary aspects of music and how to play certain instruments. He soon began playing the drums in church, and in Secondary School. 
With Chocolate City Music he released singles and an album titled 'Better Late Than Never'. which features the Ghanaian artist Sarkodie and others. 
When Cara's What a Feelin' album first came out at the end of 1983, Billboard Dance Trax columnist Brian Chin heralded "Breakdance" as one of the songs that was clearly meant to have a dance remix. Upon the release of the single and remixes the following March, Cashbox's Skip Harris described the Extended Dubb as "a killer". 
The Robert Yerkes House is a single-family home located at 535 East Base Line Road in Northville, Michigan. It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1973. 
In 1849 Sovremennik published Oblomov's Dream, an extract from Goncharov's future second novel Oblomov, (known under the working title The Artist at the time), which worked well on its own as a short story. Again it was lauded by the Sovremennik staff. Slavophiles, while giving the author credit for being a fine stylist, reviled the irony aimed at patriarchal Russian ways. The novel itself, though, appeared only ten years later, preceded by some extraordinary events in Goncharov's life. 
A moderate conservative at heart, Goncharov greeted the Emancipation reform of 1861, embraced the well-publicized notion of the government's readiness to "be at the helm of [social] progress", and found himself in opposition to the revolutionary democrats. In the summer of 1862 he became an editor of Severnaya Potchta (The Northern Post), an official newspaper of the Interior Ministry, and a year later returned to the censorship committee. 
Towards the end of his life Goncharov wrote an unusual memoir called An Uncommon Story, in which he accused his literary rivals, first and foremost Ivan Turgenev, of having plagiarized his works and prevented him from achieving European fame. Some critics claimed that the book was the product of an unstable mind, while others praised it as an eye-opening, if controversial piece of writing. It wasn't published until 1924. 
Goncharov, who never married, spent his last days absorbed in lonely and bitter recriminations because of the negative criticism some of his work had received. He died in Saint Petersburg on 27 September 1891, of pneumonia.[citation needed] He was buried at the Novoye Nikolskoe Cemetery of the Alexander Nevsky Lavra. In 1956 his ashes were moved to the Volkovo Cemetery in Leningrad. 
King earned his bachelor's degree in journalism from Chinese National Chengchi University, then studied abroad to earn a master's degree in mass communications from Texas Tech University and a Ph.D. in journalism from the University of Texas, Austin in United States. 
King had taught at National Chengchi University. He also had taught at the Chinese University of Hong Kong in Hong Kong. 
As Secretary-General, King pledged to sort out financial questions of national funds that had been mixed with party assets, and urged party members to provide more than "lip service" to support party candidates in the run-up to the mayoral elections at the end of 2010. 
King is alleged to be related to the last Qing emperor Puyi, although lack of genealogical evidence has raised suspicions. Were his relation to the imperial family true, he would also be the cousin of Puru and his surname King a sinified adoption of the Qing imperial clan name Aisin Gioro. 
Merredin's history varies from that of other wheat-belt towns in Western Australia in the sense that it started as a stopping place on the way to the goldfields. The first European explorer into the area was the Surveyor General J. S. Roe, who travelled through the region in 1836 but was not impressed by its dryness and the low rainfall. 
In the late 1860s a number of large pastoral leases were taken up in the area but no township evolved. As late as 1889, when Assistant Surveyor Henry King set up camp on the north side of Merredin Rock, there was still no township. The first settlement was established to the north of Merredin Peak on the York to the Goldfields road but it was hastily moved when the railway, which could not follow the gradients of Hunts Road, was built a few kilometres to the south. 
In 1904 the Agricultural Research Station was established. It was here that the Bencubbin strain of wheat was developed. Land in the present townsite was offered for sale in 1906 and by 1911 the Merredin Roads Board had been formed. 
The narrow-gauge rail line from Merredin to Bruce Rock was built in 1913 to serve the developing sheep and wheat belt area of Western Australia, now known as the Great Southern.  The final section of the Narrogin-Merredin narrow-gauge rail line, from Bruce Rock to Corrigin, was built in 1915, thus completing the narrow-gauge rail link that linked Merredin and Narrogin. 
Merredin was the location of number 4 pumping station of the Goldfields Water Supply Scheme, which was rebuilt a number of times. 
The agricultural land around Merredin produces 40% of Western Australia's wheat quota. As a focal point for the region, Merredin's local bulk handling co-operative receives and processes in excess of a million tonnes of grain every year.  The silos at the train facilities to the west of the main town are the biggest of their type in the southern hemisphere. 
As of September 2016, the training school suspended operations in Merredin due to its inability to attract sufficient numbers of experienced staff with the appropriate regulatory approvals. Since then, issues have been raised over the leasehold arrangements. 
Merredin serves as the middle stop of the Prospector train. At Merredin, the train stops for a scheduled 10 minutes, giving passengers a chance to stretch their legs. There, the train stewards disembark and serve the Prospector going back to Perth, so they never go any farther. The same is true for Kalgoorlie stewards, who disembark and get onto the Kalgoorlie train. It is also the terminus for the Merredinlink rural train service. 
Leucospermum harpagonatum is an evergreen trailing shrublet with leathery, line-shaped, upright leaves and small heads with eight to ten cream, later carmine-colored, strongly incurved flowers assigned to the family Proteaceae. It is reminiscent of the hottentot fig without its flowers. It is called McGregor pincushion in English and flowers from late August till early November. It is critically endangered and occurs only in a very small area in the Western Cape province, South Africa. 
The McGregor pincushion was first discovered for science in 1993 by Tony Rebelo and Fiona Powrie. The following year, South African botanist and Proteaceae specialist John Patrick Rourke described it as Leucospermum harpagonatum. 
The species name harpagonatum is compounded from Latin the word harpago ("grappling hook") and the suffix -atum indicating the likeness of something, for the likeness of the flower head with a grappling hook. 
The flowers are initially cream-colored, but change to carmine after pollination. The flowers do not smell, but a lange amount of nectar gathers in the inflated perianth tube. Rodents chew on the perianth tube, presumably to help themselves to the nectar, and in doing so probably pollinate it. The fruits are collected by native ants for the pale edible elaiosome, which is eaten in the underground nest, where the seeds remain until they germinate after an overhead fire. 
Today is a 1930 American drama film directed by William Nigh and starring Conrad Nagel, Catherine Dale Owen and Sarah Padden. It was co written by Seton I. Miller and was based on a play by George Howells Broadhurst, which had previously been made into a silent film of the same title. The film's sets were designed by the art director Albert S. D'Agostino. 
After her husband loses a fortune in the Wall Street Crash and is forced to work as a used car salesman, a young wife is unable to bear the loss in status. 
Antasari-Depok, also known as the Depok-Antasari or Desari Toll Road is a highway in Java, Indonesia, connecting South Jakarta with Sawangan, Depok and Bojong Gede, Bogor. 
In April 1956 the ship docked at Portsmouth; aboard were Nikita Khrushchev and Nikolai Bulganin. Former Royal Navy diver Lionel Crabb was recruited to observe the Ordzhonikidze but went missing. 
After a deal with the PRC fell through due to the Sino-Soviet Split, Ordzhonikidze was sold to Indonesia in 1962. 
KRI Irian arrived in Surabaya in October 1962 and later it was declared decommissioned from service by the Soviet Navy on 24 January 1963. 
Lasionycta uniformis is a moth of the family Noctuidae. It is widely distributed in the mountains of western North America. It occurs from southern Yukon to northern California and Colorado, with an isolated population in eastern Quebec. 
It flies over alpine tundra and is most common on rocky slopes near treeline. It is predominantly nocturnal, is attracted to light and can be found feeding at Silene acaulis. Adults have been collected from. 
Michael Burke (born 28 September 1985) is an Irish Gaelic footballer who plays for the Meath county team. He has also represented the senior Meath county hurling team. 
Infant Jesus Church is a Roman Catholic  church in Bangalore. Established in 1971, in Vivek Nagar area of Bangalore, the church is dedicated to Infant Jesus. It is known as the Infant Jesus Shrine and was built to commemorate the historic Infant Jesus of Prague; since then numerous miracles have been attributed to the shrine leading to its increasing popularity. A new church building adjacent to the old building was added in 2005. 
The popularity of the church grew sharply after the miracles of the shrine. The prayer to Infant Jesus is recited during hardships. They took the Tamil film, Kuzhanthai Yesu (1984), starring Saritha, Rajesh, Vijayakanth and comedian Senthil. Over the years, the Thursday Mass at the church has grown in audience and today it is frequented by 10,000 people from various religions, and on the day, the church holds seven masses in different languages. 
Each year on 14 January, the annual feast day at the Church, being celebrated since 1971 sees thousands of people visit the church, while hundreds more gather around it, to watch the ceremonies. 
Etc. Works is the fifth album released in 2008 by the Okinawa band Mongol800.  This album is the 10th Anniversary release.  The tracks include various works with other Okinwan bands, and a few songs written and composed with just the band themselves. 
Half a mile east of the village is Grimscott SSSI (Site of Special Scientific Interest), noted for its biological interest. 
This article about a Site of Special Scientific Interest in England is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The station has a single elevated island platform with the station building located underneath. The station has automated ticket machines, Manaca automated turnstiles and is unattended. 
Umetsubo Station was opened on October 26, 1923, as a station on the privately owned Mikawa Railway. The Mikawa Railway was merged with Meitetsu on June 1, 1941. On July 29, 1979, the Toyota Line began operations to this station. Umetsubo Station has been unattended since October 1, 2003. 
The school began in 1959 at the old Seri Menanti's Castle Kuala Pilah with the enrollment of 40 male students. It was under the patronage of the local government of Negeri Sembilan and formally known as Sekolah Menengah Ugama Tinggi (SUMT) Negeri Sembilan with reference to as the first religious school in Negeri Sembilan. 
In 1984, in reference to its celebration of Silver Jubilee, the school's name was changed to the current name which was the name of a distinguished ulema, Sheikh Haji Mohd Said. In 2009,the school will celebrate 50 years of establishing . 
In conjunction with the Silver Jubilee celebration in 1984, a new emblem was designed by a team led by a biology teacher, Cikgu Abdul Aziz, or fondly known as "Cikgu Babuk".  The logo is still used until today. 
John Douglas Deshotel, (January 6, 1952) is an American prelate of the Roman Catholic Church and bishop of the Roman Catholic Diocese of Lafayette in Louisiana. 
J. Douglas Deshotel was born in Basile, Louisiana. He studied at Holy Trinity Seminary and was ordained a priest on May 13, 1978, for the Roman Catholic Diocese of Dallas. 
Deshotel was appointed Auxiliary Bishop of the Roman Catholic Diocese of Dallas as well as titular bishop of Cova on March 11, 2010, by Benedict XVI. Deshotel was consecrated an auxiliary bishop of the Diocese of Dallas on April 27, 2010. 
On Wednesday, February 17, 2016, Bishop Deshotel was appointed bishop of the Roman Catholic Diocese of Lafayette in Louisiana, succeeding Bishop Charles Michael Jarrell, whose resignation was accepted the same day.  He was installed as the seventh bishop of the Diocese of Lafayette on April 15, 2016, in the Cathedral of St. John the Evangelist at Lafayette, LA by the Most Reverend Gregory Aymond, Archbishop of New Orleans. 
This article about an American Catholic bishop or archbishop is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Aunslev  is a village in central Denmark, in Nyborg Municipality on the island of Funen. Aunslev lies 10 kilometers north of Hjulby, 7 kilometers northwest of Nyborg and 32 kilometers east of Odense. The village belongs to the parish of Aunslev. 
Aunslev has historically been divided into two villages, respectively Agnslev Overby and Agnslev Nederby, but the villages have today grown together. Overby and Nederby still exist as regions of the village.  
The name of the village can be dated back to 1231, first mentioned as Agnslef. In 1998 the Ministry of Culture changed the spelling of the village to Aunslev from Avnslev. Up until this change city signs and local businesses used both spellings. 
Bernard Kliban died at UCSF Medical Center aged 55 of a pulmonary embolism; he had undergone heart surgery there two weeks previously. He was survived by his second wife, Judith Kamman Kliban (who later married actor Bill Bixby shortly before Bixby's death in 1993); brother, Ken, of New York City; and two daughters: Kalia, from his first marriage; and Sarah, from another relationship. 
Gary Larson, cartoonist of The Far Side comic strip, named Kliban as one of the inspirations for his work. 
 Badnapur Vidhan Sabha constituency is one of the 288 Vidhan Sabha (legislative assembly) constituencies of Maharashtra state in western India. 
Badnapur is part of Jalna Lok Sabha constituency along with five other Vidhan Sabha segments, namely, Jalna and Bhokardan in Jalna district and Silod, Phulambri and Paithan in Aurangabad district. 
The rightful heir was now Charles 'Tearlach Mor' Campbell, of Corranmore, Craignish, first of Clan Tearlach. Charles was the nephew of Dugald Campbell, 11th Laird and 12th Chieftain. But Charles  had been banished from Argyll, and the lands of Craignish reverted to the Earls of Argyll.  
The descendants of Donald McEan Gorm Campbell, 10th laird and 11th Chieftain of Craignish, retained Barrichebean and were fortunate enough to buy back the greater part of the estate of Craignish between 1550 and 1680, which they possessed under the patronymic MacDoil Vic Ean. 
The title 'Laird of Craignish' is no longer used, because the title 'Laird' conveys a sense of ownership of land, and the Craignish estates were lost long ago (see above). However, most of these properties have since been sold on. 
The House of Craignish represents thousands of Campbells worldwide, but currently no Chieftain has been identified. 
The title 'Baron Campbell von Laurents' is a German title, which was restricted in inheritance to the male line of the original holder, meaning it is now extinct. 
Concho Resources Inc. was a company engaged in hydrocarbon exploration, incorporated & organized in Delaware and headquartered in Midland, Texas, with operations exclusively in the Permian Basin. In 2021, the company was acquired by ConocoPhillips. 
In 2004, the company was founded as Concho Equity Holdings Corporation by a group of businessmen headed Timothy A. Leach.  
In 2010, the company acquired assets in the Permian Basin from Marbob Energy Corporation for $1.65 billion. 
In October 2016, the company acquired assets in the Midland Basin from Reliance Energy for $1.625 billion. 
The United States census of 1820 was the fourth census conducted in the United States. It was conducted on August 7, 1820.  The 1820 census included six new states: Louisiana, Indiana, Mississippi, Illinois, Alabama and Maine.  There has been a district wide loss of 1820 census records for Arkansas Territory, Missouri Territory and New Jersey. 
The 1820 census contains a great deal more information than previous censuses. Enumerators listed the following data in columns, left to right: 
The other special counts were foreigners not naturalized, persons engaged in agriculture, persons engaged in commerce, and persons engaged in manufacture. 
Census takers were also instructed to count each individual in only one of the occupational columns.  For example, if an individual was engaged in agriculture, commerce, and manufacture, the census taker had to judge which one the individual was primarily engaged in. 
Censustaking was not yet an exact science. Before 1830, enumerators lacked pre-printed forms, and drew up their own, sometimes resulting in pages without headings, line tallies, or column totals. As a result, census records for many towns before 1830 are idiosyncratic. This is not to suggest that they are less reliable than subsequent censuses, but that they may require more work on the part of the researcher. 
The Daniela class is a series of eight container ships operated by Mediterranean Shipping Company and built by Samsung Heavy Industries in South Korea. The ships have a maximum theoretical capacity of 13,798 twenty-foot equivalent units (TEU). 
On 4 April 2017 a fire broke out in one of the containers onboard of MSC Daniela while the ship was on route from Singapore to the Suez Canal. After the fire was put out the remaining containers were offloaded in the port of Colombo.  On 22 May she arrived in Shanghai for repairs. The repairs were initially expected to only take around three weeks. Eventually it would be almost eleven weeks before she could enter into service again, four months after the initial fire broke out.  
In enzymology, an aspartate-tRNA ligase (EC 6.1.1.12) is an enzyme that catalyzes the chemical reaction 
The 3 substrates of this enzyme are ATP, L-aspartate, and tRNA(Asp), whereas its 3 products are AMP, diphosphate, and L-aspartyl-tRNA(Asp). 
As of late 2007, 10 structures have been solved for this class of enzymes, with PDB accession codes 1ASY, 1ASZ, 1B8A, 1C0A, 1EFW, 1EOV, 1EQR, 1G51, 1IL2, and 1L0W. 
The 1928 St. Louis Browns season involved the Browns finishing 3rd in the American League with a record of 82 wins and 72 losses. 
Note: Pos = Position; G = Games played; AB = At bats; H = Hits; Avg. = Batting average; HR = Home runs; RBI = Runs batted in 
Note: G = Games played; AB = At bats; H = Hits; Avg. = Batting average; HR = Home runs; RBI = Runs batted in 
Note: G = Games pitched; IP = Innings pitched; W = Wins; L = Losses; ERA = Earned run average; SO = Strikeouts 
Note: G = Games pitched; IP = Innings pitched; W = Wins; L = Losses; ERA = Earned run average; SO = Strikeouts 
Note: G = Games pitched; W = Wins; L = Losses; SV = Saves; ERA = Earned run average; SO = Strikeouts 
This article relating to a Baltimore Orioles season is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bandini was born Sallustio Antonio Bandini in Siena to a prominent local family. His father was Patrizio Bandini and his mother was Caterina Piccolomini di Modanella, a member of the influential Piccolomini nobility. He was their third son. 
Bandini is memorialised for his enlightened discourse on economics with a statue in the centre of Siena's Piazza Salimbeni, by the main entrance to Banca Monte dei Paschi di Siena, who commissioned the work. The statue was completed by Italian sculptor Tito Sarrocchi in 1880, more than a century after Bandini's death. 
Barh El Gazel Nord is one of two departments of Chad in Barh El Gazel, a region of Chad. Its capital is Salal. 
Stephen Douglas Wilson (born December 13, 1964, in Victoria, British Columbia, Canada) is a retired Canadian professional baseball player. A left-handed pitcher, he played all or part of six seasons in Major League Baseball. He is an alumnus of the University of Portland and participated in the 1983 Pan American Games and the 1984 Summer Olympics for Canada. 
In 1984, Steve pitched for the Alaska Goldpanners of Fairbanks summer amateur baseball club, where he was among 12 other players to eventually reach the major leagues. 
Wilson pitched in the Milwaukee Brewers organization in 1994, and in the Chicago White Sox system in 1996. In 1997 and 1998 Wilson played for the Taiwan Major League (TML)'s Kaohsiung-Pingtung Fala. 
Wilson retired after TML's 1998 season to get married and settle down in Tainan. He currently runs an English school for Elementary age children, and scouts for the Chicago Cubs in the Pacific Rim. Wilson also scouts in southern California for the Cubs. 
Brades (also Brades Estate) is a town and the de facto capital of Montserrat since 1998 with an approximate population of 1,000. 
Secondary students attend Montserrat Secondary School in Salem and sixth formers attend Montserrat Community College in Salem.[citation needed] 
Anna Flanagan (born 8 January 1992) is a former Australian field hockey player who plays as a defender for the Canberra Labor Club Strikers in the Australian Hockey League. She is nicknamed Flanno. 
A full international with over 100 caps since 2010 for the Australian national team, she has represented the nation at one World Cup and in one Olympic Games tournaments. 
Flanagan is a defender, who specialises in taking corner penalties. In 2000, after being a multi-sport athlete, she made a commitment to playing field hockey. 
Anna is currently sponsored by Australian hockey brand Ritual Hockey. She is also sponsored by Nike, and in early 2015, Flanagan became the first Australian hockey player to sign a sponsorship deal with global brand Red Bull. 
Irving Operation is a gynaecological operative technique for permanent sterilization in women. It was proposed to reduce the failure rate of Pomeroy procedure for female sterilization. In Irving operation, the proximal part of fallopian tube is buried back into the myometrium, thereby obstructing its lumen. 
A transverse incision is made on the abdomen and fallopian tube is identified. While holding the fallopian tube with an Allis clamp, a hemostat is used to open the mesosalpinx. Using absorbable sutures, proximal portion of fallopian tube is tied, and a segment of fallopian tube is removed. The proximal part of the fallopian tube is pulled into the defect. The distal portions of the Fallopian tube are ligated and left in place. The abdomen is closed in layers. 
Irving operation can be reversed with tubal reversal microsurgery. Pregnancy rate after tubal reversal in Irving operation is around 60 percent. 
Striatostrombus is an extinct genus of fossil sea snails, marine gastropod mollusks in the family Strombidae, the true conchs. 
The earliest existing historical records of the church date back to the year 1316, but the church was not new that year. In 1669, the old stave church was torn down and replaced with a new building. Not much is known about that building. 
In 1838, the church building was torn down and a new cruciform building was constructed on the same site. The new church was consecrated on 18 November 1838 by the local provost, Ole Berg, from Evje Church. 
Ginette Vincendeau (born 1948) is a French-born British-based academic who is a professor of film studies at King's College London. 
This biographical article related to association football in Hungary, about a goalkeeper, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In a four-season career, Jacobson hit .230 (76-for-331) with 47 runs and 24 RBI in 133 games, including nine doubles, two triples, seven stolen bases, and a .309 on-base percentage. He made 99 outfield appearances at center field (55), right (42) and left (2), and posted a collective .973 fielding percentage. 
After his time with the Robins he never appeared again in the major leagues, but he continued to play minor league baseball until 1933.   
This biographical article relating to an American baseball outfielder born in the 1890s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Nathaniel was born to Jacob Peabody in Topsfield, Massachusetts. He attended local common schools and the studied medicine with his father. In 1761, he removed to Plaistow, New Hampshire and began the practice of medicine. He was to remain a resident of Rockingham County for the rest of his life, but in 1761 he moved his practice to the larger town of Exeter. 
Dr. Peabody became active in county affairs and the New Hampshire Militia. He was made a Lt. Colonel in the militia and participated in the early stages of the Revolution including the raid on Fort William and Mary in December 1774. After this event, he resigned his commission, since it came from the crown through the royal government. 
During the later years of his life Peabody's support for the revolution caused him trouble. For about twenty years he was confined to the parole limits for debtors at the Exeter jail. He died Exeter in 1823, and was reportedly buried in the Old Cemetery in South Hampton, but the exact location is uncertain. 
Lobal Orning was a record and book store located in the mountains north of the Pacific Coast Highway in the small community of Topanga, California, United States. 
The store was run by rock musician Justin Chancellor of the band Tool, and his wife Shelee Dykman, who coined the phrase "lobal orning" which meant "to decorate the mind", in the sense of ornamenting the lobes of the brain. The store closed March 1, 2008. 
This article about a California building or structure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Edgewood Lake is an unincorporated community in Greencastle Township, Putnam County, in the U.S. state of Indiana. 
The 2019 FIBA U16 European Championship Division B was the 16th edition of the Division B of the FIBA U16 European Championship. It was played in Podgorica, Montenegro, from 8 to 17 August 2019. 24 teams participated in the competition. Poland men's national under-16 basketball team won the tournament. 
Although Jenni Rivera's previous recordings mainly consisted of banda music, she had also performed mariachi music live on her concerts. Therefore, Rivera decided to record an album in mariachi to appeal its fan base. 
Rivera was awarded Female Regional Mexican Artist of the Year at the 2010 Lo Nuestro Awards. At the 2010 Latin Billboard Music Awards, she was awarded Top Latin Albums Artist of the Year, Female and Regional Mexican Airplay Artist of the Year, Female. 
Leyland Motors Football Club was a semi-professional football club playing their home matches at County Ground, Leyland. 
Leyland Motors played in the Lancashire Combination from 1933 until 1980 when they joined the Cheshire County League, where they played for two seasons, before becoming founder members of the North West Counties Football League in 1982. In 1990 they changed name to Leyland DAF-SGL and in 1992 were demoted to the West Lancashire Football League, before another name change to Leyland Motors Athletic in 1993. Then in 2001 they left the league altogether. 
This article about a defunct English football club is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Nazrul Mancha is an auditorium in Kolkata, India. The auditorium is notably used as the venue for the Dover Lane Music Conference in January each year where audiences enjoy musical performances for four consecutive nights. 
In 2012, the Finnish band Poets of the Fall performed at Nazrul Mancha during its Temple of Thought tour in India. 
Disonycha triangularis, the three-spotted flea beetle, is a species of flea beetle in the family Chrysomelidae. It is found in North America. 
Karunguyil Kundram is a 1989 Indian Tamil-language film directed by Rajasekhar for Cinema South Productions. The film stars Charan Raj, Saranya Ponvannan and Pandiyan. 
This article about a Tamil-language film of the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
There have been three baronetcies created for members of the Dixwell family, all of whom are descended from Charles Dixwell (died 1591) of Coton House, near Churchover, Warwickshire. All three baronetcies are extinct. 
The Dixwell Baronetcy, of Tirlington in the County of Kent, was created in the Baronetage of England for Basil Dixwell, the youngest son of Charles, on 27 February 1628. He had inherited the estate of a maternal uncle near Folkestone, Kent and was  Member of Parliament for Hythe in 1626 and High Sheriff of Kent in 1627. In 1622 he built a new mansion at Broome Park near Canterbury which became his principal residence. He died without issue in 1642 when the baronetcy became extinct. 
The Dixwell Baronetcy, of Coton House, was created on 11 June 1716 for William Dixwell, (great-great-grandson of Charles Dixwell), who was High Sheriff of Warwickshire in that year. It became extinct on his death in 1757. 
Keren Bergman is an American electrical engineer who is the Charles Batchelor Professor at Columbia University. She also serves as the director of the Lightwave Research Laboratory, a silicon photonics research group at Columbia University. Her research focuses on nano-photonics and particularly optical interconnects for low power, high bandwidth computing applications. 
Bergman received a B.S. in electrical engineering from Bucknell University in 1988. She received a M.S. in Electrical Engineering in 1991, and a PhD in 1994, from the Massachusetts Institute of Technology. During her graduate work at MIT, she worked with Hermann A. Haus, researching "quantum noise reduction and soliton propagation in optical fibers." 
Bergman was an assistant professor of electrical engineering at Princeton from 1994 to 2000. During this time, she led a project funded by NASA and the NSA to test components of an optical communications network for supercomputing. 
 Bergman went to Columbia as an associate professor of electrical engineering in 2001 and became director of its Lightwave Research Laboratory in 2002. According to her member biography from OSTI's Advanced Scientific Computing Advisory Committee (of which she was a member from 2016 to 2019),
As director of the Lightwave Research Laboratory she leads multiple research programs on optical interconnection networks for advanced computing systems, data centers, optical packet-switched routers, and chip multiprocessor nanophotonic networks-on-chip.
In 2019 a team led by Bergman won a $4.8 million DARPA grant to support the development of a new class of on-chip optical interconnects that scale performance without increasing energy costs. 
Returning to the lab in July 2020, after a hiatus caused by COVID-19, Bergman told Columbia Engineering News that her team used the break to find new ways to do informal interactions as well as remote data analysis. 
In 2003 she was named a Fellow of The Optical Society "for seminal contributions to quantum noise reduction and soliton pulse generation". 
She was named a Fellow of the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers in 2009 "for contributions to development of optical interconnection and transport networks". 
Bergman also won the 2016 IEEE Photonics Society Engineering Achievement Award "[f]or pioneering contributions to optical interconnection networks and photonic-enabled architectures that advance communications and computing systems." 
This geographical article about a location in Erzurum Province, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Stacy Marshall Compton (born May 26, 1967) is a NASCAR former team owner and former driver. He is a former co-owner of Bobby Hamilton Racing-Virginia in the Craftsman Truck Series, and is a former racing analyst for ESPN full-time. Before he ran in NASCAR, Compton was a successful short track racer in Virginia. 
Compton struggled during his first year in the Cup series, as his best finish was 16th at New Hampshire International Speedway. In the summer Michigan race, he crashed during qualifying and suffered minor injuries. He was replaced by Bobby Hillin Jr. at the following event. Compton ended the year 38th in points. 
In the 2002 season, Compton signed with A.J. Foyt Racing to drive the No. 14 Pontiac, replacing Ron Hornaday Jr. He had a best finish of 18th when his sponsor Conseco filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy. He was let go after the New England 300. He returned to Melling for one race before competing in two for BAM Racing at the end of the season. His last career Cup start for nine years came in the 2003 Pepsi 400 for Morgan-McClure Motorsports. 
In 2001 at the GNC Live Well 300, Compton made his Busch Series debut with JTG Daugherty Racing, then known as ST Motorsports. He qualified 12th and finished 10th. For four consecutive seasons, Compton ran every Busch Series race with JTG. Although he did not win a Busch Series race, he has 33 career top-ten finishes and one pole position. His best points finish was a 9th in 2002. 
2012 saw Compton expand his Truck Series team, Turn One Racing, into the Cup series with the No. 74 Chevrolet, starting at Bristol Motor Speedway in March He himself would attempt to qualify the car at Texas Motor Speedway but failed to do so. However, Compton did later manage to get into the field for the Pocono 400 in June. He has not raced since then. 
The Windy City ThunderBolts are a professional baseball team based in the Chicago suburb of Crestwood, Illinois, in the United States. The ThunderBolts are a member of the Frontier League, which is a partner league of Major League Baseball. Since 1999, the ThunderBolts have played their home games at Ozinga Field. 
The Heartland League started the 1998 season with six teams and finished with only four teams.  The Cheetahs, now known as the Cook County Cheetahs, won the last ever Heartland League championship as the league folded after three seasons. 
In 1999, the Cheetahs joined the stable Frontier League and have been members since.  The team changed their name to the Windy City ThunderBolts. An ownership change instigated the name change. 
The ThunderBolts currently play at Ozinga Field (which was renamed from Standard Bank Stadium in 2018) which is located in Crestwood, Illinois. Ozinga Field is easily accessible from the south suburbs, located two blocks east of Cicero Avenue on the Midlothian Turnpike (1.5 miles south of I-294). 
On April 23, 2019, Assistant General Manager Mike VerShave was named General Manager. Having served as Assistant General Manager since 2014, VerShave replaced former General Manager Mike Lucas. 
The San Diego Padres bought the rights to Cheetahs pitcher Chris Oxspring in 2000. He became the first player in franchise history to play in Major League Baseball (MLB).  He played in five games for the Padres in 2005. 
In 2011, Dylan Axelrod became the first former ThunderBolt and second player in franchise history to play in MLB, having been called up by the Chicago White Sox. 
On August 5, 2008, Isaac Hess threw the first no-hitter in ThunderBolts history.  Tyson Corley threw the second on August 28, 2012. 
Pitcher Andrew Werner became the third player in club history to make it to the majors when he started for the San Diego Padres in 2012. 
Tommy Nance played with Windy City in 2015. He later went on to be the 4th ThunderBolt alumni to reach the major leagues when he debuted with the Chicago Cubs in 2021. 
All 30 Major League Baseball teams have signed players out of the Frontier League. The Cubs, Mariners, Royals, and White Sox currently have former ThunderBolts' players or coaches in their organizations.[when?] There is a total of 32 players who have reached the major leagues after playing in the Frontier League. 
On 5 June 1888, the Montevideo journal La Tribuna Popular reported the earthquake and its effects: The houses' woodwork creaked loudly, lamps swung, furniture moved and paintings fell off walls. Glassware objects broke and porcelain could be seen jolting out of cupboards. Astonished at the strong earthquake, inhabitants have had a sleepless night... 
Double Door is a 1934 American pre-Code drama film directed by Charles Vidor and written by Jack Cunningham and Gladys Lehman. It is based on the 1933 Broadway play of the same name by Elizabeth A. McFadden. 
The film stars Evelyn Venable, Mary Morris, Anne Revere and Kent Taylor. Morris and Revere reprised their Broadway roles. Though Morris had a long stage career, this is her only film performance. 
A domineering woman, Victoria Van Brett, tries to destroy her brother (Rip)'s marriage to young Anne Darrow. 
The New York Times review was favorable: "The film version of Miss McFadden's play is a careful and intelligent copy of the original." Morris was praised for her "highly effective performance", while "Evelyn Venable, as the young wife, and Anne Revere, as the sister (the part she played on the stage), are admirable foils for the cruel old witch. They are reinforced effectively by Kent Taylor, Sir Guy Standing and Colin Tapley." 
Two subsequent albums, Force It (July 1975) and No Heavy Petting (May 1976; recorded with ex-Heavy Metal Kids' Danny Peyronel, who served as a regular keyboardist as well as harmony vocalist and songwriter), and extensive touring brought UFO increased visibility with American audiences and increased their following in the UK. The song "Belladonna" from No Heavy Petting was very popular in the USSR, owing to a cover version by Alexander Barykin. 
Tensions began to grow between Mogg and Schenker in the late 1970s, possibly from Schenker often leaving before or during shows. Soon after UFO's show in Palo Alto, California, on 29 October 1978, Schenker left the band. He made a brief return to the Scorpions before going on to form his own Michael Schenker Group. 
Phil Mogg and Pete Way continued working together throughout this fluctuating band membership, releasing two albums under the Mogg/Way name in the late 1990s, Edge of the World and Chocolate Box. 
In 2000, Schenker rejoined UFO again and the band released the double CD Covenant (with Aynsley Dunbar on drums), which contained a disc of new material and a disc of live classics. In 2002, the band recorded Sharks; shortly after Sharks was released, Schenker left the band yet again and was replaced with Vinnie Moore. and the official announcement was made in July 2003. In 2003, Michael Schenker and Pete Way released The Plot with drummer Jeff Martin. 
Andy Parker returned in early 2007, after recovering from leg surgery. On the 2008 tour, Pete Way was unable to get a work visa to enter the United States, Rob De Luca (Sebastian Bach's band, Of Earth, Spread Eagle) filling in. 
UFO released their 19th studio album, The Visitor, in June 2009, and followed with a tour of the UK, but without Pete Way, who was suffering from a medical condition. Bass tracks on The Visitor were played by Peter Pichl, and Pete Way was not credited as a band member on The Visitor cover, nor was any other bassist. However, the album saw UFO's return to the UK Albums Chart for the first time in almost 15 years. 
In July 2009, UFO released a six-CD live concert box set, containing recordings of six concerts between 1975 and 1982, as well as previously unreleased live songs. 
By December 2010, UFO had been working on a twentieth studio album, which was supposed to be released in June 2011. Titled Seven Deadly, was released on 27 February 2012, with Lars Lehmann on bass, to almost universally good reviews and a higher chart position than The Visitor also charting in Germany, Sweden, and the Billboard indie charts. 
In 2011, former band members Danny Peyronel, Laurence Archer, and Clive Edwards teamed up with bassist Rocky Newton (ex-McAuley Schenker Group) to form a band entitled X-UFO. In live performances, X-UFO played sets of vintage UFO songs, later renamed House Of X to perform their own material. Their eponymous album was released on 24 October 2014. 
In 2013, Paul Raymond revealed that a new UFO album was in the works, but there was "no detailed talk of that yet." The album, titled A Conspiracy of Stars, was released on 23 February 2015. 
On 10 September 2016, guitarist Vinnie Moore announced on Facebook that UFO were in the studio recording a covers album. The album, titled The Salentino Cuts, was released on 29 September 2017. 
Cyrus the Great introduced coins to the Persian Empire after 546 BC, following his conquest of Lydia and the defeat of its king Croesus, whose father Alyattes had put in place the first coinage in history. With his conquest of Lydia, Cyrus acquired a region in which coinage was invented, developed through advanced metallurgy, and had already been in circulation for about 50 years, making the Lydian Kingdom one of the leading trade powers of the time. 
As late as the time of the foundation of the Apadana Palace in Persepolis (dated to between 519 and 510 BC), it seems that the Achaemenids had not yet designed the Sigloi and Darics: no coins of these types were found in the Apadana hoard discovered under the palace's foundation stones, whereas the hoard contained several gold Croeseids of the light type from Sardis (probably minted under the rule of Darius I) and several imported Archaic Greek silver staters. 
The coinage of the Achaemenid Empire started to move away from simply copying Lydian coinage, to introducing changes with the reign of Darius I (ruled 522-486 BC). Under Darius I, the minting of Croeseids in Sardis was progressively replaced by the minting of Darics and Sigloi. 
The new Achaemenid coins were initially only made in silver, while the Lydian gold design of the Croesus was maintained. Then, Darius introduced his new design for gold coins as well, which came to be known as Darics, from Old Persian Daruiyaka, meaning "Golden". Although the Achaemenids had developed their own currency, they still accepted local monetary production including civic issues, throughout the land under their control, in particular in Western Asia. 
According to numismat Martin Price, there is no doubt that the Darics and Sigloi of Types I and II were minted at Sardis and immediately followed the production of the Croeseids, since they adopted similar weights and were of the same fabric. He insists that the finds of the Croeseids and the "Archer" types of Darics and Sigloi indicate that they were not an Imperial coinage, but rather the coinage of the Satrapy of Lydia. 
Although the Achaemenids fully exploited and developed coinage production in Western Asia, it seems barter economy remained quite important in the Iranian heartland throughout the Achaemenid period, and the Achaemenids did not develop their own mints in Iran. At the same time, the circulation of the Daric was mainly confined to the Western part of the Achaemenid Empire.The minting of coins in Iran would only start later from circa 330 BCE under Alexander the Great and the Seleucid Empire. 
The Siglos was 5.40-5.60 grams each, based on the 0.5 Lydian Siglos of 10.73-10.92 grams for the full unit. Purity was at first issue 97-98% but by the middle 4th century was 94-95%. 1 Siglos = 7.5 Attic Obols. 
Although the area of Babylon had never minted Darics or Sigloi, after the capture of Babylon by Alexander, the Satrap Mazaeus, reconfirmed by Alexander in his position for having opened the doors of Babylon to his armies after the Battle of Gaugamela, issued the double Daric of 16.65 grams in weight whose image was based on the Daric coin and bore his name until his death in 328 BCE. 
Siglos Type IV ("King running with dagger"), temp. Artaxerxes II to Artaxerxes III, circa 375-340 BC. 
Daric Type IV ("King running with dagger"), temp. Artaxerxes II to Artaxerxes III, circa 375-340 BC. (15mm, 8.33 g) 
Daric coins have been found in Asia Minor, Greece, Macedonia and Italy. The Siglos denomination have been found in hoards only in Asia Minor, and single coins with other Greek coinage from Ancient Egypt to Afghanistan (Kabul hoard) and Pakistan (Shaikhan Dehri hoard). 
Some Achaemenid satraps are also known to have minted coins in imitation of Athenian coinage, such as the satrap of Egypt Sabakes (ruled circa 340-333 BCE). An Achaemenid copy of an Athenian coin, this time found in the Kabul hoard, was minted in the vicinity of Babylon circa 380 BCE. 
Greek coinage travelled throughout the Achaemenid Empire. For example, the Greek coins discovered in the Kabul hoard include the following types: 
Early Classical coins from Athens were by far the most numerous coin type in the Kabul hoard. Circa 454-404 BCE. 
According to numismatist Joe Cribb,  these finds suggest that the idea of coinage and the use of punch-marked techniques was introduced to India from the Achaemenid Empire during the 4th century BCE. More Achaemenid coins were also found in Pushkalavati and in Bhir Mound. 
Punch-marked coin minted in the Kabul Valley under Achaemenid administration. Circa 500-380 BC, or c.350 BCE. 
A siglos found in the Kabul valley, 5th century BCE. Coins of this type were also found in the Bhir Mound hoard. 
During the 4th century, following the weakening of central Achaemenid power, and the development of coinage technologies, Siglos production receded and numerous satrapal issues of a very high quality started to appear in Western Asia under the Achaemenid Empire. These issues combined Achaemenid as well as Greek characteristics. Throughout, coin circulation was characterized by a mix of coins from the Achaemenid and Greek realms. 
Various Achaemenid satraps also issued imitations of Athenian tetradrachms, such as Sabakes in Egypt. 
Baaltars on a throne (obverse) and head of Ares (reverse), on a double shekel of Pharnabazus II (380-375 BC). 
Even many years after the death of Alexander, Achaemenid gold darics continued to be minted in Babylon, at the same time as Alexandrine imperial issues were minted. Some of these issues are dated to circa 315-300/298 BC. These darics continued to use the Achaemenid type, but the reverse was slightly modified to include wavy patterns. 
Time Will Reveal is the fourth studio album by the American West Coast hip hop group Above the Law. Released in 1996 by Tommy Boy Records, it was the group's first record after leaving Ruthless Records following the death of member Eazy-E. The group's former labelmates Kokane and MC Ren made guest appearances on the record, along with Enuff, Daddy Cool and Kid Frost. Time Will Reveal peaked at number 16 on the Top R&B/Hip-Hop Albums and number 80 on the Billboard 200. 
In 1875, his mother died, and his father fell seriously ill and became unable to support four children; he died in 1877. The family slipped into abject poverty. As patronage for Levitan's talent and achievements, his Jewish origins and to keep him in the school, he was given a scholarship. 
In the spring of 1884 Levitan participated in the mobile art exhibition by the group known as the Peredvizhniki and in 1891 became a member of the Peredvizhniki partnership. During his study in the Moscow School of painting, sculpting and architecture, Levitan befriended Konstantin Korovin, Mikhail Nesterov, architect Fyodor Shekhtel, and the painter Nikolay Chekhov. Levitan often visited Chekhov and some think Levitan was in love with his sister, Maria Pavlovna Chekhova.[citation needed] 
By the mid 1880s Levitan's friendship with Chekhov had deepened, and Levitan began spending time with the Chekhov family near Babkino where the Chekhovs had a house. During his first summer there he painted The River Istra (1885) and gave it to Chekhov. He also painted Twilight River Istra (1885) with a darker, more somber palette. Chekhov was fond of creating pantomimes for his guests, with Levitan often ridiculed for playing the villain, the victim and the alien Jew, ostensibly all in jest. 
In 1892 Levitan had a falling out with Chekhov over The Grasshopper, a story Chekhov published in the "Sever" (North) magazine,  which Levitan believed was based on his romantic relationship with Sofia Kuvshinnikova. Although Chekhov apologized the two remained estranged until January 1895. 
In September 1892 Jews were again expelled from Moscow and Levitan left the city for Boldino. His friends' pleadings enabled him to return by December of that year. 
In 1897, already world-famous, he was elected to the Imperial Academy of Arts and in 1898 he was named the head of the Landscape Studio at his alma mater.[citation needed] 
Isaac Levitan's hugely influential art heritage consists of more than a thousand paintings, among them watercolors, pastels, graphics, and illustrations.[citation needed] 
During the year after his death an exhibit of several hundred Levitan paintings was shown in Moscow and then in St. Petersburg. His works appeared on the covers of Russian language textbooks and school children learned of his love for his native land. 
A minor planet 3566 Levitan, discovered by Soviet astronomer Lyudmila Zhuravlyova in 1979 is named after him. 
All That Remains was formed in 1998 by then Shadows Fall vocalist Phil Labonte as a side project. After Labonte was asked to leave that band, All That Remains became a full-time project. 
Before recording Behind Silence and Solitude, All That Remains recorded two demos, both released in 1999. The first demo features the songs "Follow", "From These Wounds" and "Shading" and was handed out at Milwaukee Metalfest 1999. The band's second demo, Demo 1999, features the same songs but with "Erase" replacing "From These Wounds". The demo version of "Follow" also features an orchestral intro. 
 Izza Kizza (born Terry Davis in 1981) is an American hip hop recording artist and MC, currently signed to Timbaland's Mosley Music Group label. He is known for creating mixes with an eclectic flow and versatile style, recalling some of hip-hop's most playful moments. 
Izza's first mixtape, "Kizzaland", mixed by Nick Catchdubs, was made available as a free download in 2008 via his weblog, sporting mixes by Timbaland, Soul Diggaz and Koolade. One of the songs from the mixtape, "Red Wine", was featured as the opening track of Paste Magazine's June 2008 New-Music Sampler CD. The song "Millionaire" was included in the soundtrack for the Madden NFL 09 video game, as well as his song "They're Everywhere" being included on the NBA 2K10 video game soundtrack. 
"They're Everywhere" also appeared on the 5th season of the popular FOX dance competition So You Think You Can Dance in a hip-hop routine danced by 4th-place finisher Kayla Radomski and 7th-place finisher Jason Glover, it was choreographed by Shane Sparks. 
Super League XXVI is the 2021 season of Super League, and 126th season of rugby league in Great Britain. The season started on 26 March 2021, with all six fixtures taking place behind closed doors, at Headingley. It was originally scheduled to have consisted of 27 regular season games, but will now only consist of 25, including the Grand Final at Old Trafford, set to take place on 9 October 2021.  
Due to the ongoing effects of the Covid-19 pandemic, the Magic Weekend which was cancelled last year, will now take place over the weekend of 4-5 September 2021 at St James' Park, Newcastle.  
The full fixture list was released on 26 February 2021, with defending champions St Helens, starting their title defence against Last Year's Challenge Cup finalists Salford Red Devils (a repeat of the 2019 Super League Grand Final), whilst last season's runners up, Wigan Warriors are set to take on newly promoted Leigh Centurions. 
The matches in round 9 were played while giving support to the Rainbow Laces campaign run by Stonewall. 
Mtoe = 11.63 TWh, Prim. energy includes energy losses that are 2/3 for nuclear power 2012R = CO2 calculation criteria changed, numbers updated 
EDF held a monopoly in the distribution, but not the production, of electricity in France until 1999, when the first European Union directive to harmonize regulation of electricity markets was implemented. 
EDF is one of the world's largest producers of electricity. In 2003, it produced 22% of the European Union's electricity, primarily from nuclear power: 
A report was published in 2011 by the World Energy Council in association with Oliver Wyman, entitled Policies for the future: 2011 Assessment of country energy and climate policies, which ranks country performance according to an energy sustainability index. The best performers were Switzerland, Sweden, and France. 
With growing installed wind and solar power capacity, on top of preexisting hydroelectric facilities, renewable energy rose to provide 23% of France's national electricity consumption in 2019. 
The 11th Fighter-Interceptor Squadron is an inactive United States Air Force unit.  Its last assignment was with the 343d Fighter Group at Duluth Airport, Minnesota, where it was inactivated on 30 June 1968. 
The squadron was activated as the 11th Pursuit Squadron at Selfridge Field, Michigan in January 1941 as one of the original squadrons of the 50th Pursuit Group.  It trained with Vultee BT-13 Valiant and second-line Seversky P-35 Guardsman pursuit fighters at Selfridge. In September, the squadron moved to Key Field, Mississippi, where it equipped with Curtiss P-40 Warhawks. 
Upon inactivation, the squadron's mission personnel, and F-106s were transferred to the 87th Fighter-Interceptor Squadron at Duluth IAP. 
Context Labs (CXL) is a company that provides blockchain enabled platform solutions[buzzword] such as secure distributed ledgers, network graph analytics, and data interoperability and visualization for publishing, financial, trading and supply chain industries. Headquartered in Amsterdam, Netherlands and Cambridge, Massachusetts, the company was founded in 2013. 
Context Labs, BV was founded in 2013 by Daniel Harple, a technology entrepreneur and internet pioneer in web streaming and VoIP. With offices in Amsterdam, Netherlands and Cambridge, Massachusetts, the company was formed with the objective of extending research and development begun at MIT Sloan and the MIT Media Lab focusing on "innovation dynamics". 
Partnering with architectural design firm Rogers Partners in 2014, the company applied innovation dynamics methods to collaborate on the design for the Connect Kendall Square project. 
In June 2016, Context Labs announced that as a co-founding member, the company would provide operational, strategic, and technical guidance for the Open Music Initiative, a digital rights framework for the music industry. 
In molecular biology, Small nucleolar RNA Z103 is a non-coding RNA (ncRNA) molecule which functions in the modification of other small nuclear RNAs (snRNAs). This type of modifying RNA is usually located in the nucleolus of the eukaryotic cell which is a major site of snRNA biogenesis. It is known as a small nucleolar RNA (snoRNA) and also often referred to as a guide RNA. 
snoRNA Z103 belongs to the C/D box class of snoRNAs which contain the conserved sequence motifs known as the C box (UGAUGA) and the D box (CUGA). Most of the members of the box C/D family function in directing site-specific 2'-O-methylation of substrate RNAs. 
The Slim family is a family of Lebanese descent whose members currently reside in Europe, Lebanon, the United States and Mexico. 
Homadaula watamomaritima is a moth in the family Galacticidae. It was described by Wolfram Mey in 2007. It is found in Kenya. 
The light heavyweight competition was the third-highest weight class featured in amateur boxing at the 2008 Summer Olympics, and was held at the Workers Indoor Arena. Light heavyweights were limited to a maximum of 81 kilograms in body mass. 
The round of 32 was marked by injury when Samoa's Farani Tavui was taken to hospital after being knocked unconscious during his first match. 
Roberto Quarta (born May 10, 1949) is an Italian-born American businessman. He is the chairman of Smith & Nephew, and the chairman of WPP plc since June 2015. 
Roberto Quarta was born on May 10, 1949 in Italy. He emigrated to the United States at the age of 15, and he spent the rest of his adolescence in Brooklyn, New York City, where his father was a tailor. 
His initial industrial management career was with BTR plc, where he rose to serve on the board. In 1993 he moved to become chief executive of BBA Group, where he executed strong performance improvement and portfolio change, producing a major increase in shareholder value. He later became chair of BBA (which was renamed BBA Aviation following the demerger of Fiberweb in November 2006), stepping down in 2007. 
Quarta is a partner of Clayton, Dubilier & Rice, a private equity group. He is on the board of two CD&R businesses, Rexel SA and Italtel. He was chairman of IMI plc (2011-2015). He has served on the boards of PowerGen plc, BAE Systems plc, and Equant NV. He has served as the chairman of Smith & Nephew since 2014. 
Following the resignation of Martin Sorrell, CEO and founder of WPP, he became executive chairman in April 2018. 
This article about an American businessperson born in the 1940s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Apoi people trace their origin to a migration from the Central Niger Delta in present day Bayelsa State and further to an early migration from Ile-Ife. Prior to arriving at their present location, tribal traditions recall a long period of settlement at Ukomu in what is now Furupagha territory. 
The Apoi took their name from Apoi (Opoi) the son of Kala-Okun, who accompanied his grandfather Ujo on their way back to Otu-Ife or Ile-Ife. In a group of nine they got lost in trying to trace the route back without the aid of a navigator. So they decided to settle within the vicinity of the Nun river (Apoi creek), where the present village of Apoi is situated. Ujo who bore the title Kalasuwe (KALA-SUWE or KALUSUWE i.e. small god,), died here and his grandson inherited the title. 
The Apoi king is called Oba and the title is Kalasuwe and dual-seats of the throne are in Shabomi and Oboro.  
This is a directory of properties and districts listed on the National Register of Historic Places in Arizona. There are about fourteen hundred listed sites in the state, and each of its fifteen counties has at least ten listings on the National Register. Forty-seven of the state's sites are further designated as National Historic Landmarks. 
After winning the 2015 Oceania Championships, she is representing New Zealand at the 2016 Summer Olympics in the Women's skeet competition. 
Her father is David Tipple, the owner of the Christchurch firearms chain Gun City. David Tipple claims to own the world's biggest gun store. 
This biographical article relating to sport shooting in New Zealand is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"Dahlia" is the thirteenth single by Japanese heavy metal band X Japan, released on February 26, 1996. 
"Dahlia" went on to become the title track of the band's 1996 album and one of Yoshiki's last compositions in his signature blend of speed and symphonic metal. The song's title, "Dahlia", appears in the lyrics as an acronym during a voice over, which says "destiny, alive, heaven, love, innocence, always, destroy, aftermath, hell, life, infinite". 
The single was released with two different covers. The B-side is a live version of "Tears", recorded on December 30, 1993 at the Tokyo Dome. The same recording also appears on their live compilation album Live Live Live Tokyo Dome 1993-1996. 
The single reached number 1 on the Oricon charts, and charted for 8 weeks. In 1996, with 412,810 copies sold was the 72nd best-selling single of the year, being certified Platinum by RIAJ. 
Clunie was born in the village of Eaglesham in Renfrewshire, Scotland. His father was a professional golfer, golf course designer and gamekeeper on the Gilmore estate.  As a child, Clunie began illustrating his school assignments with watercolor paintings, which attracted the attention of a teacher who organized an exhibition of his work which toured area schools. 
Robert developed an aversion to the social class system then prevalent in Scotland, and decided to emigrate to the United States with his older brother William in 1911.  Initially, they settled in Saginaw, Michigan. Several months later, the rest of his family also emigrated to Michigan. 
He found work as a pin striping artist with A. T. Ferrell Company, which manufactured harvesters for farmers.  Meanwhile, his father obtained commissions to design golf courses in Saginaw, Bad Axe and Bridgeport, Michigan. 
Less than a year later, the couple returned to California, and settled in Santa Paula, Myrtle's home town.  He entered into a successful house painting business with a partner, Sam Dunkle, with specialties including gold leaf lettering, wallpaper and faux painting.  In 1923, he designed and built a modern new home that incorporated an artist's studio.  He continued canvas and easel painting, increasingly concentrating on landscapes.  He also became a serious amateur tennis player. 
His brother William, a pilot, was killed in a plane crash in Flint, Michigan in 1927, which was traumatic as the brothers were very close.  In that same year, he left the house painting business to concentrate on fine art. 
In the spring of 1928, he completed his first Sierra Nevada landscape, entitled Olivas Pack Station, a scene in Lone Pine.  Mount Whitney towers in the background. 
On March 13, 1928, Santa Paula was flooded when the St. Francis Dam, owned by the City of Los Angeles, collapsed, killing 600 people and destroying nearly 1200 homes.  Clunie returned to house painting temporarily as the town was rebuilt, but still managed to complete 19 paintings that year. 
During the 1930s, Clunie received several commissions to paint large dioramas at the California Exposition & State Fair in Sacramento.  Crowds would gather to watch him paint. 
In 1935, Clunie spent two months painting in Taos, New Mexico.  Local painter Walter Ufer praised Clunie's work there, urging him, "Stay in Taos, Robert.  You are giving it a new look." Ansel Adams called one of his Taos paintings, Vaya Con Dios - St. Francis of Assisi Mission - Moonlight a "masterpiece". 
In February, 1937, Clunie won first prize in the Academy of Western Painters Exhibition for his painting Saginaw River.  The painting won third prize at the California Exposition and State Fair in 1938. 
He painted in the Grand Tetons each summer from 1938 to 1941, and the Los Angeles Times described his Teton paintings as "impressive" and said that "the artist has approached his subject with a bold, strong technique combining the finest in art with a reality and geographic correctness which has excited the highest admiration from the rangers in charge of the district as well as art critics".  He became friends with mountaineers Paul Petzoldt and Jack Durrance in the Tetons. 
When Germany invaded Poland in September, 1939, Clunie developed melancholia and was unable to paint for a year. 
Clunie was an enthusiastic chess player.  He beat Reuben Fine at chess on September 15, 1940.  Clunie was the only player who beat Fine, a grandmaster, during his two-month tour of the country. 
When the United States entered World War II, Clunie spent six months doing camouflage painting at Navy refuelling depots at Morro Bay and Cayucos, California. 
In 1942, Clunie went back to his favorite painting location in the Palisades peaks, and returned every summer until 1966, usually spending about two months in the wilderness.  He would usually hire five mules to pack in his gear. 
Clunie and his wife purchased property below the Eastern Sierras in Bishop, California in 1945, and began building a home and studio.  He announced that he was leaving Santa Paula, and the art community in that city organized an exhibit and reception in his honor, attended by over 600 people. 
His new home in Bishop was completed in 1948, and he sold his Santa Paula home.  Gradually, he stopped entering his paintings in exhibitions, and concentrated on selling his paintings out of his studio or at his wilderness campsite.  In 1955, he served on the Inyo County Grand Jury, investigating taxation of water exported from the Owens Valley by the Los Angeles Department of Water and Power.  He developed a friendship with Robert William Wood, another painter who lived in Bishop. 
In 1980, the Arts Commission of the city of Bishop honored him with a retrospective exhibit of 84 paintings.  A banner hung over U.S. Route 395 promoting the two-week exhibit. 
Clunie's lost painting, The Cliff, which had been missing since 1929, came to light shortly after his death.   The wife of art book publisher Walter Foster had received it as a gift from friends of hers in Napa, California. It is not known how the painting made its way there. 
Clunie's home and studio in Bishop was purchased by painter Richard Coons, who renamed it the Coons Gallery. Since Coons' death in 2003, the gallery has been operated by his widow, Spotted Dog Press publisher Wynne Benti. 
Clunie was a longtime advocate for a dedicated art museum in Santa Paula.  The Santa Paula Art Museum opened on February 14, 2010, featuring works by Clunie and many of his contemporaries. 
Bhadreshwar is the site of the ancient city of Bhadravati.Bhadravati is mentioned in epic  Mahabharata. It is mentioned in the works of Kantavijay, a Jain monk. 
Under the Hala Jadeja, it was seized by Jam Jadeja and afterwards by Jam Raval in 1535 (Samvat 1592). Since then it has been neglected. In 1763, the walls of the old fort began to be pulled down and the stones used for building. About 1810 even the old temples were razed to supply stones to build the seaport town of Mundra. 
After the independence of India in 1947, Cutch State acceded unto the dominion of India and was constituted an independent commissionaire, Kutch State. In 1956, Kutch State was merged with Bombay state, which in 1960 was divided into the new linguistic states of Gujarat and Maharashtra, with Kutch becoming part of Gujarat state. Bhadreshwar now falls under Mundra Taluka of Kutch district. 
In the former temple, the lower part was considered the oldest in age, perhaps about 1170. The temple complex was again completely devastated in earthquake of 26 January 2001; however, it has now been completely rebuilt to as many of the old shrines were destroyed to the extent that it could not be rehabilitated. 
Chhoti Masjid is a very old mosque which is reliably dated to the late 12th century, meaning they predate the well known Islamic architecture of Ahmedabad by 250 years or so, making them in all likelihood the first mosques built in India. 
On the south-west of Vasai Jain temple, there are ruins of another mosque known as Solahkhambhi Mosque which is partially buried in the sand and is no longer in use. 
There is also an ancient Shiva temple known as Chokhanda Mahadev situated at the seashore.  This old temple was made with red stones. There is also the centuries-old Rokadiya Hanuman temple. 
There is a thermal power plant by OPG Power. The Bhadresar has been included in special economic zone of Mundra. However, the local fishermen and other communities have protested the development and there is resentment that the traditional livelihoods of residents in the area have been affected by the new industrial projects, leading to organized protests. 
Cameron Oliver (born July 11, 1996) is an American professional basketball player for the South Bay Lakers of the NBA G League. He played college basketball for the Nevada Wolf Pack. 
Oliver missed his junior year at Grant Union High School due to an ACL injury, before averaging 21.5 points and ten rebounds as a senior.[citation needed] 
After going undrafted in 2017 NBA draft, Oliver spent the NBA Summer League and preseason with the Houston Rockets, but a hand injury in early October led to his release. In November 2017, he joined the Wisconsin Herd of the NBA G League. On January 26, 2018, he was traded to the Delaware 87ers. 
On November 16, 2020, Oliver re-signed with the Cairns Taipans on a two-year deal. On April 18, 2021, he left the Taipans to return home for personal reasons. He was later released from the final year of his contract with Cairns. 
In August 2021, Oliver joined the Golden State Warriors for the 2021 NBA Summer League and on September 29, he signed an Exhibit 10 contract with the Los Angeles Lakers. He was waived on October 15, and on October 23, he was acquired by the South Bay Lakers of the NBA G League as an affiliate player. 
The Rangitoto Islands are a group of islands near the Marlborough Sounds along the northern coast of the South Island of New Zealand. 
The Pattani Islamic Mujahideen Movement (Malay: Gerakan Mujahidin Islam Patani; GMIP) is an Islamic insurgent movement that has carried out violent actions as part of the protracted insurgency in Southern Thailand. 
GMIP is hostile to the practices of moderate Malay Muslims, accusing them of being un-Islamic. It is one of the most extreme terrorist groups currently operating in Southern Thailand. A shadowy leader named 'Jehkumir Kuteh' or 'Abdul Rahman Ahmad', among other names, was assumed at a certain point to lead the group, and Thailand's prime minister demanded from Malaysia his extradition in January 2005, but the Malaysian government refused. 
Unlike previous Islamic insurgent groups of the region, the characteristic of this outfit in its new avatar is that it attacks forcefully and does not claim responsibility, and also that it keeps its leadership shrouded in secrecy. GMIP was accused by the Thai authorities as the main instigator of the series of bombings, drive-by shootings and machete attacks in Southern Thailand that began in January 2004. 
Although its headquarters are unknown, many of the operations of the GMIP suggest that it is rural-based. The Thai military have linked the GMIP to attacks on convoys and policemen in roads crossing rural districts. 
This terrorist group has also been suspected by Thai officials of being behind the 2006 Hat Yai bombings as well as more recently the 2012 Southern Thailand bombings. 
This article related to a paramilitary organization or suspected paramilitary organization is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Manansala's paintings are the best and were celebrated as the best of the barrio and the city together.  His Madonna of the Slums is a portrayal of a mother and child from the countryside who became urban shanty residents once in the city.  In his Jeepneys, Manansala combined the elements of provincial folk culture with the congestion issues of the city. 
Manansala developed transparent cubism, wherein the "delicate tones, shapes, and patterns of figure and environment are masterfully superimposed".  A fine example of Manansala using this "transparent and translucent" technique is his composition, kalabaw (Carabao). 
Was born on January 22, 1910 in Macabebe, Philippine & died on August 22, 1981 in Manila, Philippines due to lung cancer. 
Deborah Ellis CM OOnt (born August 7, 1960) is a Canadian fiction-writer and activist. Her themes are often concerned with the sufferings of persecuted children in the Third World. 
Born in Cochrane Ontario Ellis and her family moved several times during her childhood due to her parents' work. Ellis decided to start writing when she was 11 or 12 years old. 
Much of her work as a writer has been inspired by her travels and conversations with people from around the world and their stories. She has held many jobs advocating for the peace movement and the anti-war movement. 
In 1999, her novel Looking for X was published. It follows a young girl in her day-to-day life in a poor area of Toronto and it received the Governor General's Award for English-language children's literature in 2000. 
One of her best known works is the 2004 book The Heaven Shop, which tells of a family of orphans in Malawi who are struggling with sudden displacement as a result of the HIV/AIDS impact. The novel was written to dispel myths about HIV/AIDS and celebrate the courage of child sufferers. 
In 2008, Ellis published Lunch with Lenin and Other Stories, a collection of short stories that explores the lives of children who have been affected directly, or indirectly, by drugs. The stories are set against backdrops as diverse as the remote north of Canada to Moscow's Red Square to an opium farm in Afghanistan. 
In 2014, she published Moon at Nine, a YA novel based on the true story of two teenage girls who are arrested and thrown in prison in Iran, a country where homosexuality is punishable by death. 
Ellis is the recipient of the Governor General's Award, the Jane Addams Children's Book Award, the Vicky Metcalf Award for a body of work, an ALA Notable, and the Children's Africana Book Award Honor Book for Older Readers. 
Ellis is a philanthropist, donating almost all of her royalties on her books to such organizations as "Canadian Women for Women in Afghanistan" and UNICEF. Due to this work, she has been threatened by the Taliban. 
During his club career, Pantazopoulos played with the Greek teams Panellionios and Panathinaikos. With Panellinios, he won 2 Greek League championships, in 1939 and 1940. He also won 3 Greek League championships with Panathinaikos, in 1946, 1947, and 1950.  
Pantazopoulos was a member of the senior Greek national basketball team. With Greece, he won the bronze medal at the 1949 EuroBasket. 
During his playing career, Papazoglou was also a player-coach. He continued to work as a basketball coach, after he retired from playing. He was the head coach of the Greek clubs Panathinaikos and AEK Athens. As a head coach, he won a total of 8 Greek League championships. 
He won the Greek League championship with Panathinaikos, in 1946, 1947, 1950, and 1951. He also won the Greek League championship with AEK Athens, in 1963, 1964, 1965, and 1966. He also led AEK Athens to the 1966 FIBA European Champions Cup Final Four (1966 EuroLeague Final Four). 
Pantazopoulos was also the head coach of the senior Greek national basketball team. He was Greece's head coach at the 1967 Mediterranean Games, and the 1967 EuroBasket. He also coached Greece at the 1968 and 1969 Balkan Championships. 
This biographical article relating to a Greek basketball figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a location in Armavir Province, Armenia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Swansea-Builth Wells National Cycle Route 43 passes through the village. The village is home to several places of worship including Caersalem Chapel, St Albans, Treboeth Gospel Hall and Mynyddbach Chapel. 
Even prior to the Philippine landfall of Nanmadol, ongoing relief operations were hampered by the storm's overreaching effects. Search and rescue helicopters failed to reach planned destinations, which was also due in part to the country's small helicopter fleet. A navy gunboat refitted as a relief ship headed for Real, Quezon was forced to turn back due to high waves onset by the approaching typhoon which swept potentially hazardous logs into sea. 
After contesting Oldham constituency unsuccessfully in 1886, he again took part in the July 1892 general election and was elected to the House of Commons for the Oldham constituency. He was a Liberal, and favoured Home Rule for Ireland and the Gladstonian programme in general. He sat in the House of Commons until his retirement in 1895. 
This article about a Liberal Member of the Parliament of the United Kingdom representing an English constituency is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jamie Bernadette Watkins (born December 14, 1987, Kankakee, Illinois) is an American actress and occasional producer. She has appeared in many horror films. 
Watkins came to a crossroads in her life when she had the choice to stay in her beloved hometown, settle down and get married, or venture out to Los Angeles where dreams of acting awaited her. She came to the decision to try out Hollywood and left with $600 in her pocket and drove across the country by herself. 
Her first roles include the thriller Son of Sam and the short Struck (both 2008), co-starring Kelly Preston and Jenna Elfman. In 2009 she had a bigger role besides David Carradine in Absolute Evil. Since 2010 she was seen in more popular movies such as MILF (2010), Axeman (2013), What Now (2015), starring Ice-T, Mortdecai (2015), starring Johnny Depp, Jem and the Holograms (2015), and The Darkness, (2016), starring Kevin Bacon. She also appeared in an episode of The Neighbors. 
In 2016 she starred in Let's Be Evil and All Girls Weekend. She also played the starring role in I Spit on Your Grave: Deja Vu (2019). 
He was born at LeRoy, Illinois, and attended normal school at Normal, Illinois. He graduated from the University of Chicago, with an A. B. degree in 1901, and became principal of the Montevideo, Minnesota, high school before homesteading in Tripp County, South Dakota in 1912. He commenced farming and stock raising and served in the state senate of the South Dakota Legislature, being elected in 1918, 1920, 1922, and 1924. He was elected lieutenant governor in 1926. He died in Tripp County. 
Titao   is a department or commune of Loroum Province in north-western  Burkina Faso. Its capital is the town of Titao. 
His legacy is St Raphael's Church in Surbiton, London, which he financed and had built as a family chapel. Completed in 1848, only two years before his death, it was later opened to the public as a Roman Catholic church by his nephew, Edward. 
This article about a Member of the Parliament of the United Kingdom, for a constituency in Ireland between 1801 and 1922 is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a Conservative Member of the Parliament of the United Kingdom representing an English constituency is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Localsaver.com is an online marketplace for coupons and deals for businesses in a local area. The LocalSaver.com website is managed by SparkSMB which is owned by Sinclair Broadcasting Group. 
Localsaver.com sources much of its coupons from the local small businesses and other affiliate partners. 
Advertise with Local Saver for 100% free. Provide your business information for consumers to find and contact you, write your own coupons or choose from coupons that are recommended by Local Saver. On doing that, your coupons and business information will appear on Localsaver.com. 
Chippewas of Sarnia Band v Canada (AG),  2000 CanLII 16991, 51 OR (3d) 641; 195 DLR (4th) 135 was a decision of the Court of Appeal for Ontario concerning aboriginal title in Canada. 
First certified as a class proceeding by Adams J in 1996,[c] Campbell J, a motions judge of the Ontario Superior Court of Justice, ordered in April 1999 that: 
In a per curiam judgment, the Court allowed the appeals and cross-appeals by Canada, Ontario and the landowners and dismissed the appeal by the Chippewas. Consequently, paragraphs 1, 2, 5 and 6 of the motions judge's order were set aside, and the following was substituted: 
An application for leave to appeal was denied in November 2001. An application for reconsideration, following the publication of two critical law review articles,[e] was dismissed with costs in June 2002. 
Chippewas of Sarnia, together with Delgamuukw, are considered to form the legal framework for determining aboriginal title in those parts of Canada with unceded territory that has never been formally surrendered to the Crown (most prominently in British Columbia). Its approach with respect to dealing with the rights of private landowners involved was subsequently affirmed by the Supreme Court in R v Marshall.[f] 
Observers agreed that this case represented the first application of equity to land claims, but noted that the results were mixed. 
The Republic of Ireland possesses no active volcanoes. Volcanic activity in the country occurred primarily between 480-430 MYA, during the Ordovician geological age. 
The Euro Beach Soccer Cup (EBSC), originally known as the European Pro Beach Soccer Championships until 2004, is a biennial (previously annual) beach soccer competition contested between European men's national teams, organised by Beach Soccer Worldwide (BSWW). Having started in 1998, the tournament's prestige is held in being one of the very oldest and longest running beach soccer competitions in Europe and the world. 
Portugal are the most successful team and the current champions, having won the tournament for the seventh time in 2016 having failed to win since 2006. 
The cup is played as a straight knock-out tournament, other than in the 1998, 2008 and 2014 editions when a group stage was used first before a set of knock-out rounds. 
Note: Win in Common Time W = 3 Points / Win in Extra Time WE = 2 Points / Win in Penalty shoot-out WP = 1 Point / Lose L = 0 Points 
Chaminade's main campus, serving the undergraduate program and graduate program, is at the base of St. Louis Heights, a residential division of the Kaimuki district.  Chaminade is approximately two miles outside Waikiki and four miles from Downtown Honolulu. 
After receiving a large grant in 2003, the campus underwent extensive renovation and construction. This included the construction of the Sullivan Family Library, and the Dr. Lawrence K.W. and Mrs. BoHing Chan Tseu Center for Nursing Education. 
Chaminade's accelerated evening and online program (Adult Evening and Online Program) offers evening courses for nine degree programs at satellite locations on local military bases, community colleges and community centers. 
Chaminade's undergraduate program offers hands-on learning in a traditional classroom setting.  Notable programs in the day program include forensic sciences, criminology and criminal justice, biology/pre-medicine and nursing. 
The Nursing Program welcomed its first class of students at the start of the Fall 2010 semester.  The Nursing Program was approved by the Hawai'i State Board of Nursing in March 2010. Named the Sallie Y. Miyawaki School of Nursing, Chaminade's four-year program provides a contemporary curriculum characterized by sophisticated, simulated patient care experiences, informatics, genomics and cultural competency. 
The Adult Evening and Online Program (AEOP) offers accelerated courses for non-traditional students who wish to take classes in the evening and online.  Programs offered through AEOP include: Management, Criminology and Criminal Justice, Early Childhood Education, and Psychology. 
Chaminade offers six graduate degree programs: Master of Business Administration (MBA), Master of Education (MED), Master of Pastoral Theology (MPT), Master of Science in Criminal Justice Administration (MSCJA), Master of Science in Counseling Psychology (MSCP), and Master of Science in Forensic Sciences (MSFS). 
Chaminade University's Business program is among the top in the Pacific. They offer MBAs in management, accounting, not for profit and public sector. The school also houses the Hogan Entrepreneurial Program, which is the leading program for top business thinkers in the state of Hawaii. 
Chaminade University of Honolulu Montessori Teacher Education Program is accredited by Montessori Accreditation Council for Teacher Education (MACTE) and affiliated with American Montessori Society (AMS). 
Service learning is a hands-on learning component of many courses taught at Chaminade, offering students the opportunity to participate in community service activities for class credit.  Service-Learning opportunities are closely linked to the content being taught in the classroom and the overall learning objectives of the course.  The program is designed to enhance learning and offer support to the local community. 
Chaminade's student body is 66% Asian/Pacific Islander, 18% White, 6% Hispanic, 4% Black, 2% Non-Resident Alien, and 0.7% American Indian/Alaska Native.  Additionally, Chaminade University is a Native Hawaiian Serving Institution, offering a Native Hawaiian emphasis of study in the Behavioral Studies Program, Native Hawaiian culture resources, and scholarships for students of Native Hawaiian ancestry. 
Chaminade students have the opportunity to participate in a variety of clubs and organizations, with over 30 clubs represented on campus.  Clubs include student government, clubs for specific majors, and a variety of cultural clubs.  Each year, members of the Samoan, Hawaiian, Micronesian, Tahitian, and Marianas clubs participate in the Pacific Island Review, an event showcasing the traditional ethnic dances of the Pacific Islands. 
This biographical article related to association football in the Netherlands, about a defender, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Florian Stritzel (born 31 January 1994) is a German professional footballer who plays as a goalkeeper for SV Wehen Wiesbaden. 
This biographical article related to association football in Germany, about a goalkeeper, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
The representation passed the Law on the election of national representatives in the Constitutional Assembly on September 3, 1920. The representation existed until the elections of November 28, 1920. 
This article about transportation in West Virginia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Roger D. Launius (born May 15, 1954) is an American historian and author of Lithuanian descent, a former chief historian of NASA. He retired in 2016 as Associate Director for Collections and Curatorial Affairs for the Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum in Washington, D.C.. Launius is a consulting historian in air and space history. He has written many books on space flight, and also published on the history of the Latter Day Saint movement. 
Launius was born in Galesburg, Illinois, and was raised in Greenville, South Carolina. He graduated from Graceland College in 1976 and received a PhD in history in 1982 from Louisiana State University. 
Launius contributed space policy analysis in the wake of the Columbia Accident Investigation Board 2003 report.  He has been a regular commentator on space-related issues for the news media. 
Launius has published on the history of the Latter Day Saint movement. He won both the David Woolley Evans and Beatrice Evans Biography Award (1989) and the John Whitmer Historical Association Best Book Award for his work on Mormon history, Joseph Smith III: Pragmatic Prophet. 
Launius studies the history of baseball in the United States, and published Charlie Finley: The Outrageous Story of Baseball's Super Showman with G. Michael Green. 
Launius is a fellow of the American Association for the Advancement of Science (2007), the American Astronomical Society (2001), and the International Academy of Astronautics (2007). He is an Associate Fellow of the American Institute for Aeronautics and Astronautics (2008). 
This biographical article relating to Brazilian athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
 Herbert William Looker (2 December 1871 - 13 December 1951) was the Conservative MP for the South East Essex constituency from 1924 to 1929. 
On 6 October 1921 he was selected to fight the Hull Central constituency by the Central Hull Conservative Council. The following year he was defeated by the incumbent Labour MP Joseph Kenworthy by 15,374 votes to 12,347 in the 1922 General Election. 
Two years later, on 12 March 1924 Looker was unanimously selected to be the Conservative Candidate for South East Essex. The general election was held later that year and this time Looker defeated the incumbent Labour MP Philip Hoffman by 19,731 votes to 13,820. While an MP he was a regular contributor to parliamentary debates. 
Some time after his election defeat he moved to Forest Row, Sussex. Here, in April 1933, he was elected to the Withyham Division of East Sussex County Council. He remained there until his death on 13 December 1951. 
Kareem Abdul-Jabbar scored 36 points, but more importantly, he took more of a role in running the Bucks' offense from the post, given their backcourt issues. His passing enabled Bob Dandridge to score 24 points. 
On the defensive end, Abdul-Jabbar forced Dave Cowens into shooting 8-of-22 from the floor, including a block of a Cowens shot at the end of regulation to force overtime. The Bucks won 105-96 to even the series at a game apiece as it headed to Boston. 
This game, played on April 30, was the last NBA Championship Series game played in the month of April to date. 
With Ron Williams unable to handle the Celtics' press and shooting guard Jon McGlocklin nursing a sprained ankle, Bucks coach Larry Costello turned to little-used forward Mickey Davis for help in the backcourt. Davis at 6'7" presented matchup problems on offense for Jo Jo White, forcing Celtics coach Tom Heinsohn to assign Don Chaney to guard him. This enabled Oscar Robertson to more effectively set up the Bucks' offense. 
This was the Bucks' last appearance in the NBA Finals until 2021, winning their 2nd title and the first in 50 years. The Celtics returned to the finals two years later, winning their 13th title. 
This was the first of 17 consecutive NBA Finals to be televised by CBS. It was the only NBA Finals called by Pat Summerall, best known for his work on the Masters Tournament and the National Football League. His partners on color commentary were Rick Barry and Hot Rod Hundley. 
Bobby Schayer (born December 23, 1966 in Los Angeles, California) was the drummer for Bad Religion from 1991 to 2001. He was a resident of Encino, a suburb in the San Fernando Valley.  He started drumming in 1976 at the age of 10, but it was not until 1980 that he became a student of original Circle Jerks drummer Lucky Lehrer. 
For over ten years from 2001 to 2011, Schayer was the drum tech for Sam Fogarino of the band  Interpol. 
This article about a church building or other Christian place of worship in Malta is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Charles Gauci (born 1952) is an Australian priest who was appointed Bishop of the Roman Catholic Diocese of Darwin on 27 June 2018. He had been a priest in the Archdiocese of Adelaide since his ordination in 1977. His immediate previous post was as administrator of St Francis Xavier's Cathedral in Adelaide. He was consecrated bishop at St Mary's Star of the Sea Cathedral, Darwin on 26 September 2018. 
Gauci was born in Malta and moved with his family to Australia when he was 13 years old. He was ordained in 1977 and served in several parishes in the Archdiocese of Adelaide, including the Southern Deanery with Kangaroo Island from 2012 to 2017. 
This article about a Catholic bishop or archbishop from Australia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Several naval ships of Germany were named Hessen after the state of Hesse, Germany (German: Hessen): 
This article about an extraterrestrial geological feature is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Figure 1 is a Toronto, Ontario-based online social networking service for healthcare professionals to post and comment on medical images. 
Figure 1 was founded in Toronto by Dr. Joshua Landy, Richard Penner and Gregory Levey. The platform launched in North America in May 2013 and is now available in more than 100 countries. 
The privately held company reports more than 1 million healthcare professionals use its app and website. 
In 2013, Figure 1 launched with $2 million (CDN) in seed money, with Rho Canada Ventures and Version One Ventures led the investment. 
In 2015, the company added $5 million (USD) to its Series A financing round, which was led by Union Square Ventures, an early investor in Twitter, Tumblr, Etsy, and Kickstarter. 
The app's founder said the "very colorful images" are what medics see every day. "It's a transparent view into a world you rarely get to see," he told the BBC. 
When the company launched in Europe in 2014, privacy concerns were raised over the sharing of personal medical information. The app has a built-in consent form which every patient signs via a smartphone, as well as tools make it easy to anonymize an image. 
Before the company launched in 2013, it claimed that 13 percent of medical professionals were already using their smartphones to share images with one another via email or text message. 
The topic of Ruhe-Tawhid, Nafye Obudiate GheireKhoda is also the name of a chapter in the book Tarhe-Kolie Andishe-Islami in Quran (i.e. General plan of Islamic thoughts in the Quran); and its contents are the matters of that chapter but in a vaster volume. Seyyed Ali Khamenei has utilized 78 Tawhidi-related verses of the Quran in the mentioned article. 
The Holland Downtown Historic District is a commercial historic district located along Eighth Street from just east of College Avenue to River Avenue, and along and River Avenue from Ninth Street to just north of Eighth Street in Holland, Michigan. The district was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1990. 
Holland's population grew immensely in the later part of the 19th century, increasing from 2400 in 1871 to 7790 by 1900. Railroads and shipping infrastructure was built, and the industrial base of the city grew, and the commercial area followed suit. Beginning in the 1880s and continuing through the 1920s, a building boom resulted in the former wooden buildings in downtown being replaced with brick structures. 
The oldest buildings in the district are Italianate in design, with the buildings at 24 East and 36 West Eight Street being the only examples. Other buildings span Late Victorian architectural styles, and include Renaissance Revival and Richardsonian Romanesque structures. Some of the significant structures in the district include: 
Pearl farming takes place mainly in the southeastern region of the country, in an area stretching from Comilla District to the coastal Cox's Bazar District. The port city of Chittagong is a historic center of the pearl trade. Bengali river gypsies, people who live in houseboats, are traditionally engaged in pearl farming. 
Bangladeshi pearl production is small compared to other major producers. The domestic jewelry industry is focused on gold and silver. 
Hoya wayetii is a species of flowering plant in the genus Hoya native to the Philippines. Sometimes confused with Hoya kentiana or Hoya shepherdii, it has long, slender foliage that often has a red margin when exposed to sufficient sun. Like many others in its genus, it has a vining growth habit.  
He married Maria D. White, of Danbury, in October, 1844. Four of their children survived him and all of his sons also became lawyers. 
Averill's wife Maria died in February 1860. In September 1861, he married Mary A. Perry, of Southport, who survived him. 
After the time as lieutenant governor, Averill was one of the organizers of the American Bar Association, and was for many years acting chairman of the bar of his home county. 
He was born at Mayfield, Sussex, eldest son of Thomas Jenner of that place, and Dorothy, his wife, daughter of Jeffrey Glyde of Dallington. He was educated at Tunbridge grammar school, under Nicholas Grey. In 1665 he became a pensioner of Queens' College, Cambridge, but left without taking a degree. He entered the Inner Temple in 1658, and was called to the bar in 1663, after which he practised chiefly in the court of exchequer. 
In October 1687 Jenner was appointed one of the three royal commissioners to inquire into the appointment of a president of Magdalen College, Oxford; the other commissioners were Robert Wright and Thomas Cartwright. Jenner's diary of the proceedings survived in the library of Magdalen College. Cartwright sought to have him dismissed from the commission, finding him too moderate if outwardly overbearing to the fellows, and in the end Jenner voted against the expulsions. 
Expelled from the bench by William III's government, Jenner resumed his practice at the bar. He died at his house at Petersham on 1 January 1707, and was buried in St Peters Church, Petersham, with a tablet to his memory, with his arms, and an inscription composed by his daughter Margaret, Lady Darnell. 
On 1 January 1661 he married, at the church of St. Mary Woolchurch Haw, in the City of London, Anne, daughter and heiress of James Poe of Swinden Hall, Kirkby Overblow, Yorkshire, by whom he had eight sons and two daughters. 
Inishowen West (Irish: Inis Eoghain Thiar), also called West Inishowen or Innishowen West, is a barony in County Donegal, Republic of Ireland. Baronies were mainly cadastral rather than administrative units. They acquired modest local taxation and spending functions in the 19th century before being superseded by the Local Government (Ireland) Act 1898. 
Between the 9th and 13th centuries Inishowen was divided into three sectors, Aileach, Bredach and Cairrge Brachaidhe (Carraickabraghy) in the west. O'Mulhall (Mulfaal) and O'Hogain are cited as chiefs of Carrichbrack (Carrickbraghy). Inishowen was originally a single barony but was divided by 1851 into East and West. 
This type of scanner is sometimes called a reflective scanner because it works by shining white light onto the object to be scanned and reading the intensity and color of light that is reflected from it, usually a line at a time. They are designed for scanning prints or other flat, opaque materials but some have available transparency adapters, which for a number of reasons, in most cases, are not very well suited to scanning film. 
"A flatbed scanner is usually composed of a glass pane (or platen), under which there is a bright light (often xenon, LED or cold cathode fluorescent) which illuminates the pane, and a moving optical array in CCD scanning. CCD-type scanners typically contain three rows (arrays) of sensors with red, green, and blue filters." 
Hand scanners are moved over the subject to be imaged by hand. There are two different types: document and 3D scanners. 
Inexpensive portable battery-powered "glide-over" hand scanners, typically capable of scanning an area as wide as a normal letter and much longer remain available as of 2014[update]. 
Handheld 3D scanners are used in industrial design, reverse engineering, inspection and analysis, digital manufacturing and medical applications. "To compensate for the uneven motion of the human hand, most 3D scanning systems rely on the placement of reference markers, typically adhesive reflective tabs that the scanner uses to align elements and mark positions in space." 
Image scanners are usually used in conjunction with a computer which controls the scanner and stores scans. Small portable scanners, either roller-fed or "glide-over" hand-operated, operated by batteries and with storage capability, are available for use away from a computer; stored scans can be transferred later. Many can scan both small documents such as business cards and till receipts, and letter-sized documents. 
A document scanner embedded inside a computer keyboard makes it available when needed yet taking no extra space since it is built inside the computer keyboard. 
Color scanners typically read RGB (red-green-blue color) data from the array. This data is then processed with some proprietary algorithm to correct for different exposure conditions, and sent to the computer via the device's input/output interface (usually USB, previous to which was SCSI or bidirectional parallel port in older units). 
Color depth varies depending on the scanning array characteristics, but is usually at least 24 bits. High quality models have 36-48 bits of color depth. 
Manufacturers often claim interpolated resolutions as high as 19,200 ppi; but such numbers carry little meaningful value, because the number of possible interpolated pixels is unlimited and doing so does not increase the level of captured detail. 
Purity can be diminished by scanner noise, optical flare, poor analog to digital conversion, scratches, dust, Newton's rings, out of focus sensors, improper scanner operation, and poor software. Drum scanners are said to produce the purest digital representations of the film, followed by high end film scanners that use the larger Kodak Tri-Linear sensors. 
By combining full-color imagery with 3D models, modern hand-held scanners are able to completely reproduce objects electronically. The addition of 3D color printers enables accurate miniaturization of these objects, with applications across many industries and professions. 
For scanner apps, the scan quality is highly dependent on the quality of the phone camera and on the framing chosen by the user of the app. 
Scans must virtually always be transferred from the scanner to a computer or information storage system for further processing or storage. There are two basic issues: (1) how the scanner is physically connected to the computer and (2) how the application retrieves the information from the scanner. 
The file size of a scan can be up to  about 100 megabytes for a 600 DPI 23 x 28 cm (9"x11") (slightly larger than A4 paper) uncompressed 24-bit image. Scanned files must be transferred and stored. Scanners can generate this volume of data in a matter of seconds, making a fast connection desirable. 
Scanners communicate to their host computer using one of the following physical interfaces, listing roughly from slow to fast: 
During the early 1990s professional flatbed scanners were available over a local computer network. This proved useful to publishers, print shops, etc. This functionality largely fell out of use as the cost of flatbed scanners reduced enough to make sharing unnecessary. 
From 2000 all-in-one multi-purpose devices became available which were suitable for both small offices and consumers, with printing, scanning, copying, and fax capability in a single apparatus which can be made available to all members of a workgroup. 
Battery-powered portable scanners store scans on internal memory; they can later be transferred to a computer either by direct connection, typically USB, or in some cases a memory card may be removed from the scanner and plugged into the computer. 
In practice, there are often problems with an application communicating with a scanner. Either the application or the scanner manufacturer (or both) may have faults in their implementation of the API. 
SANE (Scanner Access Now Easy) is a free/open-source API for accessing scanners. Originally developed for Unix and Linux operating systems, it has been ported to OS/2, Mac OS X, and Microsoft Windows. Unlike TWAIN, SANE does not handle the user interface. This allows batch scans and transparent network access without any special support from the device driver. 
TWAIN is used by most scanners. Originally used for low-end and home-use equipment, it is now widely used for large-volume scanning. 
ISIS (Image and Scanner Interface Specification) created by Pixel Translations, which still uses SCSI-II for performance reasons, is used by large, departmental-scale, machines. 
Although no software beyond a scanning utility is a feature of any scanner, many scanners come bundled with software. Typically, in addition to the scanning utility, some type of image-editing application (such as Adobe Photoshop), and optical character recognition (OCR) software are supplied. OCR software converts graphical images of text into standard text that can be edited using common word-processing and text-editing software; accuracy is rarely perfect. 
Document imaging requirements differ from those of image scanning. These requirements include scanning speed, automated paper feed, and the ability to automatically scan both the front and the back of a document. On the other hand, image scanning typically requires the ability to handle fragile and or three dimensional objects as well as scan at a much higher resolution. 
The resolution used is usually from 150 to 300 dpi, although the hardware may be capable of 600 or higher resolution; this produces images of text good enough to read and for optical character recognition (OCR), without the higher demands on storage space required by higher-resolution images. 
A specialized form of document scanning is book scanning. Technical difficulties arise from the books usually being bound and sometimes fragile and irreplaceable, but some manufacturers have developed specialized machinery to deal with this. Often special robotic mechanisms are used to automate the page turning and scanning process. 
Whilst scanning with document cameras may have a quick reaction time, large amounts of batch scanning of even, unstapled documents is more efficient with an ADF scanner. There are challenges which face this kind of technology regarding external factors (such as lighting) which may have influence on the scan results. The way in which these issues are resolved strongly depends on the sophistication of the product and how it deals with these issues. 
Scanner manufacturers usually have their own name attached to this technique. For example, Epson, Minolta, Nikon, Konica Minolta, Microtek, and others use Digital ICE, while Canon uses its own system FARE (Film Automatic Retouching and Enhancement system). Plustek uses LaserSoft Imaging iSRD.  Some independent software developers design infrared cleaning tools. 
Blue Bird is the debut mini album of Shouta Aoi and the first album release under his new stage name from when he entered voice acting. The album was released under Broccoli's music label, B-green, on June 26, 2013. 
Aoi selected the name Blue Bird for his album, which was meant to picture "flying" and "sending feelings" over to his fans and people who supported him over the years. He opted for a "simple" and "elegant" shot for the album's cover, which features him against a black background with lighting against him. The image itself was meant as a direct contrast to Aoi's typically "soft" image. 
Aoi worked with Elements Garden while recording the album's title track, "Blue Bird", mentioning that it was difficult for him to record. "Blue Bird" was the image of a "bluebird of happiness" and was a song meant for the fans who supported him. The lyrics for the album's tracks took longer than the song's composition. 
The album compiles songs he worked on for Broccoli's drama CD series, as well as some original songs. "Ai no Sasameki Goto" was the theme song for the drama CD series Sangokushi Lovers and was the first song he released as Shouta Aoi. "Gekka no Hana" was the theme song for the drama CD series Ikemen Ooku. 
Debrene is a village in the municipality of Dobrichka, in Dobrich Province, in northeastern Bulgaria. 
It was founded as O'More School of Interior Architecture and Design in 1970 in the historic district of Franklin. It awarded the Bachelor of Fine Arts degree in Fashion Design, Fashion Merchandising, Graphic Design, and Interior Design.  It had an enrollment of about 200 students and was accredited by the Accrediting Commission of Career Schools and Colleges. 
This biographical article relating to Belarusian association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Grace Road Barracks was a TAVR Centre formerly based in Grace Road in Walton, Liverpool. The barracks were used by the Royal Signals and Parachute Regiment after WW2. Those serving after this time were defending the United Kingdom during the 'Cold War'. 
Artpace is a non-profit contemporary art gallery located in San Antonio, Texas, United States, founded by Linda Pace. Artpace opened its doors in 1995, and focuses on the artistic process. Occupying the space of a former Hudson automobile dealership, Artpace uses its industrial space as the setting for its programs and events. 
Artpace is known for their International Artist-in-Residence program, which involves bringing one artist from Texas, one from the United States, and one from around the world, to Artpace to create an original work of art. The International Artist-in-Residence artists are chosen by a guest curator and the program invites nine artists per year to live and work at Artpace in three different four month cycles. 
Artpace's education programs expose the youth of San Antonio to think critically about art. The education department at Artpace has K-12 Programs, Community Programs, U of Artpace (University Programs), and Adult Programs. 
Chalk It Up is an annual citywide family-friendly event that promotes the importance of art education. Each year, Houston Street in downtown San Antonio is filled with chalk drawings, music, and original murals by artists in San Antonio. The event facilitates interactions between the community and contemporary artists. 
Randy B. Crites (born 1962) is a navigator, operations officer and vice admiral in the United States Navy, serving as deputy chief of naval operations for integration of capabilities and resources since May 15, 2020. He previously served as the deputy assistant secretary of the navy for budget, and was subsequently appointed as director of the fiscal management division in Washington, D.C. until he was promoted to the rank of vice admiral in 2020. 
Before he was appointed to the position of Deputy Chief of Naval Operations (DCNO) for Integration of Capabilities and Resources (OPNAV N8), Crites served as Commander of Submarine Group, director of Maritime Headquarters in the Pacific Fleet, the director of Assessments Division (OPNAV N81), and most recently served simultaneously as deputy assistant Secretary of the Navy for Budget (FMB) and director, Fiscal Management Division, (OPNAV N82). 
CSU Suceava, also known as Universitatea Suceava, is a men's handball club from Suceava, Romania, that plays in the Romanian Handball League. 
Kleber was born June 19, 1934, in Pittsburgh. Both of his parents were eastern-European Jewish immigrants. His father, Max Kleber, was a trained pharmacist who made his career in his family-owned luggage manufacturing business. His mother, Dorothea (Schulman) Kleber, was active in fund raising for Israel. 
In 1968, he founded the Drug Dependence Unit at Yale University, where he was a professor of psychiatry; he headed the Unit until 1989. He then served for two and a half years as the Deputy Director for Demand Reduction at the Office of National Drug Control Policy in the White House. 
A 2014 article in Vice said that Kleber served as a paid consultant to the opioid pharmaceutical industry. 
Kleber was author or co-author of more than 250 papers, and the co-editor of the American Psychiatric Press Textbook of Substance Abuse Treatment, now in its fourth edition. He received numerous prestigious awards and two honorary degrees. 
He was elected in 1996 as a member of the Institute of Medicine of the National Academy of Sciences. He was on the boards of a number of organizations, including the Partnership for a Drug-Free America, the Treatment Research Institute at the University of Pennsylvania, and the Betty Ford Center. 
Kleber married Joan Fox, his high school sweetheart, in 1956.  They raised three children together and later divorced. Kleber then married drug addiction researcher Marian Fischman, who died in 2001. He was married to photographer Anne Burlock Lawver from 2004 until his death from heart failure on October 5, 2018, while vacationing with his family in Greece. 
On October 1, 2019, Google honored Kleber by celebrating the 23rd anniversary of his election to the National Academy of Medicine with a Google Doodle. 
Coonardoo: The Well in the Shadow is a novel written by the Australian author Katharine Susannah Prichard. The novel evocatively depicts the Australian landscape as it was in the late 1920s, in an age when white settlers tried to control more and more of the bare plains of northwest Australia. 
Originally submitted to The Bulletin novel competition in 1928 under the pseudonym Ashburton Jim, this novel was joint winner.  It shared the award with A House is Built by M. Barnard Eldershaw. 
The novel relates the story of an Aboriginal woman who was prepared since her childhood to be Wytaliba station's housekeeper, but falls in love and has a romance with her owner Hugh Watt, a white man. 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
This article relating to moths in subfamily Gracillariinae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to women's association football in England is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Embelia is a genus of climbing shrubs once placed in the family Myrsinaceae, which is now included in the Primulaceae. There are about 130 species which occur in tropical and subtropical areas across a wide range including Africa and Madagascar and from eastern Asia to the Pacific Islands as well as Australia including: 
Amorbaea subtusvena is a moth in the family Xyloryctidae. It was described by Alexey Diakonoff in 1968. It is found on Luzon in the Philippines. 
Being Jewish, he concentrated on the Old Testament. In 1897 he became professor of Biblical exegesis in the Hebrew Union College of Cincinnati, Ohio. His works include The Hebrew Elias-Apocalypse, in German (1897);  An Outline of Neo-Hebraic Apocalyptic Literature (1901);  The Prophets of Israel (1914);  The Book of Job (1922);  and numerous articles in learned publications. 
This biography of a United States religious figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article about a German religious figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article about a person notable in connection with Judaism is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In the summer of 1870 the young artist Ilya Repin, then 25 and early in what would become a renowned career, came to the Volga to gather inspiration for paintings of the lives of the river boatmen and burlaks. This sojourn resulted in his painting of the iconic Barge Haulers on the Volga and other work. With Repin came twenty-year-old landscapist Fyodor Vasilyev, Repin's academy classmate Yevgeny Makarov, and Repin's younger brother Basil. 
The petite bourgeoisie woman Anna Akhmatova Buyanova (nicknamed "Battle-Axe") operated a coaching inn at a house on Posad Street (latter Cooperative 117) in Stavropol-on-Volga (the name of Tolyatti at that time). Repin and his companions lived there for two weeks. 
Here it is. The courtyard, with a porch, was divided by gate, the gate is wide open and it shan't be shut... On a nearby porch a mustachioed fellow is being treated by his subjects like a big shot..."
In 1947, some Stavropolians made a corner of the house into a memorial to Repin, with a portrait of the artist and prints of his works. In 1955, as part of the transfer of the city to its new location (the existing city was to be submerged when the Kuybyshev Reservoir was filled), the government had originally intended to move the house to the city center, but later it was decided to place it more on the outskirts. The street in which it was placed is named Repin Street. 
However, the appearance of the building has changed since Repin's day: originally a log house with a rustic plank roof, in the mid-20th-century it was trimmed with wood siding and iron window gratings and roofed with corrugated iron. 
The 2012 Toronto FC season was the sixth season in Toronto FC's existence. The club missed the playoffs for the sixth consecutive season, having never made a post-season appearance. Their season began on March 7 with the quarterfinal of the Champions League against the Los Angeles Galaxy.  They ultimately reached the semi-finals of the tournament where they lost to Mexican side Santos Laguna. 
On September 27, Toronto FC stated on their Facebook page that, "waiving ticketing fees" for the remaining home games between 10 a.m. on the morning of September 27 and 10 a.m. on September 29. Many season-ticket holders were angry over the discount. Paul Beirne, senior director of business operations, stated "it's the cumulative effect of a really difficult season." 
On October 6 against D.C. United, some people in the supporters section wore paper bags over their heads. 
Last updated: September 1, 2012 Source: 2012 Major League Soccer season Pld = Matches played; Pts = Points; W = Matches won;  D = Matches drawn;  L = Matches lost; GF = Goals for; GA = Goals against; GD = Goal difference 
Includes all competitive matches. The list is sorted by shirt number when total clean sheets are equal. 
Toronto is in the No. 4 position in the MLS Allocation Ranking. The allocation ranking is the mechanism used to determine which MLS club has first priority to acquire a U.S. National Team player who signs with MLS after playing abroad, or a former MLS player who returns to the league after having gone to a club abroad for a transfer fee. A ranking can be traded, provided that part of the compensation received in return is another club's ranking. 
It is believed that Toronto FC has 10 MLS International Roster Slots. Each club in Major League Soccer is allocated 8 international roster spots, which can be traded. Toronto FC acquired one slot from San Jose Earthquakes on July 14, 2011. TFC has use of this spot through the end of the 2012 season, at which point it reverts to San Jose. Earlier, Toronto FC had acquired an additional spot from San Jose on July 14, 2008 for use through the end of the 2013 season. 
 The 2010 season was Samut Songkhram's 3rd season in the top division of Thai football. This article shows statistics of the club's players in the season, and also lists all matches that the club played in the season. 
As of January 18, 2010  Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Radeem Haslam (born 8 March 1991), better known by his professional name Bena Di Senior or, in shorthand, as Di Senior, is a Jamaican record producer & entrepreneur based in Kingston, Jamaica. Bena is one of the most multi-talented Producer, Composer & Engineer in the music industry today. Whether making beats or recording, Bena has been hailed for his brilliance so far in creating some of the most authentic productions throughout the years. 
Bena has said in radio interviews & online blogs that he admires songwriters such as Stevie Wonder for his instrumentation.  He also stated that he draws inspiration from producers such as Di Genius, Timbaland, Young Chop, Mike Will, Lex Lugar and The Neptunes for their instantly recognisable production styles. 
Equipment-wise, Bena stated that he started out producing with a single drum machine MPC, but has since moved on to multiple MPCs, keyboards, and a variety of audio editing programs, including Pro Tools, Reason and Fruity Loops. 
Cj King Entertainment has features the young dancehall Producer out of Jamaica "Bena" on their website for 2 consecutive weeks because of his different production style in his riddim." In the year 2011 young dancehall icon Bena Di Senior has launched his official website which was designed by himself. Bena Production has also create hit music that went No. 1 on YarkLink254. Bena Producer compose buzzing single in Jamaica, Badness Inna We Longtime. 
On 12 April 2014, Bena released the long anticipated "Bad Dawgs Riddim" produced by himself. Signature for its hard hitting synth laden juggling with an exciting artist line-up featuring Denno, Ding Dong (reggae musician), Kalado, Strent and Versatile. 
Year 2017 was so far one of the most successful years for the producer himself where doing business as usual. The introduction of Stylez By Di Senior the dancehall producer's clothing and accessories one stop store. 
Bena Di Senior has listed a number of dancehall and rap artist that he has worked with from the start of his career via his Facebook page. 
The HDP Music Awards were established in 2012 by DJ Frass Vybz to celebrate dancehall performers, producers and music video directors. 
In various interviews & blog posts, Bena (Producer) has named a number of musical influences on his own production work. 
Air Marshal Peter William David Ruddock, CB, CBE (born 5 February 1954) is a former senior commander in the Royal Air Force who served as Air Secretary from 2004 to 2006. 
Ruddock joined the Royal Air Force in 1974. He was appointed Officer Commanding the Operations Wing at RAF Coningsby in 1993, assistant director of the Defence Intelligence Staff in 1996, Station Commander at RAF Coningsby in 1999 and then Air Commodore Defensive Operations at Headquarters No. 1 Group in 2000. He became Director of Staff Duties in 2002 and Air Secretary in 2004 before moving on to be Director-General of the Saudi Arabia Armed Forces Project in 2006. 
As little is known about the meaning of the design elements of the ships cloth we have to conjecture from ethnographic parallels. 
These cloths have not been woven in a century and few exemplars can be found today. It is estimated that there are only 100 to 150 palepai of all kinds still in existence.[full citation needed] 
He was consecrated as bishop by Chaldean Patriarch Yousef VI Emmanuel II Thomas on August 15, 1910. He became the principal consecrator of French Archbishop Antonin Drapier of the Latin Rite, who was the Apostolic Delegate to French Indochina. The Chaldean lineage therefore includes few members of the Latin Rite episcopate in Vietnam. 
Clemens Brummer (born 19 April 1986) is a German former figure skater. He is the 2008 German national champion and placed 14th at the 2008 European Championships. 
Under Eriksson with England, Vassell scored six goals from 22 international caps awarded between 2002 and 2004, including appearances at the 2002 FIFA World Cup in South Korea/Japan, and UEFA Euro 2004 in Portugal. 
Vassell was born in Birmingham, West Midlands. He was raised in the Gravelly Hill area of Birmingham and went to the Yenton Primary School in Erdington and John Willmott School, in Falcon Lodge, Sutton Coldfield. He first played football with local junior team Romulus in the Birmingham Boys League scoring a record of 46 in a season and 6 in 1 match.[citation needed] Following this he signed for the Aston Villa youth team. 
On 29 October 2011 he suffered a serious knee injury in a game against West Ham United which ruled him out for the rest of the season. The injury was a ruptured anterior cruciate ligament. Vassell left the club on 30 June after not being offered a new contract. 
Vassell missed in the penalty shoot-out in the quarter-finals of Euro 2004 against hosts Portugal. Coming on for the injured Wayne Rooney early on in the game, he missed England's last spot-kick in the penalty shoot-out, allowing Portugal goalkeeper Ricardo to knock England out of the tournament by scoring the final penalty. Vassell did not play for England again. 
Carteret Health Care (formerly Carteret General Hospital) is a 135-bed, non-profit hospital in Morehead City, North Carolina. Carteret General was founded in 1967. 
Most general medical patients are admitted through the emergency department (ED) by the "Hospitalist" Physicians group.  The doctors are in the hospital 24 hours per day and 7 days per week. They work 12-hour shifts to ensure continuity of care but also aim to prevent excessive physician fatigue. Patients who have experienced admission through the hospitalist group generally give the idea rave reviews. 
A remote control InTouch Health RP-7 robot named Riley was purchased in 2011. It allows staff members and patients almost immediate access to stroke experts at Wake Forest University Baptist Medical Center. The robot has two-way live video chat capabilities which allows physicians to remotely diagnose strokes and quickly develop care plans. 
Josef was the oldest son of Josef. He became a newspaper publisher and editor and was a commercial economist for the Bureau of Foreign and Domestic Commerce. He ran a campaign as a Socialist for Congress from Chicago. 
Harlan's Holiday was a bay horse bred by Double D Farm Corp. He was originally sent into training with Kenneth McPeek. He was sired by the Vosburgh Stakes winner Harlan, whose other progeny have included the Haskell Invitational Stakes winner Menifee. 
As a two-year-old, Harlan's Holiday won the Cradle Stakes at River Downs Racetrack and finished second to Siphonic in the Breeders' Futurity Stakes at Keeneland in October. His most significant performance of 2001 came on 4 November at Churchill Downs when he contested the one-mile Iroquois Stakes. Ridden by A. J. d'Amico, he won the Grade III event by two and three quarter lengths from Request for Parole. 
In 2002, Harlan' Holiday established himself as a leading contender for the Triple Crown races. After narrowly losing to Booklet in the Fountain of Youth Stakes, he won the Florida Derby by three and a half lengths and the Blue Grass Stakes by four and a half lengths. 
Harlan's Holiday went into the 2002 Kentucky Derby as the betting favorite but finished seventh to winner War Emblem.  He then finished fourth to War Emblem in the Preakness Stakes.  In early June, 2002, Harlan's Holiday's trainer was changed to Todd Pletcher. 
In the autumn, he won the Pennsylvania Derby at Parx and finished third to Evening Attire in the Jockey Club Gold Cup before finishing unplaced in the Breeders' Cup Classic. 
Harlan's Holiday began his four-year-old season by winning a nine-furlong allowance race at Gulfstream Park on February 2. He then won the Grade I Donn Handicap over the same course and distance three weeks later, beating Hero's Tribute by two and a half lengths. He was then sent to Nad Al Sheba Racecourse for the Dubai World Cup, in which he lost by five lengths to Moon Ballad. 
Harlan's Holiday was the Champion juvenile sire of 2012, a year in which he established a North American record for 2-year-old earnings of $2,954,556. 
Among Harlan's Holiday's  progeny are Shanghai Bobby, the 2012 American Champion Two-Year-Old Colt; Denis of Cork, in 2008 a second-place finisher in the Belmont Stakes and third-place finisher in the Preakness Stakes; and Willcox Inn, winner of the 2011 American Derby, Hawthorne Derby, and Arlington Classic. 
In late 2010, WinStar Farm became a part-owner of Harlan's Holiday, and he was moved to their breeding operation near Versailles, Kentucky. 
On November 1, 2013, Harlan's Holiday suddenly collapsed after returning to his stall, having lost use of his hind end. His intestine prolapsed from his rectum, and he went into shock. After multiple attempts to repair the prolapse, the horse was euthanized. 
Consequently, the use of the building was intentionally ignored - not fought against. Eisenman grudgingly permitted a handful of compromises, such as a bathroom, but the staircase lacks a handrail, there is a column abutting the kitchen table, and a glass strip originally divided the bedroom, preventing the installation of a double bed. 
It was formed under the Local Government Act 1894 based on the Guiltcross rural sanitary district. It lay in the southern part of the county between Thetford and Diss and took its name from the ancient Guiltcross hundred. 
In 1902, Guiltcross RD was abolished and its territory divided between Thetford, Wayland and Depwade RDs. 
Lyropteryx is a genus of butterflies of the family Riodinidae. Species of this genus are widespread in the tropical areas of the South America. 
Forewings are large, subtriangular, while the hindwings are relatively small. In most of species of this genus, the upper surface of the wings is black, with numerous longitudinal streaks of metallic blue-green colours on the outer half. The undersides are black, with the basal half spotted with purple pink and the outer half with black and white stripes. 
Messe Torhaus is a high rise building in the Bockenheim district of Frankfurt, Germany. It was designed by Oswald Mathias Ungers. 
Built by Hochtief, 400 workers constructed the 60,000 ton building in a record time of 13 months from 1983 to 1984. Its unusual shape and use of materials resembles a guillotine. The building houses the administration of Messe Frankfurt as well as services like a kindergarten and the press centre. 
In the immediate vicinity is located on the fairgrounds of Messe Frankfurt, the CHP Mainova AG, which serves as a gate house chimney. Therefore, the building is also known as "Frankfurt's most beautiful fireplace". 
Francisco Checa (born 4 February 1940, in Panama City) is a Panamanian former basketball player who competed in the 1968 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to a Panamanian basketball figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
She was born in Kristiania (now Oslo), Norway. She was the daughter of Sigge Pantzerhielm Thomas (1886-1944) and Signe Dorothea Undset (1887-1973).  Her father was a classical philologist and lecturer at the University of Oslo. She completed a  master's degree in archaeology in 1946 at the University of Oslo, writing her thesis on Viking costume and jewellery. She was subsequently hired as a curator at the University as the museum's first permanently employed female member of scientific staff. 
Castle Communications, also known as Castle Music, was a British independent record label and British home video distributor founded in 1983 by Terry Shand, Cliff Dane, and Jon Beecher. Its video imprint was called Castle Vision.  The label's production ceased in 2007, and its remaining rights are now chiefly vested in BMG Rights Management. Castle also operated a subsidiary label, Essential Records. 
Castle Communications was acquired by American music distributor Alliance Entertainment (which at the time owned Concord Records and NCircle Entertainment) in 1994 and then by Sanctuary Records Group in 2000. The label was dissolved when Sanctuary became a Universal Music Group subsidiary in 2007. Since 2013 Sanctuary has been owned by BMG Rights Management, with global distribution handled by Warner Music Group. 
Starting out as a mid-price catalogue reissue specialist, with labels including The Collector Series and Dojo, it grew into the largest European owner of repertoire outside the major record companies. It purchased catalogues including Pye, Piccadilly, Bradley's, Bronze, Black Sabbath, Sugar Hill, Transatlantic, Beserkley, All Platinum and Solar. They possessed most of the Transatlantic and Trailer catalogue. 
Starting in the early 1980s, they released compilations and reissued work by Fairport Convention, John Renbourn, Barbara Dickson, Steeleye Span, the Watersons, Richard Thompson, Geoff Turton and many others. They also diversified to reissue several early albums by the Fall as well as "Pink Years" and "Blue Years" albums by Tangerine Dream, and compilations by Nurse with Wound and Current 93. They have also released a comprehensive compilation featuring songs by Canadian rock band, Triumph. 
Castle Vision was Castle Communications' home video distributor arm. It released many videotapes, including TUGS, The Raggy Dolls, Tumbledown Farm, Heathcliff, Alvin and the Chipmunks, You've Been Framed!, the Men of our Time series (documentaries about Hitler, Lenin, Gandhi and Kennedy), a documentary called Falklands War: The Untold Story, The Fugitive, Harry's Game as well as movies Bill & Ted's Excellent Adventure and Phantom of the Opera which were distributed via CBS/Fox Video 
Megachile trapezicauda is a species of bee in the family Megachilidae. It was described by Pasteels in 1965. 
She was born Mary Slatford at Harrow-on-the-Hill on 25 January 1922. She studied Natural Sciences at Reading University. 
In Baroque music, a pastorale is a movement of a melody in thirds over a drone bass, recalling the Christmas music of pifferari, players of the traditional Italian bagpipe (zampogna) and reed pipe (piffero). Pastorales are generally in 6/8 or 9/8 or 12/8 metre, at a moderate tempo. They resemble a slowed-down version of a tarantella, encompassing many of the same rhythms and melodic phrases. 
Pastorales are still played in the regions of Southern Italy where the zampogna continues to thrive. The pastorale can be played by a solo zampogna player, sometimes also accompanied by the piffero (also commonly called a ciaramella, pipita, or bifera), which is a primitive key-less, double-reed, oboe-type instrument. 
In 1621, Rodney was elected Member of Parliament for Wells. He was re-elected MP for Wells in 1624, 1625 and 1626. In 1628 he was elected MP for Somerset and sat until 1629 when King Charles decided to rule without parliament for eleven years. He was re-elected MP for Wells in April 1640 for the Short Parliament. He was re-elected MP for Wells in the Long Parliament in November 1640, but was disabled from sitting in August 1642 for supporting the King 
Rodney married Frances Southwell at Somerset House in May 1614. She was the daughter of Sir Robert Southwell of Woodrising, Norfolk, and his wife Lady Elizabeth Howard. She was a Lady of the Privy Chamber to Queen Anna. They had thirteen children, and only one son, George, reached his majority although he died aged 22. Their daughter Penelope married Peter Glenne of Norfolk and their daughter Ann married Sir Thomas Brydges of Keynsham. 
Rodney died at the age of 67 and was buried at the Church of St Leonard, Rodney Stoke, where there is a monument. 
The film premiered at the Montreal World Film Festival in September 2012, and was released at cinemas in Japan on 23 February 2013. 
Tackle Happy is an Australian documentary film released in 2000 about the live performance show Puppetry of the Penis starring Simon Morley and David Friend. It was produced and directed by comedian Mick Molloy, whose radio show Martin/Molloy had chronicled the chaotic 1998 tour captured in the film. Tackle Happy also features guest appearances by Stephen Curry, Paul Hester, Tony Martin, Andrew Denton, Amanda Keller, Pete Smith and Jimeoin. 
This article about a documentary film about the arts is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jerral Wayne Jones Jr. (born September 27, 1969) is the Chief Sales and Marketing Officer and Executive Vice President of the Dallas Cowboys. Jones Jr. was the president and general manager of the Dallas Desperados of the Arena Football League when it was founded in 2001 by his father. He now leads the Cowboys' commercial initiatives. 
Jones grew up in Arkansas and was inducted into the Arkansas Sports Hall of Fame in 2019 for his contributions to Little Rock Catholic. 
Jones is the son of Dallas Cowboys owner Jerry Jones and the younger brother of Cowboys executives Stephen Jones and Charlotte Jones Anderson. He is the father of a daughter, Juliette Turner-Jones, as the result of a former relationship with television and film actress Janine Turner in the 1990s. He married Lori Lemon in 2006, and has two children with her. 
This biographical article related to American sports is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about an American businessperson born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The name Olga has been used for three tropical cyclones in the Atlantic Basin, ten tropical cyclones in the Pacific Ocean, and at least three in the Southern Hemisphere. 
The XAF was an experimental radar set constructed in 1938, which survived World War II as a historical artifact, and is now placed on exhibit at the Historical Electronics Museum, located in Linthicum, Maryland 
He was a member of Olympic Poland national football team participated in Olympic Games 1992. He played 22 caps and scored once for the Poland national football team. 
This biographical article related to a Polish association football defender is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Preston came from Cricket St Thomas in Somerset. He took part in the Preston Somers Expedition in 1595. 
  This is a list of all captains of the University Football Club, an Australian rules football club that formerly participated in the Victorian Football League. 
On May 6, 1995, The Raven was opened to riders for the first time. The roller coaster debuted with a single 24-passenger train made by the Philadelphia Toboggan Company. The ceremonial first train was dispatched with one empty seat, after Leah Koch, the daughter of park President Will Koch, opted not to ride. The seat was instead reserved for the spirit of Edgar Allan Poe, who had published his poem "The Raven" exactly 150 years earlier. 
In 2005, The Raven received a second train, bringing the ride's total to two 24-passenger PTC trains. Although the ride had been able to effectively handle the crowds up to that point, adding the second train improved The Raven's capacity from 700 riders per hour to 960 riders per hour. 
In order to accommodate and store the second train when it was not being used, a transfer track was built along the straightaway prior to the lift hill. A transfer track allows a portion of the track to be moved and redirected to a storage bay. This allows an unused train to be stored during normal operation and also provides an additional area for maintenance crews to inspect the roller coaster train. 
During the 2020-2021 off-season, The Raven was given a refurbishment. The ride's trains were repainted with wings on both sides and 25% of the track was replaced. 
The Raven uses two red, 24-passenger trains made by the Philadelphia Toboggan Company. Each train is made up of six cars that hold four riders each. Each car has two rows holding two riders each. Each row has a seat divider that separates the two riders in that row and ensures each rider remains in a position allowing their restraints to work effectively. The Raven's safety restraints include an individual ratcheting lap bar and an individual, two-point lap belt. 
An investigation following the accident showed that Fellner's safety restraints were working properly and that there were no mechanical deficiencies on the roller coaster. However, Fellner's family filed a lawsuit in 2005 against Holiday World and the Philadelphia Toboggan Company, the manufacturer of the roller coaster train. The lawsuit was settled out of court in 2007; terms of the settlement were not disclosed. 
The Soilers is a 1923 American silent comedy film starring Stan Laurel, and was released in the same year as the Western silent movie drama The Spoilers. The name of one character from the original, "McNamara" is parodied in the James Finlayson character. 
Bargewell graduated from Officer candidate School and received his commission in 1973.  In addition, he completed a Bachelor of Science degree in resource management at Troy State University. 
While in Delta Force Bargewell participated in Operation Acid Gambit during the invasion of Panama, including the daring rescue of American citizen Kurt Muse from the Modelo prison. After the successful extraction of the hostage the MH-6 Little Bird transporting Muse as well as several Operators crashed behind enemy lines wounding many of them; however they managed to seek cover in the city until they were recovered by an APC. 
Mark Gardner was accused of repeatedly raping and beating a fellow Death Row inmate who was later released from prison, Damien Echols, who had been convicted for the West Memphis Three murders. 
Gardner's last words were "Blessed are those who are called to the Lord's supper. A never-ending feast awaits me. I love the Melanie Alberson family (his pastoral advisor) and I thank them very much." 
Gardner was the 3rd condemned inmate to be put to death in 1999 in Arkansas and the 20th person executed by the state of Arkansas since Furman v. Georgia, 408 U.S. 238 (1972), after new capital punishment laws were passed in Arkansas and that came into force on March 23, 1973. 
Riccardo Cerutti (born 7 September 1921) is an Italian rower. He competed at the 1948 Summer Olympics in London with the men's coxed four where they were eliminated in the semi-final. 
This biographical article relating to Italian rowing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 2009 Virginia National Bank Men's Pro Championship was a professional tennis tournament played on indoor hard courts. It was the first edition of the tournament which was part of the 2009 ATP Challenger Tour. It took place in Charlottesville, Virginia, USA between 2 and 8 November 2009. 
The building was erected in the second half of the 17th century in the style of Ukrainian (Cossack) Baroque. It has come down to our time in a somewhat rebuilt form. The functional typology of the object is an administrative-residential building, the residence of Judge General Vasyl Kochubey. The house is brick, single-floor with a basement. 
The volume of the original building with an underground floor (basement) and an above-ground part, which have survived to the present day, is a prominent example of Ukrainian architecture of the second half of the 17th century. 
In 1925, on the initiative of the Society of Beekeepers, a museum of beekeeping named after Peter Prokopovich was opened in the building. 
During the Great Patriotic War, the architectural monument was severely damaged, only the walls remained, and only in the early 70's began the restoration of the ruins. In 1975 a museum of local lore was opened in the building. 
The exposition of the first hall acquaints with the history of construction, restoration and use of the house. The history of the Kochubey family is revealed thanks to the family tree, family portraits. 
A separate hall is dedicated to the theme of love between Motri Kochubey and Hetman Ivan Mazepa, in which the letters of Hetman Mazepa to Motrona occupy a central place. The decoration of the hall is the icon of the Mother of God, donated in 1707 by Hetman Ivan Mazepa to the church of the city of Zhovkva in the Lviv region. 
A unique part of the building is the basement, which has not been rebuilt in several centuries. In the basement, the interior of the prison is recreated, with wax figures of a court clerk and a prisoner, instruments of torture and images of Cossack punishments. 
Joaquin Ramon Herrera (born March 6, 1969 in Los Angeles, California) is an American author, illustrator, blogger, photographer, and an award-winning filmmaker and documentarian. Herrera is the son of writer and two-term U.S. Poet Laureate Juan Felipe Herrera. 
Espeluznante: Un Libro De Cosas Horribles Para Ninos (Scary, Spanish version) (Selector, January 2006) 
Secret Visions in the Valley of Night (The DreamFever Chronicles, Book 1) (Self-published, December, 2016) 
Variratina is a monotypic genus of Papuan jumping spiders containing the single species, Variratina minuta. It was first described by J. X. Zhang & Wayne Paul Maddison in 2012, and is found in Papua New Guinea. 
This article related to jumping spiders (Salticidae) is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
All arrangements by Toshiko Akiyoshi.  All songs composed by Akiyoshi except "Yet Another Tear" (Tabackin). 
In 1957, at the age of 28 he was elected in the Bhandara lok sabha constituency. He was re-elected in 1962. Afterwards from Buldhana in (1980). He was a staunch supporter of separate Vidarbha. 
In 1967, he became President of the Mahavidarbha Rajya Sangharsh Samiti and mobilized the agitation to press for this demand. 
He belongs to an Ambedkarite Buddhist family. He hails from Mahar community and has a son, Mukul Wasnik two daughters, Dipti Wasnik Saxena and Seema Wasnik. 
  The Golden Boot Awards were an American acknowledgement of achievement honoring actors, actresses, and crew members who made significant contributions to the genre of Westerns in television and film. The award was sponsored and presented by the Motion Picture & Television Fund. Money raised at the award banquet was used to help finance various services offered by the Fund to those in the entertainment industry. 
Actor Pat Buttram conceived the idea of the Golden Boot Award, and they were presented annually from 1983 until being discontinued in 2007. 
Parker was born in Ayrshire in 1829, and began his career as an apprentice at the Greenock works of the Caledonian Railway. 
In 1858 he moved away from Scotland. At the Manchester, Sheffield and Lincolnshire Railway he was Carriage and Wagon Superintendent at the railway's Gorton works. He was one of the first to construct 6-wheeled bogie coaches, and in 1885 he produced one of the first dining car designs in Britain. 
In 1891 he introduced the first locomotive on a British railway to use a Belpaire firebox, which had been used on export locomotives built by the local manufacturer Beyer Peacock since 1872. The continuous vacuum brake and internal communication cord were introduced by the railway, gaining Board of Trade approval in 1893. 
Born in Detroit, Michigan, Moore studied at the Catholic University of America Drama Department under Gilbert V. Hartke. He is best known for his direction of the ground-breaking play The Boys in the Band, his Broadway productions (which garnered him five Tony Award nominations), and his collaborations - three plays and three films - with Neil Simon, including the detective spoofs Murder By Death and The Cheap Detective. 
Carleen is a female given name, a variant form of Caroline or Carolyn, and may also refer to one of the following 
Set in Uttar Pradesh, Gaurav S Bajaj and Kirtida Mistry played the lead roles while Afzaal Khan, Neha Bagga and Narayani Shastri played negative roles on the show. 
Subjects were linked with the most famous pilgrimage sites of the Holy Land, and especially Jerusalem, where the Church of the Holy Sepulchre contained both the greater part of the True Cross and the Tomb of Christ, as well as an altar dedicated to the Adoration of the Magi. Common subjects, which account for the great majority of the designs, are: 
With the exception of the somewhat variant example from Sant Pere de Casseres (see below), which may be later, it is usually assumed that all the Monza-type ampullae predate the Persian sack, and probably come from the late sixth century, a few years before Theodelinda's reign. After a nearly complete gap of three centuries or so, different styles of pilgrimage souvenirs begin to appear from the 10th century, reflecting rather different pilgrimage experiences and customs. 
Bobbio Abbey was founded in 613 by the Irish missionary Saint Columbanus in 613, with land and funds from Theodelinda. The Bobbio ampullae were discovered in the 1920s in the crypt of the abbey church, and are presumed to have been given by Theodelinda or her family. 
Apart from the collections at Monza and Bobbio, other examples include two owned by the Staatliche Museen of Berlin and one in the Landesmuseum Stuttgart. Two examples in the United States, one at Dumbarton Oaks near Washington, D. C. and one in the Detroit Institute of Arts, appear to be cast from the same mould.  There is an example with a Crucifixion and Ascension in the Cleveland Museum of Art (clear image online). 
Within the Grand Duchy of Lithuania, Davyd-Haradok was part of Brest Litovsk Voivodeship. In 1793, Davyd-Haradok was acquired by the Russian Empire in the course of the Second Partition of Poland. 
During World War II, Davyd-Haradok was under German occupation from 7 July 1941 until 9 July 1944. On 10 August 1941, 3,000 Jews older than 14 years old were murdered in a mass execution perpetrated by an Einsatzgruppen unit consisting of Germans and their collaborators. 
Survivors were imprisoned in a ghetto where they were forced to perform forced labour and suffered harsh living conditions, many deaths. On 10 September 1942, 1,263 remaining inhabitants of the ghetto, the vast majority women and children, were murdered. About a hundred of them managed to escape to the forest. 
He appeared in more than 60 films between 1931 and 1943 almost exclusively in small or supporting roles. He was, according to film academic Ginette Vincendeau, a "brilliant, extravagant actor" who "specialised in louche, menacing or diabolical characters". 
Sufes was a town in the late Roman province of Byzacena, which became a Christian bishopric that is included in the Catholic Church's list of titular sees. 
As part of a systematic survey, during the French protectorate of Tunisia, five location were listed on a 8 May 1895 state protection decree as three items for the site: the Sidi Okba mosque; rectangular enclosures A, B, C; and, the semicircular nymphaeum. There are more unexcavated ruins. 
PS Normandy was a British paddle-wheel mail steamer operating on the Southampton - Guernsey - Jersey route which, on a night of dense fog, sank 20 miles from The Needles in the English Channel in the early morning of 17 March 1870 after colliding at around 03:30 with steamship Mary, a propeller steamer carrying 500 tons of maize from Odessa to London via Gibraltar. 
On the bridge of the Mary at the time of the collision, were Mr Griggs, the first mate and the captain of the vessel, Captain Stranach, together with the helmsman. 
Normandy was captained by Captain Henry Beckford Harvey and carried 28 crewmen, including chief mate J. Ockleford, an experienced officer with more than 16 years in the employ of the Company, the stewardess, Mary Charlotte Wilson and 31 passengers, of which 12 were women. 
The principal cause of the collision was that the Mary was covered by the edge of a dense bank of fog and was hidden from the view of the officers on the bridge of the Normandy which was, until the moment of the collision, under a clear sky. Mary was moving at less than 2 knots and was sounding her fog-horns, her crew conscious of the precariousness of the situation. 
After the collision, Captain Harvey ordered the two remaining portside lifeboats to be launched and ensured that all the women were placed on board first. There was no more room for those who remained onboard the Normandy.  
One lifeboat was launched from the Mary but did not reach the Normandy as Mr Andrews, the second mate of the Mary who was in command of the lifeboat sent to search for those left on the Normandy, did not continue for fear that the Mary herself was in danger of sinking. 
Although the ruling of the official enquiry was that the Normandy was at fault, the actions and the heroism of Captain Harvey, who died after having ensured that the passengers would be first to abandon the ship, was strenuously defended and praised by Victor Hugo, who also recommended that London and South Western Railway equip its ships with watertight bulkheads, sufficient life jackets, and floating lights. 
The Greenwich Police Court judged on 11 April 1870 that Normandy was found to have infringed Articles 14 and 15 of the Regulations for Preventing Disasters at Sea and "noted with dissatisfaction" the conduct of the second mate of Mary for returning to Mary with a lifeboat without reaching Normandy. 
A monument to the crew of Normandy stands at Saint Helier on Jersey. The inscription on the monument reads: 
On the top-side facilities of offshore oil and gas platforms, the Master Control Station (MCS) is a dedicated system that controls and retrieves data from subsea equipment on the ocean floor. The MCS is supplied by the manufacturers of the subsea control modules (SCM), an MCS is required for each vendor. This can be a challenge in some scenarios. 
Positioned between the distributed control system (DCS) on the platform and the subsea equipment, the MCS is critical to maintaining safe operating conditions, optimizing production across a field and effectively managing reserves. The complex automation systems enabling offshore production of oil & gas, particularly in deep water, have strong parallels to their on-shore, process plant applications. These systems, subsystems and instruments must interoperate in a seamless manner. 
In 2008, Control Dynamics International of Houston, now a subsidiary of ENGlobal, was commissioned to develop an MCS that could communicate with and control subsea equipment from multiple vendors; dubbed the Universal Master Control Station (UMCS). 
The primary focus of the UMCS development program was to create a new standardised solution that used commercially available, off-the-shelf components. The graphics, control routines, and logic/communication functionality would be designed and implemented to provide operations a common-look control system interface. A standard interface (communication protocol) would establish a common communication link for the UMCS enabling concurrent data exchange to multiple subsea vendors. 
Standard OPC databases serve as the communication link to the Distributed Control System (DCS), Hydraulic Power Unit (HPU), and Electrical Power Unit (EPU).  The UMCS will communicate with subsea control pods at the wellhead from multiple subsea equipment providers, without disrupting the subsea vendor's native communication protocol. 
The UMCS utilizes a set of core graphic screens with a variety of control pop-ups, trending screens, diagnostics, and alarm handling. Screens can be quickly configured to project-specific requirements using any off-the-shelf human-machine interface (HMI) software. Custom programming is minimized and is replaced by HMI screen configuration, making the UMCS extensible and easier to maintain. 
The system is also designed to accommodate multiple wells, and integrate with the major distributed control systems (DCS) and subsea equipment types. The UMCS also offers a pre-engineered solution based on a standardized program block architecture and a common communication database via the Standard Interface, based on OPC. 
Nanise Nagusuca  (born 1953) is a former Fijian politician, who was elected to the House of Representatives in a special election on December 11, 2004. The byelection for the North East Urban Fijian Communal constituency (one of 23 seats reserved for ethnic Fijians) was held to fill a vacancy caused by the death of Filimone Banuve, the previous member.  Like Banuve, Nagusuca was a member of the Soqosoqo Duavata ni Lewenivanua (SDL), the party of the Prime Minister, Laisenia Qarase. 
Nagusuca said she intended to make women's issues and the fight against poverty a priority in Parliament.  She said that many women who had business skills could not afford to start their own business, and there were single mothers who needed support.  "Nobody in Fiji should be poor because we have so much food available," she declared. 
Observers were surprised when, just five days after Nagusuca's election to Parliament, Prime Minister Qarase reorganized his Cabinet on December 16 and named Nagusuca to the new portfolio of Assistant Minister For Fijian Affairs, Culture, and Heritage. Her appointment brought the size of the cabinet to 27. 
A resident of Nokonoko in Ra Province, she is married to Meli Nagusuca, with whom she has four children.  She has Bachelor of Arts and Master of Arts degrees from the University of the South Pacific.  A career librarian, Nagasuca worked on attachment in the United States and Canada for three months, as well as at the Western Regional Library in Lautoka. 
This is a list of episodes of the Extreme Makeover: Home Edition series. Extreme Makeover: Home Edition started on February 15, 2004 and ended on January 13, 2012. The show ran for 209 episodes spanning 9 seasons, and 11 special episodes. A run of new specials aired in December 2012. In January 2019, it was announced that HGTV had revived the show and new regular episodes would begin airing in 2020. 
The entire design team and several families they have helped gather at the home of the Elcano family.  The families share memories of their home makeovers and everyone is entertained by a special guest. 
Each member of the design team went back to a past family and helped them "pay forward" their good fortune to someone else. 
The team builds a new home for Shilo and Kathryn Harris.  Shilo is an Army veteran who was severely burned when an IED destroyed his vehicle while on duty in Iraq; his existing home (located in a rural area near San Antonio) does not keep out the dust and heat which aggravates his medical condition.  The family was sent to Landstahl, Germany, where Shilo was able to meet with other wounded warriors. 
Kingston Public Hospital (KPH) is a public general hospital in Kingston, Jamaica. It is the oldest public hospital in Jamaica and is the main hospital in south eastern Jamaica.  The hospital is operated by the South East Regional Health Authority on behalf of the Ministry of Health, Jamaica. 
Starotavlarovo is located 37 km north of Buzdyak (the district's administrative centre) by road. Kubyak is the nearest rural locality. 
Nkangala is one of the 3 districts of Mpumalanga province of South Africa. The seat of Nkangala is Middelburg. The Nkangala District Municipality consists of 160 towns and villages. The most spoken language of its 1,308,129 people is IsiNdebele with 28.4%, closely followed by Zulu speakers (2011 Census). The district code is DC31.  
The June 4th Museum, organised by the Hong Kong Alliance in Support of Patriotic Democratic Movements in China, is a museum commemorating the 1989 Tiananmen Square protests and massacre that occurred in Beijing, China. 
The museum was first located in a 1,375 sq ft. space in Tsim Sha Tsui, Hong Kong. It opened on 26 April 2014, shortly before the 25th anniversary of the incident. However, the museum received many complaints from the building owners, with regards to breaches of the mutual covenant of the building. The museum closed on 11 July 2016. 
New premises were found to house the museum in a commercial premises in Mong Kok and the museum reopened on 26 April 2019. The museum was once again closed on 2 June 2021 following a government probe into the museum's licensing status. 
The purpose of the museum is to give Chinese people, in particular residents from mainland China, an opportunity to learn more about the Tiananmen Square protests of 1989, the history of which is censored in China. Local residents can also explore the history of democracy and freedom in China. 
While searching for a permanent location in which to re-establish the museum, a temporary museum was opened in the Jockey Club Creative Arts Centre in Shek Kip Mei, Kowloon on 30 April 2017. It hosted a series of related events surrounding 4 June 2017 and closed down on 15 June. 
In 2018, the Alliance undertook a search for permanent premises in hopes of re-opening the museum before 4 June 2019. 
The Food and Health Department (FEHD) on 1 June raided the museum and initiated proceedings alleging that the museum had violated the Places of Public Entertainment Ordinance by operating without a licence. The museum closed and sought legal advice.  
With the future the museum seen as uncertain by museum staff including manager Lee Cheuk-yan after the imposition of the Hong Kong National Security Law, a fundraiser was started to preserve the exhibits in digital format. 
Mailza Assis da Silva (born 10 December 1976) better known as Mailza Gomes is a Brazilian politician. Although born in Mato Grosso do Sul she has spent her political career representing Acre, having served as state senator since 2019. 
Gomes is married to James Gomes, the former mayor of Senador Guiomard. She is an alumnus of the Federal University of Acre. She has two children. 
Mikhail Avdeev is a Russian politician, who, since 2011, has been a Member of the State Duma, representing the Moscow Oblast. He is a member of the Communist Party of the Russian Federation. He currently serves as Deputy Chairman of the State Duma committee on land relations and construction. 
From 2011 to 2019, during the exercise of the powers of a deputy of the State Duma of the VI and VII convocations, he co-authored 21 legislative initiatives and amendments to draft federal laws. 
This biographical article related to yacht racing in the Czech Republic is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The university was originally established as Deh-Yu College of Nursing and Management in 1957. In 2002, it was upgraded to Deh-Yu Institute and subsequently Ching Kuo Institute of Management and Health. 
This article about a university, college or other higher education institution in Taiwan is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
As of 2019, the population was just under 6,900. The main transport access is from the A62 (Manchester Road), through Milnsbridge in the valley bottom or via Scapegoat Hill from the A640 (New Hey Road) at the top of the hill. 
The township of Golcar consisted of Bolster Moor, Golcar, Leymoor, Pole Moor, Scapegoat Hill and Town End. 
Named after St Guthlac, who preached in the area during the 8th century, its name is recorded in the Domesday Book as Goullakarres. During the Industrial Revolution Golcar became an important centre for weaving.  Pharmacologist James Burrows grew up in the area. 
The village has been a site of extensive dialect research.  It was first a site in the English Survey of English Dialects, and later a site in the Atlas Linguarum Europae. 
Three 1840s weavers' cottages were converted into the Colne Valley Museum in 1970. The museum has several restored period rooms which are used to show temporary exhibitions. The museum was extended in 2008 following the purchase of the adjoining former fish and chip shop. 
Exhibits include a handloom and a spinning jenny, invented by James Hargreaves. In the loom chamber, spinning room, weavers sitting room and 'gas-lit' cloggers shop, the volunteer helpers give demonstrations of the type of crafts that would have existed during the 19th century. 
The museum is run by volunteers and opens at weekends and bank holidays. Various craft and working weekends are held through the year. 
Golcar supports two scout groups: the 4th Golcar Scout Group, which was founded in 1951 and the 39th Parkwood Scout Group, founded in 1908. 
The village has several sporting teams including football and cricket teams (Golcar who play in the Huddersfield Cricket League and Leymoor who play in the Halifax Cricket League). 
The village has three churches, the Anglican Parish Church of St John the Evangelist opened in 1829  and is a good example of a Waterloo church,  Golcar Baptist Church (), founded in 1835 and Golcar Providence Methodist Church founded in 1876. 
The Scotts spend two years in Hawaii and then move to Annapolis, where Scott, now a lieutenant commander, is to teach naval aviation but his outspoken stand in favor of aircraft carriers in combat causes him to lose a promotion. After Japan invades Manchuria, Scott is offered a civilian sales position selling aircraft in Europe, but remains in the Navy. 
In the film, White Heat, when Arthur "Cody" Jarrett played by James Cagney is chased by federal investigators, to lose them, he drives the car into San-Val Drive In, where Task Force is showing. Later in the movie, when Cody's mother is interrogated by the cops, she says that she was with Verna (Virginia Mayo) watching the film and that it was "exciting." 
Bosley Crowther of The New York Times noted that when the film concentrates on "real carrier activity out at sea and the actual aspects of recent warfare, it springs into vivid, thrilling life." Playing on the propaganda-like message of Task Force, Radio Moscow decried it, "a film which glorifies war, and calls for the militarization of the country's whole life." 
His father Daniel MacNamara was a RN Surgeon married Frances Fennel Aug 13 1823 in Marylebone Parish. The MacNamara pedigree is registered with the College of Arms in Dublin and London. Nottidge Charles MacNamara was the 6th son in a family of thirteen Children. His brother Francis Nottidge M.D became a Surgeon General and was Professor of Chemistry at the Medical College, Calcutta. 
The Transatlantic Council of the Boy Scouts of America serves American Boy Scouts in Lisbon and in the Azores. 
Clem was born on October 19, 1905 in the small town of Nevada, in Story County, western Iowa. She completed her high school degree and found employment for several years with the Iowa State Highway Commission and Iowa State College as a computing clerk, auditing clerk, and bookkeeper. 
Clem went on the 2nd Allied Mission to Greece in 1946 as a junior statistician, and there she observed the elections. In 1952, she was a statistical consultant to the Atomic Bomb Casualty Commission in Hiroshima, Japan. 
Garcon Point is a peninsula located south of Milton and directly across Escambia Bay from Pensacola. 
The area is mostly marsh and swamp and contains mostly pine trees. It also serves as an important watershed, filtering water for the surrounding bays and their ecosystems. 
There are some very notable nature and bike trails along the east coast of the peninsula. These trails, totaling 2.7 miles are maintained by the Florida Trail Association.  
In 1784, he entered the Habsburg Monarchy's military establishment and fought in the Austro-Turkish War. He served with distinction in the Flanders Campaign and was wounded at Tourcoing in 1794. He retired from the army at the end of 1796, but returned to military service as a general officer in late 1800. 
The school began operations in a facility on 11 February 1917. At the time it had 17 students. It hired its first Spanish national teacher in 1923. The school had 50 students by 1924, and on 27 April of that year it moved into a building in Deusto. The school's first abitur was held in June 1940. The school was closed temporarily on 5 August 1945 as Germany surrendered in World War II, and until 1951 students received instruction in the teachers' private apartments. 
Lichenaula provisa is a moth in the family Xyloryctidae. It was described by Thomas Pennington Lucas in 1900. It is found in Australia, where it has been recorded from Queensland. 
It was treated as a synonym of Lichenaula phloeochroa, but DNA barcoding has shown this species to be distinctly separate. 
This biographical article related to association football in the Czech Republic, about a defender, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
David Gillilan died in 1974. Having written nothing for twenty-five years, Pamela Gillilan now returned to writing poetry. In 1979, her poem "Come Away", an elegy on the death of her husband, won the Cheltenham Festival poetry competition. She was a Poetry Society prize-winner in 1980 and 1981. That Winter (1986), collecting elegies to her husband, was shortlisted for the Commonwealth Poetry Prize. 
She moved to Bristol, and taught creative writing at Bristol University and the University of the Third Age. She died on 26 October 2001. 
Zhao attended Peking University and earned a bachelor's degree in applied mathematics in 2001. In 2006, he obtained his PhD degree in statistics from University of California, Berkeley. 
Peng Zhao was a summer associate at Lehman Brothers and served as a quantitative researcher at Evnine & Associates prior to joining Citadel. 
In July 2016, Citadel Securities announced that then Microsoft COO, B. Kevin Turner, was joining the firm as CEO. At this time a new role, chief scientist, was created specifically for Peng Zhao who was then global head of market making. Five months after joining, Kevin Turner left Citadel Securities, and on January 27, 2017, at age 34, Peng Zhao was promoted to CEO. 
Zhao and his wife organized a 1 million surgical mask donation to Chicago's first responders during the coronavirus pandemic in 2020. 
The Doating Lovers: Or, the Libertine Tam'd is a 1715 comedy play by the Irish writer Newburgh Hamilton. 
The original cast included John Leigh as Gaylove, William Bullock as Sir Butterfly Ayrewould, Christopher Bullock as Sr Timothy Twiddle, Theophilus Keene as Colonel Winfield, Benjamin Griffin as Choleric, George Pack as Decoy, Francis Leigh as Thump, Mary Kent as Lady Youthful, Sarah Thurmond as Cosmelia and Letitia Cross as Clarinda. 
HMS Eskimo was a Tribal-class destroyer, Eskimo served throughout the Second World War, seeing action in Norway, the Mediterranean, the English Channel and in Burma. After the war Eskimo was used as an accommodation and headquarters ship, finally being used as a practice target before being scrapped in 1949. 
Eskimo participated in the Second Battle of Narvik in April 1940. On 12 April, Eskimo was hit by a torpedo fired from German destroyer Z2 Georg Thiele. The explosion caused severe damage, blowing off Eskimo's bow. After temporary repairs by the shipwrights of the fleet repair ship Vindictive at Skjelfjorden in Norway, Eskimo was able to return to the Vickers-Armstrong works at Newcastle for rebuilding, which took until Sept. 1940. 
Eskimo was reduced to an accommodation and headquarters ship for minesweepers, wreck-disposal vessels, and salvage craft clearing the Thames and Medway estuaries in 1946. She was used as a target ship in the Gareloch, sold for scrap on 27 June 1949 and finally broken up at Troon. 
Eskimo's bell is in the collection of the National Maritime Museum. Imperial War Museums holds a range of material relating to Eskimo, including photographs, film, and an officially commissioned watercolour by Vivian Pitchforth showing Eskimo refitting at Durban.  The National Museum of the Royal Navy holds a detailed ship model of Eskimo, built by Commander John West. West had served in Eskimo as navigating officer at Narvik. 
Madcap's Flaming Duty is the ninety-eighth release and twenty-seventh major studio album by Tangerine Dream. Along with Cyclone (1978) and Tyger (1987) it is one of the few Tangerine Dream releases to feature vocals. The album is a tribute to Syd Barrett who died in 2006; the title references Barrett's album The Madcap Laughs. This is the first album to feature Bernhard Beibl who would remain a member until 2014. 
Buczek attended Wake Forest University, majored in Business, and graduated in 1967. Buczek played for Wake Forest's legendary golf team. They won the first of 10 straight ACC Championships in Buczek's senior year. 
Buczek was the first American to win on the South African Tour. He won the 1972 Holiday Inns Royal Swazi Sun Open held in Mbabane, Swaziland. Buczek started the final round tied with England's Peter Oosterhuis. Buczek shot a final round 67 to win by one over defending champion Cobie Legrange. He outplayed Oosterhuis, then regarded as one of the world's best players, by five shots. 
At the 1974 U.S. Open at Winged Foot Golf Club, Buzcek was in the top 10 for the first two rounds. He shot 83-73 over the weekend and finished T35. He would work as Winged Foot's sixth head professional, much later in his career, from 2006 to 2009. 
In 2018, Buczek was recognized as one of the six head professionals who served throughout the 50-year history of Grandfather Golf & Country Club in Linville, North Carolina. 
This biographical article relating to American golf is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Vermont state capital is Montpelier. In 1791, Vermont joined the United States as the fourteenth state. 
An in-depth evaluation of government in 2008 ranked Vermont high compared to other states. It ranked highest in "small discrete issues and huge global ones." It performed poorly in the issues in-between and planning for the future. 
Vermont's state legislature is the Vermont General Assembly, a bicameral body composed of the Vermont House of Representatives (the lower house) and the Vermont Senate (the upper house) meet at the Vermont State House. The Senate is composed of 30 state senators, while the House of Representatives has 150 members. 
With the current estimated population of Vermont from the last U.S. Census, there is approximately one Representative for every 4,059 residents. 
The Executive Branch consists of the Governor of Vermont, and state agencies. The executive branch enacts and enforces the laws of the state. The Governor is the supreme executive. The current Governor is Phil Scott, a Republican. 
The offices of the Governor are located at The Pavilion in Montpelier, the state capital. The governor is paid a salary of $181,646.40 annually. 
Vermonters elect a state governor and lieutenant governor on separate tickets.  For example, when Republican Governor Richard Snelling died in office in 1991, the Democratic Lieutenant Governor Howard Dean succeeded him for the remainder of that term. In addition to the Governor and Lieutenant Governor, Vermonters elect four other officials on a statewide ballot: Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Vermont Auditor of Accounts, and Attorney General. 
There are three levels of bureaucracy: at the highest are secretaries and agencies; the next level are commissions; the third are departments and offices. Some commissions still retain their old name of "Department", as well as agencies, e.g. "Department of Transportation" is an agency. 
There are seven agencies run by appointed secretaries: Administration, Vermont Agency of Agriculture Food and Markets (Agriculture), Commerce and Community Development, Digital Services, Human Services, Natural Resources, and Transportation. The salaries of the secretaries range from $109,000 to $128,169 annually. 
The governor, with approval of the legislature, appoints people to boards. Six boards govern the following commissions: a) Banking, Insurance, Securities, and Health Care Administration; b) Education - Run by Vermont State Board of Education; c) Labor; d) Liquor Control; e) Public Safety; and f) Public Service (advocacy). 
The remaining commissions are under the following agencies along with various departments as indicated: 
There are more than 100 transportation-related fees in the state including the usual drivers licenses and vehicle registration. 
Among other functions, the Department of Financial Regulation (DFR) regulates individual budgets for Vermont's fourteen hospitals. They approved an average increase for 2007 of 6.3%. The average increase for 2008 was  9.5%. Individual hospitals received approval for increases from 3.8% to 11.8%. 
The state's highest and the sole appellate court is the Vermont Supreme Court made up of five justices who serve six-year terms. The Chief Justice is the head of the judiciary and, with the other justices of the supreme court, oversees the judicial branch. Vermont has three additional courts and one division.  Vermont is one of only nine states without an intermediate appellate court. 
Vermont is one of twelve states that have no death penalty statute. After 1930, there were four executions, the last two being in 1954. Capital punishment was effectively abolished in practice in 1964, with the statutes being completely removed in 1987. State law allows children as young as ten years to be tried as adults, the lowest age limit currently specified by any of the 50 states. 
The Vermont prison system is administered by Vermont Department of Corrections. There are about 2,200 inmates as of May 2007. There are nine prisons in Vermont: 
An unusual feature of Vermont Courts is the use of side judges, elected laymen who sit with the judge in certain cases and also serve as county administrators. 
Vermont is the only state in the union not to have a balanced budget requirement and yet Vermont has had a balanced budget every year since 1991. In 2007, Moody's Investors Service gave its top rating of AAA to the state. 
In 2007 Vermont stood 14th highest out of 50 states and the District of Columbia for state and local taxation, with a per capita load of $3,681. The national average was $3,447. However, CNNMoney ranked Vermont highest in the nation based on the percentage of per capita income. The rankings showed Vermont had a per capita tax load of $5,387, 14.1% of the per capita income of $38,306. 
Vermont collects personal income tax in a progressive structure of five different income brackets, with marginal tax rates ranging from 3.6% to 9.5%. In 2008, the top one percent of the residents provided 30% of the income tax revenue. 2,000 people had sufficient income to be taxed at the highest marginal rate of 9.5%. 
Vermont does not collect inheritance taxes; however, its estate tax is decoupled from the federal estate tax laws and therefore the state still imposes its own estate tax. 
Property taxes are imposed for the support of education and municipal services. Vermont does not assess tax on personal property, though individual towns or cities can opt to do so. 
Property taxes are levied by municipalities based on fair market appraisal of real property. Rates vary from .97% on homesteaded property in Ferdinand, Essex County, to 2.72% on nonresidents' property in Barre City. Statewide, towns average 1.77% to 1.82% tax rate. 
In 2007, Vermont counties were among the highest in the country for property taxes. Chittenden ($3,809 median), Windham ($3,412), Addison ($3,352), and Windsor ($3,327) ranked in the top 100, out of 1,817 counties in the nation with populations greater than 20,000. Twelve of the state's 14 counties stood in the top 20%. 
To equitably support education, some towns are required by Act 60 to send some of their collected taxes to be redistributed to school districts lacking adequate support. 
The state collects 86 cents per $100 of real estate valuation for residential properties and $1.35 per $100 for commercial and vacation properties. 
In an attempt to raise money and discourage smoking, the state raised taxes on cigarettes over the past decade. The tax in 2002 was 93 cents per pack; in 2010 it was $2.24 per pack. This resulted in cigarette revenue in 2002 of $24.5 million; $64.5 million in 2010. 
Money from the Vermont Lottery supplied about 2% of the annual expenditures for education in 2007, contributing $23 million, of the $1.3 billion of school spending. Prior to 1998, profits from the lottery went to the state government's general fund, but since then all profits are required to be spent on education. 
Internally, Vermont's 254 municipalities comprise nine cities, 237 towns and five unincorporated gores, governed by guidelines set by the state statutes and constitution.  Towns govern themselves by direct citizen participation via town meeting. Between town meetings, town affairs are managed by a selectboard or a town manager. Additionally, an elected town clerk keeps track of the town's records, manages licenses, convenes civil boards, and runs elections. 
As in most of New England, any town that grows too large to be governed by a town meeting can opt for a city form with a mayor and city council. Towns and cities may also have town managers and mayors responsible for the management of municipal affairs. Cities also have a board of aldermen in place of a selectboard. 
There are three types of incorporated municipalities in Vermont, towns, cities and villages. As in the other New England states, towns are the basic unit of municipal government. Cities are independent of and equivalent to towns. Villages are included in towns but assume responsibility for some municipal services within their boundaries, usually water, sewage and sometimes local roads. Vermont is the only New England state with incorporated villages. 
Nearly every square foot of the state is within the borders of an incorporated municipality; only a few hundred people live in the unincorporated gores. 
As in the rest of the United States, the state government does not take direction from the federal government. However, the people of Vermont elect representatives to the federal government which pass federal laws and also recommend federal judicial appointments each of which may ultimately affect Vermont citizens. 
Decisions of the US District Court in Vermont are subject to review by the Second Circuit Court of Appeals headquartered in New York City. By law judges and attorneys are nominated by the President and confirmed by the Senate. 
There is at least one agency which is jointly run by the Legislative and Executive branches. This is the Vermont Telecommunications Authority, which is supposed to make high-speed internet access available to all Vermonters by the end of 2010. 
He was a grandson of Andreas Paulson. He was born in Bergen, but represented the club IL Skjalg. At the 1948 Summer Olympics held in London he finished second in the high jump final with a jump of 1.95 metres. He became Norwegian champion in 1948. His personal best jump was 1.96 metres, achieved at the Norwegian championships in August 1948 in Trondheim. 
A cand.jur. by education, Paulson became a police superintendent in 1953. From 1967 to 1993 he worked as a public prosecutor. He died in 2008. 
This biographical article relating to Norwegian athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Alexander Sammurtok is a Canadian politician, who was elected to the Legislative Assembly of Nunavut in a by-election on February 10, 2014. Sammurtok first ran in the 2013 election, but finished in an exact tie with incumbent MLA Lorne Kusugak in the redistributed district of Rankin Inlet South. 
He is the nephew of Tom Sammurtok, who was the MLA for the neighbouring electoral district of Rankin Inlet North-Chesterfield Inlet. Both Alexander and Tom Sammurtok were defeated in the 2017 Nunavut general election, Alexander by Kusugak and Tom by Cathy Towtongie; in the 2021 Nunavut general election, Alexander Sammurtok ran in Rankin Inlet North and unofficially defeated Towtongie. 
Mars Saga is a role-playing video game developed by Westwood Associates and published by Electronic Arts for the Commodore 64 in 1988. Following a legal battle against Electronic Arts for rights on the franchise, Westwood turned to Infocom to publish the Apple II and MS-DOS ports. 
The player takes the role of Tom Jetland, a down-on-his-luck space traveller trapped on Mars after crashing his ship. While searching for jobs to make enough money to get back off the planet, he discovers a conspiracy hiding contact with what seems to be alien life. 
The player visits the four Martian cities of Primus, Progeny, Parallax, and Proscenium, traverses the Martian surface, and visits abandoned mines. 
The combat system features a bird's eye view of the battlefield. The player queues instructions for the party's characters to perform in real time. 
Computer Gaming World described the game as accessible to newcomers to the genre, including features like auto-mapping, allowing the player to save without switching disks, and allowing the computer to control the player's characters during combat. 
In 1989, the game was re-released on PC platforms, retitled Mines of Titan. The setting of the game was moved from Mars to Titan, a moon of Saturn. 
The previously useless mining skill was fixed, and in Mines of Titan it is used to avoid cave-ins while adventuring in mineshafts. The other five skills were deleted. 
The differences between Mars Saga and its sister game are mostly plot related. There are more side quests to complete in Mines of Titan as well as more things that must be completed to forward the main plot. City layouts are the same and so are the enemies that are encountered, although there are more enemies in Mines of Titan. 
Oregon Chai is an American beverage company based in Portland, Oregon. The company provides a line of chai beverage products, including a concentrate designed to make a hot, tea-based beverage prepared with steamed milk, vanilla, a sweetener (usually sugar or honey), and other spices. 
The company was purchased in 2004 by Kerry Group, a giant Irish food conglomerate.  Its offices were moved to Waukesha WI in 2005. 
This Oregon-corporate or for-profit organization related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 64th running of the Tour of Flanders cycling classic was held on Sunday, 30 March 1980. The race was won by Belgian Michel Pollentier, after an ultimate attack from his breakaway companions Francesco Moser and Jan Raas, at 700 m from the finish in Meerbeke. 46 of 179 riders finished. 
South Twin Lake is located in the Chequamegon-Nicolet National Forest in Taylor County, Wisconsin. It is the home of the White Birch regeneration project started by Janet and Carl J. Nelson to support an ecosystem in which white birch saplings can thrive. In 2008 they retired to Oregon. 
Around the lake many "listening points" have been set up for enjoying the lake and the surrounding forest. The road to the lake crosses a glacial esker which is approximately 1/4 mile from the north end of the lake. The lake has a non-motorized status as per Molitor Township ordinance. Until 2008 Carl Nelson maintained a path along the eastern and southern shores of the lake, which passed several listening points and goes through the regeneration area. They still remain. 
In 2008 the control of the lake reverted to the control of the National Forest Service as per a pre-existing contract from 1978. The family cabin was removed in the spring of 2009 by family members. 
A large US Forest Service authorized clear cut took place south of the lake in the winter of 2009 and continues in 2010. 
This article about a location in Taylor County, Wisconsin is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Vashu Bhagnani is an Indian film producer who works in Bollywood films. His films include Coolie No. 1 (1995), Hero No. 1 (1997), Bade Miyan Chote Miyan (1998), Mujhe Kucch Kehna Hai (2001), Rehnaa Hai Terre Dil Mein (2002), Om Jai Jagadish (2002), and Shaadi No. 1 (2005). He launched Puja Entertainment India Ltd. in 1995 with the movie Coolie No. 1. His recent ventures are Kal Kissne Dekha (2009) and F.A.L.T.U (2011) where he introduced his son Jackky Bhagnani.  
Bhagnani is of Sindhi descent. He is the son of Lilaram Bhagnani and is married to Pooja Bhagnani. Their son Jackky Bhagnani is also an actor. 
It is situated on the right bank of the river Traun, opposite the city of Wels. About 11.6% of the municipality is forest, 69% is farmland. 
This is a list of Canadian literary figures, including poets, novelists, children's writers, essayists, and scholars. 
This article related to the moth subfamily Teleiodini is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Camp Nelson Confederate Cemetery is a historic cemetery located near Cabot in northern Lonoke County, Arkansas and is near the site of a Confederate military camp Camp Hope (renamed Camp Nelson), where 1,500 Confederate soldiers died during an epidemic during the fall of 1862. Camp Nelson Cemetery is located on Rye Drive, just off Cherry Road, just off Mt. Carmel Road in north Lonoke County about 2 miles east of Cabot. 
Camp Hope was established in the spring of 1862 as a central staging point in central Arkansas for Confederate troops gathering from Texas and Arkansas. The camp was renamed for Brigadier General Allison Nelson, commander of the 10th Texas Infantry Regiment, after he died there in October 1862. 
During the fall of 1862, an epidemic of measles, typhoid fever, mumps, and other diseases ran rampant through the troops congregated there. Brigadier General Nelson was among the approximately 1,500 Arkansas and Texas soldiers who died from disease-related conditions during a two-month period, from early October to early December. The majority of these soldiers were buried in unmarked graves in the surrounding area. The camp was abandoned by the end of 1862. 
In 1905, Confederate veterans located 429 graves and reinterred the remains on land donated for a cemetery near the original camp site. They placed 429 limestone markers, all marked "Unknown Soldier CSA", and erected a 12-foot obelisk to memorialize those buried here. Improperly maintained after the death of the last Civil War Veterans, the site was ultimately overtaken by forest undergrowth. 
The house is roughly square in plan, with three bays on each side, and is topped by a flat roof with a square belvedere on top.  It has wide overhanging eaves studded with brackets, and a wide porch spans the width of the front. Additions have been added onto the rear of the house. 
George F Fuller, president of the Wyman-Gordon Co. purchased the John B Gough Farm in March 1930. He also purchased the Bancroft Farm and the Anderson Farm as well. This was part of the New England Power Construction Company purchase. Worcester Daily Telegram March 1930. 
After Gough's death, the house was purchased by William J. Hogg, owner of the Worcester-based Crompton Carpet Company.  For much of the 20th century the estate served as the campus of the Shepherd Knapp School, and in the 1980s the property was acquired by Digital Equipment Corporation and used as a training facility.  It is now in under the control of the Boylston Historical Society, which is working to restore the property. 
The house was declared a National Historic Landmark and listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1974. 
A photo of the house appears on page 491 of the 1899 book The Worcester of eighteen hundred and ninety-eight. Fifty years a city.  A graphic presentation of its institutions, industries and leaders. 
Hillside in the 1890s after it was sold to William Hogg. Photo shows Mrs. May Hogg and Mrs. William C. Marble 
1890s view from the John B. Gough house in West Boylston, Mass. Photo shows members of the Hogg family, who bought the house after Gough's death. 
Sherbournia is a genus of flowering plants in the family Rubiaceae. It comprises 13 currently recognized species. It was named after British botanist Margaret Sherbourne. (1791-1846) 
The Na-K-Cl cotransporter (NKCC) is a protein that aids in the secondary active transport of sodium, potassium, and chloride into cells. In humans there are two isoforms of this membrane transport protein, NKCC1 and NKCC2, encoded by two different genes (SLC12A2 and SLC12A1 respectively). Two isoforms of the NKCC1/Slc12a2 gene result from keeping (isoform 1) or skipping (isoform 2) exon 21 in the final gene product. 
NKCC1 is widely distributed throughout the human body; it has important functions in organs that secrete fluids. It is found specifically in the kidney, where it extracts sodium, potassium, and chloride from the urine so they can be reabsorbed into the blood. 
In addition to exocrine glands, NKCC1 is necessary for establishing the potassium-rich endolymph that bathes part of the cochlea, an organ necessary for hearing. Inhibition of NKCC1, as with furosemide or other loop diuretics, can result in deafness. 
NKCC2 is specifically found in cells of the thick ascending limb of the loop of Henle and the macula densa in nephrons, the basic functional units of the kidney. Within these cells, NKCC2 resides in the apical membrane abutting the nephron's lumen, which is the hollow space containing urine. It thus serves both in sodium absorption and in tubuloglomerular feedback. 
Furosemide and other loop diuretics inhibit the activity of NKCC2, thereby impairing sodium reabsorption in the thick ascending limb of the loop of Henle. The action of these loop diuretics also reduces potassium reabsorption through the NKCC2 cotransporter and consequently increases tubular flow rate which enhances potassium secretion and emphasises the hypokalaemic effect. 
NKCC1 and NKCC2 are encoded by genes on the long arms of chromosomes 15 and 5, respectively.  A loss of function mutation of NKCC2 produces Bartter syndrome, an autosomal recessive disorder characterized by hypokalemic metabolic alkalosis with normal to low blood pressure. 
He was born in Cuero, Texas, the son of Wade E. and Lucynthia McDade Jones. A member of the Omega Psi Phi fraternity, he received his A.B. degree from Fisk University in 1931, and followed it with postgraduate study as a Social Science Research Council Fellow at the University of Chicago in 1931-1932. 
Jones returned to Fisk, where he continued to work closely with Charles S. Johnson, as a research assistant, supervisor of field studies, and instructor in the Department of Social Sciences from 1932 to 1942. In 1949 the two co-wrote A Statistical Analysis of Southern Counties; Shifts in the Negro Population of Alabama. 
Jones was a Julius Rosenwald Foundation Fund Fellow at Columbia University, where he was awarded an M.A. degree in 1939 with the thesis "Occupational Stratification Among Rural and Small Town Negroes before the Civil War and Today." He earned his Ph.D. in 1955. 
Almost immediately following Jones's March 1943 recordings at Fort Valley, he served for three years in the United States Army, and became a reports analyst for the domestic branch of the Bureau of Special Services, Office of War Information. He was associate editor of the Negro Yearbook in 1952 and contributed articles to journals. 
Jones spent much of the remainder of his career at Tuskegee Institute School of Education, as assistant professor of sociology, director of research for the Rural Life Council, research coordinator, and professor. He was a consultant to a variety of organizations, including the Opportunities Industrialization Centers, the Bureau of Social Science Research, and the U.S. Department of Labor. 
At the time of his death, Lewis Jones was a professor of sociology and director of the Tuskegee Institute Rural Development Center. 
Steven Cliff is an American scientist and transportation official who is the nominee to serve as administrator of the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration. 
Cliff earned a Bachelor of Science and PhD in chemistry from the University of California, San Diego. He completed post-doctoral studies at the University of California, Davis Department of Land, Air and Water Resources. 
Philippe Cuervo (born 13 August 1969) is a French former professional footballer who played as a defender or midfielder. 
This biographical article related to a Russian swimmer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a Paralympic medalist of Russia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 2016, Kalra hosted the fifth season of MasterChef India, a series based on the original British version, MasterChef, alongside Vikas Khanna and Kunal Kapur. Brands owned by Kalra are Masala Library, Made In Punjab, Farzi Cafe, Pa Pa Ya, Masala Bar, KODE, BBQ'D, Rivers TO Oceans, BO-TAI, YOUNION, TYGR, Mithai By Jiggs Kalra, Hotel ShangHigh, BO-TAI Switch, +94 Bombay, Swan, Butter Delivery, Louis Burgers. 
Zorawar Kalra is the first restaurateur to be felicitated with the 'Restaurateur of the Year' award at 'GQ Men of the Year 2017'. 
DIVO IOSEPPO DEIPARAE VIRGINIS CUSTODI / FIDISS COELITUSQ DESTINATO HVIVSCE / ARAE COMUNI AERE ERECTORES DEVOTI / ALACRESQ EREXERE / DIE II IVNII
The painting depicts an episode in the infancy of Jesus narrated in apocryphal Gospel of Pseudo-Matthew: while returning to Palestine after the Flight into Egypt and during a break in the shade of a date palm, the Sacred Family were fed thanks to the tree, which, folding extraordinarily, offered its fruits to the travelers.  
The Virgin is represented in the act of collecting the fruits, with a bowl of water miraculously appearing to quench Jesus' thirst. From this the traditional name of the work is derived. The title with which it is known also signified the importance that Correggio wished to place, as with his Madonna of the Basket on the simple object of the bowl. 
This iconography was not often used in Italian artistic production. It was, however, more frequent to the North, as displayed by the works of Albrecht Altdorfer and Lucas Cranach. 
The protagonist role of Joseph was a response to the needs of the Fraternity that commissioned the painting. The image is constructed on a diagonal line, that opens on the left with the bowl of silver and follows the intertwining of hands by the Virgin, Baby Jesus, and Joseph. The pose of Jesus, in a calculated contrapposto, allows him to act as a link between the represented scene and the real world of the observer, to whom he turns a knowing gaze. 
On high, a glory of angels frees itself in an animated spiral that recalls the Correggio's frescoes for his Assumption of the Virgin in the Parma duomo. 
In the end, most of them become pillars of the community and family men. Still, the tone of the tale is not particularly moralistic. 
The novel was adopted into a children's picture book with all the characters being changed into dogs or birds, which was named "The Seven Dog Brothers: Being a Doggerel Version of The Seven Brothers, Aleksis Kivi's Classic Novel from 1870". The book was published in 2002 and is credited to Mauri Kunnas, a Finnish children's author, and Tarja Kunnas.  Mr. Clutterbuck from "Goodnight, Mr. Clutterbuck" also by Mauri Kunnas makes an appearance in the story. 
Thomas Raeside was a Scottish football player, who played for Dumbarton and King's Park during the 1910s and 1920s. He also had a short loan spell with Bo'ness. 
This biographical article related to a defender from Scotland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Players and squad numbers last updated on 1 September 1988.Note: Flags indicate national team as has been defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Includes all competitive matches. The list is sorted alphabetically by surname when total goals are equal. 
This article related to a French film of the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Athetis striolata is a moth of the family Noctuidae. It was described by Arthur Gardiner Butler in 1886. It is found on Fiji and in Australia (the Northern Territory, Queensland and New South Wales). 
Between 1999 and May 2009, when she retired, she was the manager of Systembolaget, the Swedish state alcoholic beverage retailing monopoly. In that role she was forced to cope with a full blown corruption scandal, involving bribery of shop managers and senior staff by some major suppliers, including Vin & Sprit, formerly the producing and importing division of the Swedish state monopoly. Vin & Sprit is now owned by Pernod Ricard. 
Manning was born in Edenton, Chowan County, North Carolina on July 30, 1830. He graduated from the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill in 1850; studied law; was admitted to the bar in 1853 and commenced practice in Pittsboro. 
Later, Manning was a member of the State constitutional convention in 1875; a member of the State house of representatives in 1881; and a commissioner to codify the laws of the State in 1881.  He became a professor of law at his alma mater, the University of North Carolina, and was also a member of its board of trustees from 1881-1899. Manning died in Chapel Hill, N.C., on February 12, 1899. 
Luke Godden (born 21 September 1978) is a former Australian rules footballer in the Australian Football League 
He first called himself "Natur-Klang" before he decided to choose the stage name "Parra for Cuva". His stage name originates in various Spanish words and means between the world / for / Cuva. 
During the arrangement of the title song, the percussion track was accidentally dragged to infinity, which resulted in a trance inducing meditative sound that gave them the idea for the title. Watching Turkish dervish dancers while listening should therefore enhance the listening experience. 
Non so ballare is the third solo studio album of the Italian sing-songwriter Annalisa, published on February 14, 2013 by label Warner Music Italy. 
The record shows both sides of the coin with a "b-side" more emotional, intimate and interior. The awareness of its limitations is the thread that ties all the songs, even those of the "side" that deal with lightness, humor and precautions weighty themes such as addiction and the femicide.
The title refers to original song Non so ballare, presented by the singer in the Sanremo Music Festival 2013. 
The album debuted at ninth place in the ranking FIMI Albums chart, In the following week Non so ballare that reached the six position in the official Italian album chart.  In FIMI year-end, the album ranked as the 89th best-selling album in Italy in 2013. 
The third and final season of Rapunzel's Tangled Adventure premiered on October 7, 2019, and concluded on March 1, 2020. 
Rapunzel's Tangled Adventure: Plus Est En Vous (Music from the TV Series) is the fourth soundtrack album from the Tangled franchise. It was released on March 6, 2020, by Walt Disney Records. 
This Warren County, Mississippi state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Start Up Citywide is an agency funded through the British Government's Neighbourhood Renewal Fund and is located in Stoke on Trent, Staffordshire, England. 
NRF monies, allocated to multi-agency Local Strategic Partnerships (LSPs) in areas assessed as suffering from the greatest levels of deprivation, aim to support social regeneration and to reduce relative deprivation in those areas (such as health inequalities, educational underachievement and high crime rates). 
Start Up Citywide addresses the educational underachievement and worklessness strands amongst others, and works with parents of children up to age 16 to help them re-engage with training and move them closer to, and into, employment.  To date well over 2000 parents within Stoke-on-Trent have been service-users, receiving advice and guidance on a one-to-one basis on training and employment related issues. 
Part of Stoke-on-Trent and North Staffordshire YMCA, Start Up Citywide has a partnership agreement with Stoke-on-Trent City Council to offer services from Phase I Children's Centres within the City.  This means that the agency's support workers are available throughout the City and help work to address issues of worklessness. 
Barriers which prevent parents moving into training and work are identified and an individual action plan is developed by the service-user's support worker.  Advice is then given and referrals are made, where appropriate, to other agencies who can help with the process.  Courses are also offered by the programme and support is given to remove barriers such as childcare costs and transport. 
Between 2003 and October 2006, the agency's lead and accountable body was North Stoke Primary Care Trust (NSPCT).  During this time, the NSPCT was responsible for a number of Sure Start (Wave 5) programmes in the city. Sure Start is a UK Government initiative, originating in the Treasury, with the aim of "giving children the best possible start in life". 
Start Up Citywide came into being when best practice of two smaller-scale projects based with Sure Start Centres at Abbey Bucknall/Bentilee and Longton were combined.  These two projects were known as Work-Start (funded by the European Social Fund), and Start Up Longton South (funded by the European Regional Development Fund) respectively. 
In January 2008 Start Up Citywide once again received additional funding from the European Social Fund to extend the programme's work into Summer 2008 and between 2009 and 2011 continued through the Working Neighbourhoods Fund. 
The service was recently named subcontractor for the Government's flagship Work Programme, offering services across Stoke-on-Trent and North Staffordshire to support long-termed unemployed adults into sustainable employment. 
This article about Egyptology or subjects relating to Ancient Egypt is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 1996, she taught at University of Sussex, and was a member of the political science department at the Center for Cultural Studies at Goldsmiths, University of London. She studies the problem of colonial slavery and the phenomena of creolization using political theories using postcolonial logic. 
She is a member of the MAFED (Collective of the March of Women for Dignity), a group that the political scientist Laurent de Boissieu located in the political field of racialism and defines as close to the Indigenous Party of the Republic. She is also a member of the College of Diversity at the Ministry of Culture and a founding member of the Decolonizing the Arts collective. 
A special edition of the album with a new track listing was released a year later on 25 August 2014 and replaced the band's first full-length US release, (which subsequently was deleted from online services). It features four tracks from their previous self-titled debut studio album. 
The artwork for Rituals features a photograph taken by South African professional photographer Andrew McGibbon. The photograph, entitled Stars Bow, features a horse named Star, lit in Strobe lighting, taking a "bow" in front of the camera. The photograph is part of a series of photographs taken by McGibbon as a collection entitled All the Wild Horses, which was originally released online in April 2012.  The artist statement for the work states: 
"For thousands of years the horse has been mankind's closest ally. The horse made travel and development possible. We tethered, weighted and reigned them. We captured, stabled and trained them. 
 Painstakingly lit, this body of work is about the horse itself to which we all feel a connection, whether it's obvious or deep down in our collective subconscious. There is a sense of awe that this beast inspires in each and everyone of us".
Bronson Hill (born January 2, 1993) is a former American football running back. He played college football at Eastern Michigan. 
In 2015, Hill was signed by the Buffalo Bills as an undrafted free agent. In his first four preseason games there, he led his team in rushing attempts and was second on his team in rushing yards (92 yards). He was waived during final roster cuts. 
Throughout the regular season, Hill was on the practice squads of the Chicago Bears, Miami Dolphins, and the New Orleans Saints. 
On February 2, 2016, Hill signed a reserve/future contract with the Cincinnati Bengals. During the preseason, he rushed for a total of 18 yards. On September 3, 2016, he was waived by the team. 
On September 5, 2016, Hill was signed to the Jacksonville Jaguars' practice squad. He was promoted to the Jaguars' active roster on December 10, 2016. 
On August 12, 2017, Hill signed with the Minnesota Vikings. He was waived on September 2, 2017 and was signed to the Vikings' practice squad the next day. He was released on November 7, 2017. 
On November 20, 2017, Hill was signed to the Arizona Cardinals' practice squad. He was promoted to the active roster on November 28, 2017. On December 16, 2017, Hill was waived by the Cardinals, but was re-signed three days later. He was released by the Cardinals on May 10, 2018. 
In 2018, Hill signed with the Arizona Hotshots of the Alliance of American Football for the 2019 season. He later joined the Atlanta Legends, but failed to make the final roster. He was placed on injured reserve after clearing waivers. The league ceased operations in April 2019. 
The park was established to protect the unique peninsula section of the Venezuelan Coastal Range, whose flora and fauna are characteristic of the Venezuelan Guiana. 
Boyarskaya is located 25 km west of Tarnogsky Gorodok (the district's administrative centre) by road. Katerinino is the nearest rural locality. 
This is part of the list of United Kingdom locations: a gazetteer of place names in the United Kingdom showing each place's locality and geographical coordinates. 
The Thousand Mile Summer by Colin Fletcher is the author's chronicle of his 1958 hike along the entire eastern edge of California. Fletcher writes of traveling on foot along the Colorado River, though Death Valley and the High Sierra. The book was first published in 1964. 
God is light, we are told, and Hell is outer darkness. But look at a desert mountain stripped bare by the sun, and you learn only geography. Watch darkness claim it, and for a moment you may grasp why God had to create Satan--or man to create both.
The list of the kings of Strathclyde concerns the kings of Alt Clut, later Strathclyde, a Brythonic kingdom in what is now western Scotland. 
Gomphrena agrestis is a plant native to Cerrado vegetation in Brazil. This plant is cited in Flora Brasiliensis  by Carl Friedrich Philipp von Martius. 
The Fayette County Civic and Welfare League was established in 1959 in order to advocate for equal voting rights for the African American community in Fayette County, Tennessee. Through a rigorous voter registration drive, local African Americans were able to change the political climate of the county and gain national attention for the work toward equality during the 1950s-1960s era of the Civil Rights Movement 
Gaining national attention from The New York Times, James Forman, from the Emergency Relief Committee of Chicago's Congress on Racial Equality, and John Doar, an attorney at the Justice Department for President Eisenhower's and President Kennedy's administrations began to speak up. Fayette County began their own advocacy, cultivating leaders such as John and Viola McFerren, Harpman and Minnie Jameson, Square and Wilola Mormon, Reverend June Dowdy and many others. 
The Bourne Brook or Black Brook, as it is known in its upper reaches, is a tributary of the River Tame in Staffordshire, England. 
From its source near Aldridge (originally in Staffordshire, but now in the West Midlands county), where it is known as the Black Brook, it flows north, to the west and north of the village of Shenstone, then flows east past Weeford and Hints where the name changes to the Bourne Brook. It then continues through the grounds of Drayton Manor Theme Park and then to its confluence with the River Tame near Fazeley. 
This is a list of schools in Sabah, Malaysia. Schools are categorised according to their types and education districts (for schools which do not fall under the direct rule of Ministry of Education) and is arranged alphabetically in Malay language. Note that only some notable schools are abbreviated.  
Kamoyapithecus is known exclusively by its teeth and jaws. The type specimen, KNM-LS 7, was a right maxillary jaw fragment found during the expedition in 1948. Through this fossil as well as more recent fragments of mandibles and teeth, it has been found that Kamoyapithecus had very large and robust canines. The canines appear to have a distinctive tip that links Kamoyapithecus with hominoid genus Proconsul. 
Its teeth also have been found through plane film X-ray to not be thickly enamelled. This suggests that Kamoyapithecus had more emphasis on foods that did not involve heavy wearing, such as soft fruits, nuts and seeds. This would have been well-placed in the Late-Oligocene in Africa, when forests covered a lot of the land. 
Similar affinities with the jaw fragments have been seen with Afropithecus, Proconsul, and the Morotopithecus, but nothing definitive can be stated as to the relationship between these genera and Kamoyapithecus as the fossil material is very fragmentary. 
In 1954, Campbell made Cleveland, Ohio, her home and thus began her career as a figurative artist of Northeast Ohio. In 1957, she received the First Award for Painting in the Cleveland Museum of Art Annual May Show for Requiem for Dominic. This painting was purchased and is now in the permanent collection of the Cleveland Museum of Art. 
In 1978, Campbell was honored with a Distinguished Alumnae retrospective exhibition by the Cleveland Institute of Art. The Motorcycle Series was shown at this exhibition. 
Her work has been exhibited in two solo shows at the Butler Institute of American Art, Cleveland Institute of Art, Canton Museum of Art, Cuyahoga Community College, College of Wooster, Baldwin-Wallace College and Karamu House. 
Campbell's work is in the permanent collections of museums such as The Cleveland Museum of Art, Butler Institute of American Art, Evanston Museum of Art and the Canton Museum of Art. 
In 1999 Shirley Aley Campbell's work was permanently archived in the collection of The Artists Archives of the Western Reserve. As part of the archival process, she was photographed by Herbert Ascherman Jr. 
Two Red Tulips is  characteristic of Campbell's paintings of the marginalized members of Society. It shows Transvestites and Burlesque Dancers. 
Vietnamese Family is from Campbell's Motorcycle Series and depicts a family escaping from war-torn Vietnam on a single motorcycle. 
Campbell's 1977 portrait of Congresswoman Mary Rose Oakar is part of the permanent collection of the ArtNEO Museum in Cleveland, Ohio. 
In addition to retail properties, there are large office developments located in the area including several companies headquartered in the triangle; the world headquarters of TJX is located at the junction of Route 30 and Speen St, as is the main office of IDG and IDC. Breyers, Leggat McCall, the American Heart Association and the American Cancer Society have facilities in the area. In all there are over a dozen large office complexes located in and along the borders of the Triangle. 
In the 1950s, when Shopper's World was constructed, the area was a mixture of farmland and single-family housing. Since that time, the majority of the single-family homes were razed and replaced with commercial properties or turned into commercial properties. The remaining homes in the area are found at the west end of the Triangle in several small subdivisions. 
The district of Benambra was created by the Electoral Act Amendment Act 1876. taking effect at the 1877 elections. 
The district has been held by various conservative parties unbroken since 1877, with the Liberal Party taking the seat from the Nationals in 1976 and retaining it since. 
The district of Benambra is named after Benambra, a small town 28km north of Omeo in Gippsland. The town of Benambra is not actually located in the electoral district. Benambra is thought to be Aboriginal in origin meaning hills with big trees or men spearing eels. 
Nick Carter is an Italian comic strip created in 1972 as a semi-animated cartoon, for Gulp!, one of the most popular Italian TV shows of that decade. The creators were Guido De Maria, as director and writer, and Franco Bonvicini ("Bonvi"), as co-writer and artist.  The first run comprised 11 stories, later reissued, as print comic strips for Il Corriere dei Ragazzi, and then in numerous other magazines and books. 
In 1977 the character was revamped for the follow-on TV series SuperGulp!, with 17 further episodes. 
The Nick Carter episodes number some 80, including those created for TV and later adapted for comic-strip magazines. Several stories were drawn by Silver (Guido Silvestri) and Clod (Claudio Onesti). 
Nick Carter stories feature a great number of parodies of famous themes and characters of literature, film, TV and history. An incomplete list includes: 
The Tatiara country was opened up by European settlers in the 1840s for grazing purposes, with the township of Bordertown established in 1852, slowly expanding as more graziers moved to the area. 
After significant growth in the area, the District Council of Tatiara was formed in 1876 as constituting the whole of the Hundred of Tatiara. 
In 1884, a neighbouring council was established, the District Council of Wirrega; however this was short-lived, and in 1888 it was amalgamated into the Tatiara District Council. 
In the years following, a number of new towns including Keith and Padthaway were established, and grew to their current sizes. 
It includes the towns and localities of Bangham, Bordertown, Bordertown South, Brimbago, Buckingham, Cannawigara, Carew, Custon, Keith, Kongal, Laffer, Lowan Vale, Makin, McCallum, Mount Charles, Mundulla, Mundulla West, Shaugh, Swede Flat, Padthaway, Petherick, Pine Hill, Pooginagoric, Senior, Sherwood, Western Flat, Willalooka, Wirrega and Wolseley, and part of Ngarkat. 
The district has most of the usual facilities including a range of facilities for tourists and travellers. Accommodation is available in the major towns in the form of hotels and caravan parks with a variety of shops such as supermarkets, bakeries and roadhouses for supplies. 
The district possesses a range of sporting facilities including a golf course, basketball and tennis courts and a football and cricket oval, with clubs established for those sports. Health facilities include a hospital and dentist, with the area also having a primary and high school. 
There is independent verification of the disastrous voyage, although different in several details from Norwood's account, in a petition to the High Court of Admiralty in 1650, by dependents of crew members, against the captain and owners of The Virginia Merchant. 
In 1664 he was posted to Tangier as Colonel of the Queen's Royal Regiment, the known as the Tangier Regiment of Foot, who provided a garrison for the town. Tangier had been part of the dowry of Catherine of Braganza when she married Charles II of England in 1662, but was constantly under threat of attack by native forces. 
In June 1666 he took over as Governor of Tangier from John, Baron Belasyse, who as a devout Catholic had felt unable to accept the Act of Uniformity and resigned. He returned to England himself in 1669, replaced as colonel and governor by John Middleton, Earl of Middleton. 
In a disputed by-election in 1675 he was returned as the Member of Parliament for Gloucester but was not declared duly elected for another three years. Not a very active member, he did not seek re-election in 1679. He was also appointed a Deputy-Lieutenant for the county in 1683, serving as such, with a short break, until his death. 
He died unmarried on 14 September 1689 and was buried in St Peter's churchyard, Leckhampton, having devised his Leckhampton estate to the sons of the cousin from whom he had bought it. 
In 1257, Yuzbak commenced an expedition to the Kamrup region and Koch Hajo, both in present-day Assam. There, Yuzbak and his forces were faced by the battalion of Sandhya, the erstwhile Rai of Kamrup in Kamarupanagara. With the help of the seasonal spring floods, Sandhya defeated and captured Yuzbak and had him executed in due course. 
Following the execution, Yuzbak's domain was split into two with Narasimhadeva I of Eastern Ganga breaking the alliance and taking over the areas he had lost. Yuzbak's fellow tribesman, Ijjauddin Balban Iuzbaki, succeeded him as Governor of Bengal for the Delhi Sultanate. 
Marianna Gartner (born 1963) is a Canadian painter.  Gartner was born in Winnipeg, Manitoba, but moved to Calgary, Alberta during her early childhood. She has also lived and worked in Budapest and Berlin. Gartner has exhibited and been collected mainly in Berlin, Paris, New York, Vienna, Budapest and Zurich. She currently lives and works in Victoria, British Columbia, Canada. 
Her paintings, often inspired by subjects in old photographs but manipulated to "create scenes which can challenge a contemporary viewer", have been variously described as "disquiet" and having a "haunting quality". 
Arthur Humphreys Foord was born, with his twin brother Alfred Stanley Foord, in Brixton, Surrey on 14 September 1844. His parents were Sarah Stanley Hooper and John Bromley Foord. He had three older brothers, including his twin. His father was secretary to the General Mining Association of Nova Scotia in London. He attended a preparatory school from 1853 to 1856, when he entered Chatham House School, Ramsgate, Kent in 1857. 
In 1859, Ma al-'Aynayn settled in the oasis of Tindouf in present-day Algeria. Ma al-'Aynayn was a nickname he received as a child, meaning "water of the two eyes" in Arabic, in reference to the Qadiriya Sheikh Sidi Ahmed El Bekkay who immigrated to Oualata a few centuries earlier. The son of a famous Marabout, he quickly became known as a great scholar. His nomadic encampment attracted many students of Islamic law. In 1887 he was appointed as Caid of Tindouf by the sultan of Morocco Hassan I. 
In 1898, Ma al-'Aynayn began building a Ribat in Smara, in the Spanish Sahara (present-day Western Sahara). His goal in creating the Ribat, which was previously just a water center for travelers, was to launch attacks on European colonial forces and particularly the French. The Moroccan sultan Abdelaziz assisted him in building the Ribat, as he sent craftsmen, materials, financing and arms, and also appointed him Caid. In 1902, he moved there creating among other things an Islamic library. 
In 1910, anarchy spread through Morocco, as the new Sultan grew ever weaker under European pressures. Ma al-'Aynayn, concerned that Morocco would fall into European hands, decided to extend Jihad north of Tiznit at the head of an army of 6,000 men to overthrow the new Sultan Abdelhafid. He was defeated by French General Moinier, on June 23, 1910. He would die several months later at Tiznit, on October 23 of the same year. 
A few years after Ma al-'Aynayn's death, his son El-Hiba, known as The Blue Sultan, continued the war against the French, but was ultimately defeated. 
Ma al-'Aynayn enjoyed tremendous prestige and his name is invoked by both the Morocco and the Polisario Front. For Moroccans, he embodied the idea of unity of Morocco and the Sahara. Many descendants of Ma al-'Aynayn hold high-profile offices in Morocco as well as in the Polisario Front and in Mauritania. 
The 1930 United States Senate election in Maine was held on September 8, 1930. Incumbent Republican U.S. Senator Arthur Gould, who had been elected to complete the term of the late Senator Bert Fernald, did not run for re-election to a full term. 
In the Republican primary, U.S. Representative Wallace H. White Jr. defeated former Governor of Maine Owen Brewster. White easily won the general election over Democrat Frank Haskell. 
Antonio Robinson (born on November 11, 1985) is a former American football wide receiver. He was signed by the Chicago Bears as an undrafted free agent in 2010. He later won Super Bowl XLV as a member of the Green Bay Packers, defeating the Pittsburgh Steelers. He played college football for Nicholls State University. He most recently was a member of the Winnipeg Blue Bombers of the Canadian Football League but was cut April 17, 2014 during Training Camp. 
Robinson was signed to the Seattle Seahawks' practice squad on November 9, 2010, and was released on November 23. 
The coat of arms of British Columbia is the heraldic symbol representing the Canadian province of British Columbia. The arms contains symbols reflecting British Columbia's British heritage along with local symbols. At the upper part of the shield is the Union Jack, representing the United Kingdom. The lower portion of the shield features a golden sun setting into the ocean, representing the province's location on the Pacific. 
The original arms, consisting of only the shield, were granted by royal warrant of King Edward VII on March 31, 1906. The arms were further augmented with supporters, a crest, and a compartment, by royal warrant of Queen Elizabeth II on October 15, 1987. 
The first heraldic provincial symbol was the Great Seal of the province: the royal crest of the crowned lion upon the imperial crown, as was the usual practice for British colonies, but with the letters "BC" added. This design was created by Richard Clement Moody This design was used upon British Columbia joining Confederation. 
The shield only (with the positions of the Union Flag and setting sun reversed, and with the antique crown added), along with the motto, was granted in 1906. The achievement of arms was augmented with a crest, supporters, and compartment granted by Queen Elizabeth II, on 15 October 1987. 
A country granting transit rights may impose fees for the privilege.  The reasonableness of such fees has caused controversy at times. 
The fifth freedom has been discussed in 2017 in connection with the Saint Helena Airport. Flights (by a South African airline) serving it have to refuel at Windhoek Airport; but they are not allowed to board more passengers coming from connecting flights, which means that passengers from Cape Town must do a detour over Johannesburg with fairly little connecting time, with risk of missing the once-weekly flight. 
While sixth freedom operations are rarely legally-restricted, they may be controversial: for example, Qantas has complained that Emirates, Singapore Airlines and other sixth-freedom carriers have unfair advantages in the market between Europe and Australia. 
On 2 October 2007, the United Kingdom and Singapore signed an agreement that allowed unlimited seventh freedom rights from 30 March 2018, along with a full exchange of other freedoms of the air. 
Cabotage is the transport of goods or passengers between two points in the same country by a vessel or an aircraft registered in another country. Originally a shipping term, cabotage now covers aviation, railways and road transport. It is "trade or navigation in coastal waters, or, the exclusive right of a country to operate the air traffic within its territory". 
The unofficial modified sixth freedom is the right to carry passengers or cargo between two points in one foreign country, while making a stop in the home country. 
For example, (the unofficial modified sixth freedom): a Canadian carrier departs from a US airport, stops in its Canadian hub and departs/continues onward to a different US airport. 
The right to carry passengers or cargo within a foreign country without continuing service to or from one's own country, is sometimes known as "stand-alone cabotage". It differs from the aviation definition of "true cabotage", in that it does not directly relate to one's own country. 
George Bullock was born in Birmingham, where his mother ran an exhibition of wax models  in the late 1790s. His brother, William Bullock, opened a museum of curiosities in the city in 1800. He  moved it to Liverpool the next year, and George went with him. 
At about this time, a guide to Liverpool described his Grecian Rooms as offering "an extensive assortment of elegant and fashionable furniture; as also, statues, figures, tripods, candelabra, antique lamps, sphinxes, griffins, &c., in marble, bronze, and artificial stone." Bullock also stocked "a good collection of ancient and modern busts; among the latter, those of many of the most distinguished characters in Liverpool and its neighbourhood, modelled by himself." 
Carmel College is a Catholic secondary school for girls located in Milford on Auckland's North Shore. It was established by the Sisters of Mercy in 1957 starting with a student roll of only 15 girls. The College's brother school is nearby Rosmini College. 
In 1957, the long-held dream of the Sisters of Mercy to establish a Catholic girls' school on the North Shore was realised. Carmel College is the Mercy Charism at the heart or centre of the school. 
Sister Mary Justine Gillies was given the mission of founding Carmel College on donated land, initially with 15 students and no actual classrooms. Sister Justine gathered dedicated teaching Sisters and, as the school grew, these Sisters were joined by the first full-time lay teacher, Verena Butler, in 1963. 
Under Sister Pauline Engel, the third principal of the College, who was appointed in 1983, the college undertook an extensive programme of building, expanding and refurbishing. This included building a gymnasium, a food and technology block, an arts block, and the refurbishment of the science laboratories. 
On 19 June 2013, Bishop Patrick Dunn and the mayor of Auckland, Len Brown, opened the Harkins Building, which included a classroom block to accommodate music, drama, information technology and social sciences, a performing arts centre seating 160, a large covered atrium providing break-out teaching and social spaces, and a new library overlooking Lake Pupuke. 
Carmel celebrated its 50th jubilee in June 2007 with a reunion of many Carmel old girls, in celebrations lasting a week including songs by various music groups, a wall of photographic remembrance, and a time capsule to be dug up at the college's centennial. 
Carmel College students take part in a range of activities throughout New Zealand including Stage Challenge, Big Sing Choral Festival and Polyfest. The school has a number of clubs, including the Human Rights Group, Creative Writers' Club, Students Against Driving Drunk (SADD), Young Vinnies and the SAVE environmental group. 
Prasophyllum secutum, commonly known as the northern leek orchid, is a species of orchid endemic to Tasmania. It has a single tubular, green leaf and up to thirty scented, light brown flowers with a whitish labellum. It is only known from 18 populations and the total population is estimated to number fewer than 500 plants. 
Prasophyllum secutum was first formally described in 1998 by David Jones from a specimen collected on Anthony Beach near Smithton and the description was published in Australian Orchid Research. The specific epithet (secutum) is a Latin word meaning "followed" referring to this species flowering more prolifically after fire. 
The northern leek orchid grows in dense coastal scrub between sand dunes. It is found in northern Tasmania and on some of the islands in Bass Strait. 
The total number of mature plants of P. secutum is difficult to estimate because they only flower after fire and many populations have not been observed for several decades. About 250 plants are known from two populations and the total number in all populations is estimated to be about 500. The main threats to the species are land clearing, habitat disturbance, inappropriate fire regimes and small population size. 
Joseph Dale Marlin LaPlante (born May 14, 1981), better known for his stage name Joey Stylez, is a Canadian singer and rapper. 
In 1996, there were no protocol standards for Voice over IP. Ten years later, Zimmermann released the successor to PGPfone, Zfone and ZRTP, a newer and secure VoIP protocol based on modern VoIP standards.  Zfone builds on the ideas of PGPfone. 
According to the MIT PGPfone web page, "MIT is no longer distributing PGPfone. Given that the software has not been maintained since 1997, we doubt it would run on most modern systems." 
WALA-TV, virtual channel 10 (VHF digital channel 9), is a Fox-affiliated television station licensed to Mobile, Alabama, United States and also serving Pensacola, Florida. The station is owned by the Meredith Local Media subsidiary of Des Moines, Iowa-based Meredith Corporation. WALA-TV's studios are located on Satchel Paige Drive in Mobile, with an additional studio and news bureau on Executive Plaza Drive in Pensacola. The station's transmitter is located in Spanish Fort, Alabama. 
WALA-TV operates a 24-hour local weather channel called "Weather Now" which is available on Cox Communications digital channel 698 in Pensacola; it is not carried on Comcast Xfinity on the Alabama side of the market. 
For most its first four decades on the air, WALA was the market's ratings leader. As the more established outlet, WALA got the strongest syndicated programming and it had the top-rated local newscasts. Even today, WALA continues to dominate in local news viewership, even after the affiliation switch from NBC to Fox. 
Emmis bought WB affiliate WBPG (channel 55, now WFNA) in 2003, creating a duopoly with channel 10; WBPG's operations were subsequently merged with WALA at the latter station's facility on Satchel Paige Drive. 
WALA-TV discontinued regular programming on its analog signal, over VHF channel 10, on June 12, 2009, the official date in which full-power television stations in the United States transitioned from analog to digital broadcasts under federal mandate. The station's digital signal remained on its pre-transition VHF channel 9. Through the use of PSIP, digital television receivers display the station's virtual channel as its former VHF analog channel 10. 
Forensic pathologist Chen Xueming (Edmund Chen) and CID officer Wu Pinyu (Ivy Lee) work together on several manslaughter cases, each of which involves unnatural phenomenons that can only be described as supernatural such as reality-bending, cryokinesis, walking dead/vampirism, time-travel and plant-human hybrids 
Case 1: A woman named Liao Yongwei (Vivian Lai) having an extra-marital affair with paraplegic Li Zeyuan (Chen Tianwen) is drowned. When Zeyuan is hospitalised, Yongwei's estranged husband is mysteriously attacked at a bowling alley and later burnt at the hospital. 
Case 2: Xueming and Pinyu are called to a string of bodies which showed signs of having been frozen at some point, beginning with two police officers who had been escorting a shoplifter. Nothing seems to match up and their best lead is a mentally disturbed young woman, the same woman that the officers had arrested for shoplifting. 
Case 3: A vehicle accident fatality was reportedly seen walking out of the ambulance. Shortly after, several accidents and incidents connected to the "dead man" occur but the presence of blood and no matching victim proves baffling. It wasn't long before a string of corpses of criminals wanted by the police are found drained of their blood, making Xueming and Pinyu suspect they might be dealing with no ordinary criminal. 
Case 4: A man discovers he can return to certain points of time, only to learn that time is not something to be messed with 
Case 5: A series of incidents ultimately leads to Xueming discovering that his lover Li Yiwen (Priscelia Chan) is in fact a plant-human hybrid. This discovery would lead to tragedy as Yiwen is later found dead, having seemingly been killed in a brutal manner... 
Nambour Crushers Rugby League Football Club is an Australian rugby league football club based in Nambour, Queensland formed in 1955. The club was established when two Nambour local teams merge; South Magpies and the All Whites. 
Gaius Furius Pacilus Fusus was a Roman statesman of the early Republic.  He was a descendant of the ancient patrician house of the Furii, which filled the highest offices of the Roman state from the early decades of the Republic to the first century AD.  He was probably closely related to Quintus Furius Pacilus Fusus, whom Livy mentions as Pontifex Maximus in 449 BC, and was likely the father of Gaius Furius Pacilus, consul in 412 BC. 
Gonolobus barbatus  is a species of plant in the family Apocynaceae that is native to Campeche, Mexico. 
At the annual meeting in 1858 members authorized the board to reward fire companies who were called to assist with fires, and those who successfully saved the property. This new legislation was the first step in developing more efficient firefighting methods in the Galt region. 
1895, Gore Mutual's new building in Galt was completed. The building stands over 80 feet tall and was built with dark red bricks and sandstone trim. It is revolutionary with hot water heating as well as gas and electrical light. The building quickly emerged as a local landmark for the people of Galt. 
1914, Gore Mutual donated $50,000, which was the previous year's, profits to help aid the War Effort Patriotic Fund. 
1936, Gore Mutual's current building was completed. Built by Scottish stonemasons using local, handpicked stone, it was built on a hill top surrounded by gardens. Lieutenant-Governor Herbert A. Bruce officially opened the building. 
In the early 1970s Gore Mutual hired Brantford architects Mark Musselman, McIntyre & Combe to design a new building that was to be attached to the existing head office built in 1937. The two buildings are connected by a glass passageway that extends 60 feet from the old to new building. 
For over 100 years Gore Mutual has been donating to charities in the communities where they do business. In 1998 Gore Mutual incorporated the Gore Mutual Insurance Foundation. Incorporating the Gore Mutual Foundation registered it as private charity funding statues, which has the benefit of being tax free allowing for an increase in yearly donations. There are two ways to apply for donations, 
Support the communities served by Gore Mutual Insurance Company by aiding social services, education, health, cultural and environmental activities as may be in the best interest of these communities. 
Next Horizon is Gore Mutual's 10 year vision and strategy that sets a new path for the company, driven by fast-changing customer expectations and technology. The strategy focuses on the following: Purpose driven, digitally led, becoming a national insurer and expanding Insurance Store (an owned distribution network) into a branded retailer with a fresh approach to customer experience. 
"Our new strategy is bold and will radically transform our business at a magnitude and scale that this company has never experienced before," said Andy Taylor, CEO, in a July 15, 2020 press release. "Ultimately, our transformation journey will take Gore Mutual from a mid-size, regional carrier to a national scale insurer underpinned by world class technology and operations in just a few short years." 
"Sunny Sundae Smile" is a song by the alternative rock band My Bloody Valentine. It was released as a non-album single in February 1987 on Lazy Records. Recorded at Alaska Studios in London, "Sunny Sundae Smile" was the band's first release on Lazy Records and the final release to feature original vocalist David Conway. 
EAAA's mission statement is: "To alleviate suffering and save lives, by the rapid delivery of specialist clinicians and equipment to accidents and medical emergencies and the subsequent transfer of patients to and between hospitals". 
The charity provides air ambulance cover for East Anglia, in association with East of England Ambulance Service NHS Trust, which provides highly skilled critical care paramedics who fly with the charity. Doctors are seconded from their home NHS trusts. 
EAAA's first aircraft was a Bolkow 105, commissioned from Sterling Aviation.  The aircraft was based at Norwich Airport and had the call sign 'Anglia One'. 
In June 2006, a new helicopter, a MBB/Kawasaki BK 117, G-OEMT, was commissioned from Sterling Aviation.  The aircraft replaced the Bolkow 105, G-EYNL, and went into service as Anglia One.  In August 2007 and second MBB/Kawasaki BK 117, G-RESC, went into service  as Anglia Two. 
In March 2011, EAAA changed operator and moved from Sterling Aviation to interim supplier, Bond Air Services.  Bond later successfully tendered for the contract to operate both helicopters.  During the interim period EAAA flew red aircraft but soon returned to their more familiar yellow livery with the introduction of the Eurocopter EC135. 
In 2012, EAAA commissioned the fully night-capable EC135 T2e and commenced the CAA approval process to begin the night HEMS service. 
When the service was first launched, Anglia One operated for only one day a week.  This was soon expanded to five days a week and later to the current service of seven days a week. 
Typical incidents for which the assistance of the air ambulance is requested include road traffic collisions, horse riding accidents, cardiac arrests and serious falls.  The EAAA team of highly skilled doctors and critical care paramedics also treat many people injured in agricultural, industrial and sporting accidents as well as medical emergencies. 
Airlifted patients are most likely to go to the major trauma centre at Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge, the specialist burns unit in Broomfield Hospital, Chelmsford or the specialist heart attack centre at Norfolk and Norwich Hospital. Patients less severely injured, but where travel would take an excessive amount of time, may be airlifted to their local A&E with trauma unit. 
In May 2013, EAAA received approval to fly night time HEMS missions. The first team was available and ready to fly on 24 May and was called that night to a traffic collision in Essex. The clinicians were flown to the scene where they treated an injured motorcyclist with the aid of night vision equipment. The patient was then flown back to Cambridge where he was taken to the major trauma centre at Addenbrooke's Hospital. 
In 2018, the charity appeared on the Channel 4 TV programme Emergency Helicopter Medics, which follows the crews responding and treating emergency patients. 
For the majority of call-outs Anglia One and Two will carry a crew of four; one pilot, one co-pilot, one critical-care paramedic and one doctor. 
The East of England teams commonly end up working alongside crews from Lincolnshire & Nottinghamshire Air Ambulance, London's Air Ambulance and The Air Ambulance Service, along with other BASICS charities. 
An algorave (from an algorithm and rave) is an event where people dance to music generated from algorithms, often using live coding techniques. Alex McLean of Slub and Nick Collins coined the word "algorave" in 2011, and the first event under such a name was organised in London, UK. It has since become a movement, with algoraves taking place around the world. 
At an algorave the computer musician may not be the main point of focus for the audience and instead attention may be centered on a screen that displays live coding, that is the process of writing source code, so the audience can not just dance or listen to the music generated by the source code but also to see the process of programming. 
Algorave can also be considered an international music movement with a community of electronic musicians, visual artists and developing technologies. See the Algorave category page. 
Felipe Antonio Lira (born April 26, 1972) is a former Major League Baseball pitcher who played for the Detroit Tigers (1995-1997), Seattle Mariners (1997-1998) and Montreal Expos (2000-2001). He batted and threw right-handed. 
This biographical article relating to a Venezuelan baseball pitcher is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Kagua-Erave FC, sometimes stylised as Kagua Erave FC, is a semi-professional association football club based in the Kagua-Erave District in the Southern Highlands of Papua New Guinea. The club was founded in 2018. 
The club competed in the 2019 edition of the Papua New Guinea National Soccer League, having been drawn into the Highlands Conference. The club topped the conference and reached the quarter-finals. 
Mathias-Stinnes-Stadion is a multi-use stadium in Essen, Germany. It is currently used mostly for football matches. The stadium has a capacity of 12,000 people. In 1956 it was used as venue for the first unofficial fixture of a German female national team. 
This article about a North Rhine-Westphalian building or structure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In September 2018, Aalto took a sick leave due to exhaustion and his duties were temporarily handed to the first deputy chair Maria Ohisalo. In October 2018, he announced that he is resigning from his post, citing depression and fatigue. Aalto took part in the 2019 parliamentary election, but was not re-elected. 
KurdishMedia.com was a pro-Kurdish news and commentary website dedicated to providing news and information about Kurds and Kurdistan since August 4, 1998. KurdishMedia.com is an independent information provider, not affiliated to any political or non-political organisation. 
Today, KurdishMedia.com is the most significant repository of information about Kurds and Kurdistan and, with several millions of hits per month, is the most frequently visited Kurdish library.  
The intention of KurdishMedia.com is to continue to make a positive contribution to peace, equality and stability throughout Kurdistan, and: 
Rebwar Fatah is the director and co-founder of KurdishMedia.com. Peshraw Namo is the Webmaster and co-founder of KurdishMedia.com. Welat Lezgin is the editor of KurdishMedia.com. 
Sanlorenzo never accepted the expression "comrades who do wrong" (Italian: Compagni che sbagliano). His stance against terrorism induced the terrorist organizations, on July 24, 1979, to publish in the newspaper a death sentence against him from Prima Linea. One terrorism group tried to carry out the death sentence, but a housemaid saw the armed group waiting for Sanlorenzo to return in his automobile and warned him. The ambush failed. 
Hawkenbury Meadow is a 1.6 hectare Local Nature Reserve in Harlow in Essex. It is owned and managed by Harlow District Council. 
The site is neutral grassland with a brook running through it. It has a variety of wild flowers including yellow rattle, common spotted orchid, cowslip, wild carrot and grass vetchling. There are strips of mature woodland along the margins, and a stand of willow trees. A damper area in the north of the site has marshland plants. 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
This article about an epistolary novel or fictional diary of the 2000s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
Meril-Prothom Alo Critics Choice Award for Best Film Director is an award presented annually by Meril-Prothom Alo as part of its Meril-Prothom Alo Awards. 
The following directors have received multiple Best Film Director nominations (* indicates no wins): 
Player-coach Bobby McDermott (First Team), George Mikan (First), and Bob Calihan (Second) earned All-NBL honors . 
Note: Bob Cotton, Bill McDonald, Irv Noren, Les Rothman, and Bob Synnott were not on the playoffs roster. 
Yann Candele (born March 11, 1971) is a Canadian equestrian who competes in the sport of show jumping. 
He won the 2009 and 2010 Nations' Cups in Wellington, Florida. He competed at 2010 and 2014 World Equestrian Games. 
This biographical article related to Canadian equestrianism is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
John Connor leaves Crystal Peak a year after the death of his wife, Kate Brewster. Thinking about how Skynet won and mankind was wiped out, he goes to Los Angeles, California, meeting humans and a man named Uncle Bob. 
The Sopwith Schneider of 1919 was a British racing seaplane. It was a single seat biplane intended to compete in the 1919 Schneider Trophy. After this race was abandoned due to fog, the Schneider was rebuilt into a landplane racer as the Sopwith Rainbow, being destroyed in a crash in 1923. 
It was rebuilt again in 1922 by H.G. Hawker Engineering, (Sopwith Aviation having gone into receivership in 1920), being fitted with a Bristol Jupiter II.  It finished second in the 1923 Aerial Derby on 6 August,  but was destroyed in a crash on 1 September 1923. 
This biographical article relating to a Spanish field hockey figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Haugr is a Norse name and landform name deriving from the noun Old Norse: haugr meaning hill, knoll, hollow, or mound. When used in English contexts, it may refer to a tumulus, or barrow. 
Voigt is remembered for his anatomical investigations of the hair and skin. His name is associated with "Voigt's line", a pigmentary demarcation line that sometimes affects dark-skinned individuals. It is described as a dorsoventral line of pigmentation occurring symmetrically and bilaterally for about ten centimeters along the lateral edge of the biceps. The phenomenon is also known as "Futcher's line". 
This biographical article related to a South African cricket person born in the 1930s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
John A. Pelesko (born c. 1968) is an American mathematician.  He is currently Professor of the Department of Mathematical Sciences and Dean of the College of Arts and Sciences at the University of Delaware. 
John grew up and in Roselle, New Jersey and attended Roselle Catholic High School from which he graduated in 1986.  Pelesko graduated with a B.S. in Pure Mathematics with cum laude distinction from University of Massachusetts Boston in 1992. He received his PhD from the New Jersey Institute of Technology in 1997 where he was a student of Gregory Kriegsmann. 
Pelesko taught at California Institute of Technology as an Instructor (1997 to 1999), at Georgia Institute of Technology as an Assistant Professor (1999 to 2002) before settling down at University of Delaware as an Assistant Professor (2002), and currently as a Full Professor. 
Pelesko is one of the two professors involved in the MEC Lab  at the University of Delaware, a lab for running physical experiments and computations related to applied mathematics. 
Rohan Mark Selvaratnam (born 12 March 1974) is a Malaysian cricketer. A right-handed batsman and right-arm medium pace bowler, he has played for the Malaysia national cricket team since 1993. 
Born in Johor in 1974, Selvaratnam first represented his country at Under-19 level, playing in the Youth Asia Cup in Bangladesh in 1989 when only 15. He made his debut for the senior side three years later, playing in the VOLVO cup quadrangular in Thailand also involving Singapore, Hong Kong, and the host nation.[citation needed] His first major tournament was the 1994 ICC Trophy tournament in Nairobi. 
He played in the annual Stan Nagaiah Trophy series against Singapore for the first time in February 1995. He played in the series every year from then on until 2001. He returned to the Saudara Cup match in 1997, playing in that match every year until 2004, except for 2002. He played in the 1997 ICC Trophy, which was held in Malaysia. For many years in between, he served as vice-captain of the Malaysian team and in 1998 captained Malaysia for the first time in the Saudara Cup.[citation needed] 
In 1998, he made his List A debut, playing for Malaysia against the Pakistan International Airlines cricket team in the Wills Cup, a Pakistani domestic competition. Later in the year, he represented Malaysia in the cricket tournament of the 1998 Commonwealth Games, hosted in Kuala Lumpur. He played in the ACC Trophy in Nepal the same year. 
In 2005, he played ACC Fast Track Countries Tournament matches against Singapore, Hong Kong, and Nepal, also returning to the Stan Nagaiah Trophy series for the first time in four years. He played in the series again the following year, also playing ACC Premier League matches against Hong Kong, Nepal, and the UAE, and in that year's ACC Trophy. He most recently represented his country in the 2007 ACC Twenty20 Cup, where he played against Nepal and Oman. 
Bernard was born in Georgetown on 2 March 1939, the only child of William and Maude Bernard. Her father was a Sergeant of Police. She attended St Ambrose School in Georgetown and won a place at Bishops High School. She planned to become a teacher, until a family friend encouraged her to consider law. She attained a Bachelor of Laws degree with honours from the University of London in 1963. 
Bernard qualified as a solicitor in 1964 and was in private practice until 1980. She was appointed a Magistrate in 1970 and a Commissioner of Oaths and Notary Public in 1976. In 1977, she was admitted to the English Roll of Solicitors. 
Bernard was appointed as the first female Judge in the High Court of Guyana in 1980, and the first female Justice of Appeal in 1992. In 1996, she was appointed Chief Justice of Guyana. She later became Chancellor and Head of the Judiciary of Guyana. In 1997, she ruled that Janet Jagan had the constitutional right to be President after the election was challenged in court. 
In 2011, Bernard was appointed as a judge of the Inter-American Development Bank Administrative Tribunal in Washington, D.C.. In December 2014, she was appointed to the Bermuda Court of Appeal by Governor George Fergusson. 
Bernard was a rapporteur of the United Nations Committee on the Elimination of Discrimination from 1982 until 1984, and then Chair of the Committee from 1985 until 1989. 
Bernard has written articles on gender and legal issues. In 2013, she completed research on the "Compatibility of the Caribbean Court of Justice with the Revised Treaty of Chaguaramas" after receiving a fellowship from the Institute of Advanced Legal Studies in London. 
Bernard has received two of Guyana's three highest national awards, the Cacique Crown of Honour and the Order of Roraima. In 2005, she received the CARICOM Triennial Award for Women for her role in advocating for women's development. 
In 1989, Bernard was awarded the University of Guyana Award for Achievement in Law. In 2007, she was given an honorary Doctor of Laws by the University of the West Indies. In October 2017, she was honoured in New York City by the Guyana-Jamaica Friendship Association. 
Bernard is single and has an adopted daughter, Carol, who is a lawyer in Trinidad and Tobago. She is a Christian and was the first woman to be Chancellor of the Anglican Diocese of Guyana. 
To carry out his university dissertation, Crespo developed the website for the Cuban Registry of Mentally Challenged Patients which contained the genetic characteristics of those people, allowing geneticists to manage information and visualize different reports to raise the quality of life and well-being of such patients. 
Before finishing university Crespo participated in the development team of the Medical Genetics Computer System, a computer application that allows managing all the information associated with a medical genetics consultation and the studies this branch carries out. After graduating he ended up being the leader of that software development project. 
He also participated in the computer processing of data collected in the clinical-genetic, psycho-pedagogical and social study of people with disability in the Republic of Ecuador. 
Crespo cofounded EspacioCuba in 2012, a real estate office and real estate portal, after the Cuban government authorized the buying and selling of properties in Cuba in November 2011 which opened an emergent real estate market. At the beginning he had to use computer programmer and photographer licenses to take pictures of the properties for sale and listing them in the real estate portal because real estate agents weren't authorized in the island at that moment. 
Afterwards, in September 2013, the licenses to exercise as real estate agents were authorized and from that moment on this business became one of the first real estate agencies in Cuba. 
In addition to be involved in the Cuban real estate market he has offered advising to other businessmen interested in investing in Cuba. 
The cover design is a lavish symmetrical pattern, which is slightly cartoon-like. It was commissioned, as the previous ("Caught by the Fuzz") single's artwork was, by the Designers Republic. Ed Coombes, who was responsible for the photography, is in fact another member of the Coombes family. 
Basoda State was a former princely state in Central India, part of the Bhopal Agency during the British Raj. It was situated in the Malwa Plateau. Basoda was a small state, and its capital was Haidergarh-Basoda. The state had an area of 104 km2, and a population of 4,897 in 1901. 
This state was also known as Nawab-Basoda or Haidargarh-Basoda in order to distinguish it from a place with the same name in Gwalior State. 
Basoda state was established in 1753 by Muhammad Ahsanullah Khan son of Muhammad Diler Khan founder of Kurwai State. The rulers of the state were of Pashtun origin, related to the ruling families of Mohammadgarh and Kurwai states. Between 1817 and 1822 Basoda was occupied by Gwalior State. In 1822 Basoda became a British protectorate until 1947, when its last ruler, Nawab Masood Ali Khan, signed the accession to the Indian Union. 
Manifestation (or manifesting) refers to various pseudoscientific self-help strategies intended to bring about a personal goal, primarily by focusing one's thoughts upon the desired outcome. The techniques are based on the law of attraction of New Thought spirituality. While the process involves positive thinking, or even directing requests to "the universe", it also involves action-steps on the part of the individual. 
The practice was popularized by the film The Secret (2006) and a book of the same name by Rhonda Byrne. It has been popularized on social media since the 2010s. It is promoted by Oprah Winfrey, Deepak Chopra, Eckhart Tolle, Gabrielle Bernstein, and Iyanla Vanzant, among others. 
Born in Stockbridge, Massachusetts to Samuel and Hannah Whelpley, from Wilton, Fairfield County, Connecticut, Whelpley's parents were subsistence farmers who belonged to a small church, where Whelpley's father served as a deacon. 
While living in Stockbridge, Whelpley married Nancy Wheaton of West Stockbridge. They had at least three children, two of whom entered the ministry. Whelpley's fragile health became increasingly burdensome over the course of his life, and in the end he "languished for some time in a state of great debility", and died at the age of 51. 
Binky Brown had an immediate influence on contemporaries in underground comix: such cartoonists as Aline Kominsky, Robert Crumb, and Art Spiegelman soon turned to producing similarly confessional works.  Binky Brown has gained a reputation as the first major work of autobiography in English-language comics, and many aspects of its approach have become widespread in underground and alternative comics. 
At the time, comic books had a reputation in the US as low-brow children's entertainment, and the public often associated them with juvenile delinquency.  Comics had little cultural capital and few American cartoonists had challenged the perception that the medium was inherently incapable of mature artistic expression. 
Binky's intrusive thoughts bring him to believe his body is trying to lead him to sin and eternal punishment.  He develops an internal system of rules to cope with these thoughts and punishes himself for violations.  He wards off thoughts and fantasies he cannot control and that give him guilt by silently repeating the word "noyatin" to himself, a contraction of the repentant "not a sin". 
In 1990, Green had an essay published entitled "The Binky Brown Matter" in The Sun. In the essay, he describes the OCD with which he was diagnosed years after completing Binky Brown.  Last Gasp reprinted the story in 1995 in The Binky Brown Sampler, a softcover anthology of Binky Brown strips with an introduction by Art Spiegelman and an expanded version of "The Binky Brown Matter". 
Green employs numerous Catholic symbols, such as a word balloon adorned with symbols of Christ's martyrdom to represent the depth of Binky's desperation.  Catholic works such as a catechism and Treasure Chest parochial comics appear throughout the work. 
Despite strict censorship in other media in the US, explicit sexuality was common in underground comix.  Binky Brown was the first work of autobiographical comics to depict explicit sexuality: penises appear throughout, and Binky masturbates in one scene.  The central symbol of the penis recurs sometimes subtly as in the images of pencils used to craft the work, and more often explicitly, as every phallic-like object Green sees because a literal "pecker ray"-projecting penis in Binky's mind. 
Literary scholar Hillary Chute sees the work as addressing feminist concerns of "embodiment and representation" as it "delves into and forcefully pictures non-normative sexuality".  Chute affirms that despite its brevity Binky Brown merits the label "graphic novel" as "the quality of work, its approach, parameters, and sensibility" mark a "seriousness of purpose". 
Binky Brown Meets the Holy Virgin Mary has appealed mostly to comics fans and cartoonists, and has gained little recognition from mainstream audiences and arts critics.  Spiegelman has speculated this neglect comes from the nature of the comics medium; in contrast to explicit works such as Philip Roth's Portnoy's Complaint, the penises in Green's work are visual. 
Jim Woodring stated Green's autobiographical work "has never been surpassed"; his own autobiographical work depicts his dreams. 
Many episodes portrayed the balance of power and fragile harmony between the islanders and the German occupying forces, and how it was threatened by either resistance action or over-zealous clamping down by the Germans. 
A precursor to his role as Bergerac in the detective series set on Jersey, John Nettles played a police detective ordered to work for the Germans and anguished by the conflict between his duty and collaborating with the enemy. 
The review on the Screenonline website by Sergio Angelini describes Enemy at the Door as featuring "stories and characters that explore the complex issues of alienation and wartime collaboration in a multi-faceted and surprisingly subtle fashion." However, "[W]hile striving for a sense of day-to-day reality, the series was shown well before the 9 o'clock watershed, consequently holding back from showing too much of the grim reality of the situation." 
First introduced in 1986, the Colt King Cobra is a medium frame double-action revolver featuring a six round cylinder which was designed and produced by the Colt's Manufacturing Company and marketed to law enforcement agencies and civilian firearms enthusiasts. Available in blued and stainless steel finishes in a variety of barrel lengths and chambered for centerfire .357 Magnum ammunition. 
In 2019, the King Cobra was reintroduced with a three-inch barrel. The gun debuted at SHOT Show 2019.  
Like all .357 Magnum revolvers, the Colt King Cobra can chamber and fire the shorter .38 Special cartridge. 
The following destination information is taken from the Presidential Airways system timetable dated July 3, 1986. Presidential was still operating as an independent air carrier at this time and was thus not yet providing codeshare flight services for Continental Airlines, Pan Am or United Airlines.  Virtually all of these destinations were served on a nonstop basis with jet aircraft from the airline's hub located at Washington Dulles International Airport (IAD). 
Non-fullerene acceptors (NFAs) are types of acceptors used in organic solar cells (OSCs). The name Fullerene comes from another type of acceptor-molecule which was used as the main acceptor material for bulk heterojunction Organic solar cells. Non-fullerene acceptors are thus defined as not being a part of this sort of acceptors. 
Recent research on designing NFA-OSCs showed an efficiency of 15% with a so-called tandem solar cell which made use of Non-fullerene acceptors as well as fullerene acceptors. With a good chance that researchers will be able to boost this percentage up to 18%, it is clear that NFA-OSCs have a great potential in becoming a profitable photovoltaic in commercial application. 
In current research, rylene diimides (for small band-gap energy donors) and FREAs (for large band-gap energy donors) have shown the most potential for becoming commercially viable solar cell materials for bulk heterojunction blend cells. Wide band gap donors are known to enhance voltage and diminish current density, but in combination with FREAs both values can be relatively high. 
Besides these theoretical research aspects, implementation in a life size commercial solar cell also brings a lot of challenges, such as easy and sustainable device fabrication methods and long-term stability of the organic compounds. Studies also show that with upscaling, the PCE in general drops. On all of these areas, NFA-OSCs show great potential but it will take a lot of research before a solid non-fullerene acceptor-organic solar cell can compete with inorganic solar cells. 
Moses Kingsley (born November 16, 1994) is a Nigerian professional basketball player for Ionikos Nikaias of the Greek Basket League. He played college basketball for the Arkansas Razorbacks. 
Kingsley participated with the Minnesota Timberwolves during the NBA Summer League. On August 12, 2017, he signed with the Antwerp Giants of the Basketball League Belgium Division I. 
On July 17, 2020, he signed with RETAbet Bilbao Basket of the Liga ACB. Kingsley averaged 4.4 points and 2.4 rebounds per game. On December 12 of the same year, Kingsley signed with AEK Athens of the Greek Basket League. 
Moses Kingsley played for Team Arkansas in the 2018 edition of The Basketball Tournament. In 2 games, he averaged 5 points, 5 rebounds, and 1.5 steals per game. Team Arkansas reached the second round before falling to the Talladega Knights. 
A good view of the Three Gorges Dam, and of an ancillary dam further south, can be had from Maoping's riverside parks. 
Most of Zigui is hilly or mountainous with basic farming and tea production. There are many small coal mines in the mountains, with the coal trucked to the river then loaded onto barges for shipping downstream. 
Salavan is in the southernmost area of Laos, one of the most isolated regions of the country. The city is in a densely forested area that has seen little development outside the city. Dozens of indigenous villages of various tribes surround Salavan. 
The Statutes of Kilkenny were a series of thirty-five acts passed at Kilkenny in 1366, aiming to curb the decline of the Hiberno-Norman Lordship of Ireland. 
By the middle decades of the 14th century, the Hiberno-Norman presence in Ireland was perceived to be under threat, mostly due to the dissolution of English laws and customs among English settlers. These English settlers were described as "more Irish than the Irish themselves", referring to their taking up Irish law, custom, costume and language. The introduction to the text of the statutes claim, 
Original Anglo-Norman: ... ore plusors Engleis de la dit terre guepissant la lang gis monture leys & usages Engleis vivent et se governement as maniers guise et lang des Irrois enemies et auxiant ount fait divers mariages & aliaunces enter eux et les Irrois enemyes avauntditz dont le dit terre et le lieg people de icelle la lang Engloies ligeance a nostre seignour le Roy Duc et lez leis Engleis illoeques sont mis en subjection et retrets... 
... now many English of the said land, forsaking the English language, manners, mode of riding, laws and usages, live and govern themselves according to the manners, fashion, and language of the Irish enemies; and also have made divers marriages and alliances between themselves and the Irish enemies aforesaid; whereby the said land, and the liege people thereof, the English language, the allegiance due to our lord the king, and the English laws there, are put in subjection and decayed... 
The statutes tried to prevent this "middle nation", which was neither true English nor Irish, by reasserting English culture among the English settlers. 
The prime author of the statutes was Lionel of Antwerp, better known as the Duke of Clarence, and who was also the Earl of Ulster. In 1361, he had been sent as viceroy to Ireland by Edward III to recover his own lands in Ulster if possible and to turn back the advancing tide of the Irish. The statutes were enacted by a parliament that he summoned in 1366. The following year, he left Ireland. 
Many of the "statutes" (or "chapters") of the 1366 parliament repeated "ordinances" made by a great council held in 1351, also in Kilkenny. 
Other statutes required that the English in Ireland be governed by English common law, instead of the Irish March law or Brehon law and ensured the separation of the Irish and English churches by requiring that "no Irishman of the nations of the Irish be admitted into any cathedral or collegiate church ... amongst the English of the land". 
The mistrust the English had of the Irish is demonstrated by Statute XV, which forbade Irish minstrels or storytellers to come to English areas, guarding against "the Irish agents who come amongst the English, spy out the secrets, plans, and policies of the English, whereby great evils have often resulted". 
Construction of the route was begun in 1848 for the Waterford and Limerick Railway and completed in 1854. It is one of the oldest railways in Ireland, and the first to have been authorised by the UK Parliament. The company was renamed the Waterford, Limerick and Western in 1896 and merged with the Great Southern and Western Railway in 1901. 
The Waterford to Rosslare section includes the Barrow Bridge, the longest rail bridge in the Republic of Ireland.  At the time of construction, the line from Waterford diverged at Killinick, allowing for direct Waterford to Wexford trains to bypass Rosslare Strand. 
Between Limerick and Limerick Junction, trains between Limerick and Dublin Heuston also serve the line. 
The Waterford to Rosslare section was traditionally a busy freight line, transporting 150,000 tonnes of Sugar beet via the handling facility at Wellingtonbridge until the demise of the Sugar Industry in 2006. As a result of this significant freight traffic, passenger services were reduced over the years. 
The trains made very poor connections with other rail services. They connected with the Stena Line ferry service to and from Fishguard Harbour, but due to the poor onward connections at Waterford few passengers used this. The exception was during the volcanic ash crisis of 2010, when trains were fully loaded and had standing room only. 
As of 2020, a campaign exists in the local area to reopen the rail line. In 2021, it was confirmed that the route would be examined for reopening as part of an All-Island Strategic Rail Review. 
Services resumed in September 2004 with diesel railcars, but further engineering works dogged services, requiring frequent bus replacements of the train services.[citation needed] 
Gebremedhin received his BS degree in 1996, his MS in 1999, and his PhD in 2003, all in computer science from the University of Bergen. He additionally received an earlier BS degree in electrical engineering from Addis Ababa University, in 1992. 
The building is named for General Jean Victor Allard, the first French-Canadian to become a Chief of the Defence Staff, the highest position in the Canadian Forces. He was also the first to hold the accompanying rank of (full, four-leaf) general. 
This article about a building or structure in Quebec is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The softball throw is a track and field event used as a substitute for more technical throwing events in competitions involving Youth, Paralympic, Special Olympics and Senior competitors. 
The general rules for the softball throw parallel those of the javelin throw when conducted in a formal environment, but the implement being thrown is a standard softball, which resembles the size of a standard shot but is considerably lighter. 
While it is not in the official National championship program, it is often part of local senior competitions.  Some competitions introduce a factor for accuracy. 
This article about a Member of the Parliament of Ireland (up to 1800) is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Andixius trifurcus, is a species of planthoppers belonging to the family Cixiidae. It is endemic to China. 
William St. Clair, 6th Baron of Roslin (died 1297) was a Scottish nobleman of the late 13th and early 14th centuries. 
William St. Clair, may have been "the Seemly St. Clair" who married Agnes, daughter of Patrick Dunbar, Earl of March. On 7 April 1299, Edward I of England issued a two years' protection for Amicia, widow of William de St. Clair, dwelling by the King's leave in the county of Edinburgh. William St. Clair is known to have left the following children: 
Glowacki first started training aikido and karate in the club Orzel Walcz, before finally deciding to pursue a career in boxing. He started boxing at the age of 13, in 1999. He idolizes Mike Tyson. Glowacki became a father at the age of 18, and, after finishing high school realized that he needs to support his family, so he gave up on studying and took up boxing full-time. 
On 18 August 2012, he won the vacant WBO Inter-Continental cruiserweight title, defeating Felipe Romero by sixth-round technical knockout (TKO). 
The statue was supported by the Masaryk Democratic Movement, and revealed on 7 March 2000 for Masaryk's 150th birthday anniversary. 
This article about a sculpture in the Czech Republic is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Roger Kaufman is an American figure in the history of educational technology and performance improvement fields as well as strategic thinking and planning for public and private-sector organizations. Regarded as one of the founding figures of the field, he is referred to as the father of needs assessment. 
Kaufman developed the Mega Planning model, a framework for adding measurable value to society.  In 2014, the International Society for Performance Improvement created the Roger Kaufman Award for Societal Impact. 
Kaufman identified three types, or levels, of needs: Mega, Macro, and Micro. And Change, Choices, and Consequences published by HRD Press. The following table details the levels of needs and their definitions. 
Extensive examples of planning and aligned objectives can be found in Moore, 2010 and Moore, Ellsworth & Kaufman, 2008. 
In 2014, the International Society for Performance Improvement established the Roger Kaufman Award for Societal impact. This award is given to individuals and organizations who demonstrate continuous improvement and measurable positive societal impact (see ISPI award info). The following are award recipients for each year: 
In the 21st Century Rochester became the subject of academic interest for the duality of her public political activity with successful maintenance of a long-term same-sex affectionate relationship with fellow communist Grace Hutchins, a relationship considered taboo according to the social mores of the day. Although the pair lived as partners for over 40 years, Rochester never self-identified as a lesbian and the question of whether the pair were sexually intimate remains unresolved. 
The Rochesters were a religious family and Anna was raised as a Protestant in the Episcopal Church, attending her first church service when she was just 5 and undergoing confirmation as a member of the church in 1894, at the age of 14. Anna was strongly imbued with the moral code of the church, which stressed simplicity, modesty, and service to others. Her religious fervor would continue to develop in her late teen years. 
From 1912 until 1915, Rochester worked as a researcher and for the publicity department of the National Child Labor Committee, a private non-profit organization established in 1904 to help end child labor. Rochester continued in this same area in 1915 when she moved to the United States Children's Bureau, a government agency created in 1912, where she again worked on research and publications. She would remain with the US Children's Bureau through 1921. 
In 1922 Rochester assumed the editorship of The World Tomorrow, a Christian socialist monthly magazine which had been founded in 1918 by the pacifism Fellowship of Reconciliation and which was formerly edited by future Socialist Party leader Norman Thomas. 
Anna Rochester died of pneumonia on May 11, 1966, in New York City. She was 86 years old at the time of her death. She is buried at Brookside Cemetery, Englewood, with her parents. 
Anna Rochester's papers reside in the Special Collections department of Knight Library at the University of Oregon in Eugene. 
Ecclesiastes 6 is the sixth chapter of the Book of Ecclesiastes in the Hebrew Bible or the Old Testament of the Christian Bible. The book contains philosophical speeches by a character called '(the) Qoheleth' (="the Teacher"), composed probably between the 5th to 2nd century BC. Peshitta, Targum, and Talmud attribute the authorship of the book to King Solomon. This chapter deals with wealth and insatiability. 
Some early manuscripts containing the text of this chapter in Hebrew are of the Masoretic Text, which includes Codex Leningradensis (1008).[a] Fragments containing parts of this chapter were found among the Dead Sea Scrolls 4QQoha (4Q109; 175-150 BCE; extant verses 1?, 3-8, 12). 
This section focuses on the theme of wealth, to whom God gives it and its trappings, that the rich may live long and have much, but may die unsatisfied and unmourned, while someone else would ultimately enjoy the riches; therefore, they are worse off than the stillborn child, which at least finds rest (verse 6). 
While people work to earn a living, Qoheleth argues that they are left unsatisfied because of the unanswered important questions: what is the point of wisdom, and what reason is there for the poor to find a role in life to improve one's lot? Verse 9 advises for contentment, because the desire to find answers beyond the obvious is seen as "vanity" (hebel). 
Kaivopuisto (Swedish: Brunnsparken), nicknamed Kaivari in Finnish or Brunsan in Swedish, is one of the oldest and best known parks in central Helsinki, Finland, and also a neighbourhood of about 500 inhabitants where the park is located. 
To the south, Kaivopuisto borders the Gulf of Finland. To the north is a residential area containing the official private residences of several ambassadors of foreign countries to Finland, including the United States, Estonia, Spain, France, Belgium, Brazil, Italy, the Netherlands, and the United Kingdom. 
Kaivopuisto offers several hectares of parks, both on flat ground, and on cliffs. The park also includes traces of stone fortifications built in the 18th century. Every summer, thousands of Helsinkians come to Kaivopuisto to sunbathe, to have picnics, or to hold sport. The largest hill in the park is a favoured slope for tobogganing during the winter. 
Since the mid-1970s, it has been common to hold a few concerts in the park during the summer, with classical music, but more often pop and rock music, and usually featuring Finnish artists. 
Kaivopuisto also includes Kaivohuone, a famous restaurant and nightclub dating from the 1830s, the Ursa Observatory, and the Villa Kleineh, the oldest villa in the area. 
In 2020, traditional May Day festivities in Kaivopuisto have been cancelled in favor of online events. 
Canthaxanthin is a potent lipid-soluble antioxidant. The biological functions of canthaxanthin are related, at least in part, to its ability to function as an antioxidant (free radical scavenging/vitamin E sparing) in animal tissues. 
Canthaxanthin is not found in wild Atlantic Salmon, but is a minor carotenoid in Pacific Salmon. Canthaxanthin is used in farm-raised trout. Canthaxanthin is used in combination with astaxanthin for some salmon feeds. 
The antioxidant characteristics of canthaxanthin have been studied by a number of authors and experiments have shown that the presence of canthaxanthin can potentially help to reduce oxidation in a number of tissues including broiler meat and the chick embryo. In the egg, canthaxanthin is transferred from yolk to the developing embryo where it might help to protect the developing bird against oxidative damage, particularly during the sensitive periods of hatching and early posthatch life. 
Tanning pills have been associated with health problems, including an eye disorder called canthaxanthin retinopathy, which is the formation of yellow deposits on the eye's retina. Canthaxanthin has also been reported to cause liver injury and a severe itching condition called urticaria, according to the AAD.
Project Pitchfork returned with album Kaskade in 2005. In February 2009 the band released "Dream, Tiresias!" which received praise from electronic music magazine, ReGen. In 2010 the band's follow up album "Continuum Ride" was released along with a video to support the song "Beholder." "Continuum Ride" was inspired by the band's US tour in 2009, particularly their experience of Detroit, whose dilapidated skyline led to a more "dark and destructive" sound than that of their previous album. 
By 2011 Project Pitchfork ceased operating their Candyland label, having since begun releasing their work on the Trisol label. 
In 2018, the band released the album "Akkretion", the first of what was planned to be a trilogy of albums for release that year. Of the remaining albums of the trilogy, only the second, "Fragment," was released. 
Starting in 2019, Trisol began releasing reissues of all the band's material over the previous decade from "Dream, Tiresias!" through "Look Up, I'm Down There". 
The Conanicut Friends Meetinghouse is a historic Quaker meeting house at the junction of North Road and Weeden Lane in Jamestown, Rhode Island. 
The structure was built in 1786 to replace the original meeting house destroyed by the British after they occupied Conanicut Island in 1776. The building was added to the National Register of Historic Places in 1973, and is included in the Windmill Hill Historic District.  It is still used for religious services during the summer. 
This article about a Registered Historic Place in Newport County, Rhode Island is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a religious building or structure in Rhode Island is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Men's slalom competition at the 2015 World Championships was held on Sunday,  February 15. It was the final event of the championships. 
This biographical article related to association football in Germany, about a forward born in the 1910s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Family mediation is a member of the ADR or alternative dispute resolution family.[citation needed] It forms one of the core pillars of mediation services provided globally. 
Historically, it remains unclear where family mediation first evolved geographically. However, family mediation has been present in various forms in various cultures world-wide for thousands of years.[citation needed] 
The family-mediation system focuses on providing a dispute-resolution mechanism to families who are in dispute. Divorce mediation forms part of the family mediation tree of services. 
Family mediation is non-confrontational in nature and progressive. It encourages parties to focus on the future and problem solving strategies rather than the problems of the past. The process is also "child centered" whereby the parties are encouraged to make special provision for the needs of children where the subject parties of such mediations have childcare related issues. 
Family mediation has evolved in both a public and private capacity worldwide in a number of countries. Organizations exist in the United States, The United Kingdom, Australia, New Zealand, Italy and Canada. 
This biographical article related to fencing in Switzerland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The hall is named after the Scottish classicist, John Burnet.  It was formerly called the Atholl Hotel before it was purchased by the University of St Andrews. 
John Burnet Hall is located on Links Crescent, which is at the end of A91 road. The hall overlooks the 18th hole of the St Andrews Links Old Course and the North Sea and West Sands can be seen from the building. 
The Laundry is services by provider Circuit Laundry and the Wi-fi has good coverage provided by Eduroam. Two drinks vending machines are in operation in main building. 
In North America, Yen Press licensed the series for an English-language translation, and published it from December 2014 to March 2016. The series has also been translated into other languages. 
Demon From Afar was serialized in Aria, from the magazine's debut in the September 2010 issue to the May 2013 issue. Kodansha compiled the chapters into six bound volumes and published them from 7 March 2011, to 7 May 2013. 
In North America, Yen Press licensed the series for an English-language translation, and published it from 16 December 2014, to 22 March 2016. The series has also been translated into other languages, including French and German. 
In December 2014, the first volume of the English-language translation ranked 273rd on ICv2's list of the 300 bestselling graphic novels, selling an estimated 372 copies. 
Gerard "Jerry" John Ebert (born June 21, 1953) is an American author, musician, and union organizer. 
Jerry Ebert is the third oldest of twelve children, including actor Matthew Ebert. A lifelong union organizer, Ebert started attending Union Meetings with his father, Raymond Ebert (former Secretary-Treasurer of Teamsters Local 445), at age 10. It was there that he met famed labor leader Jimmy Hoffa, and began helping his father organize Wakefern Foods and St. Luke's Hospital workers in Newburgh, New York. 
Jerry currently creates a music and book subscription via his website, where he has a series of 19 songs that coincide with his 3 books of poems. He has performed  with lifelong friend Pete Seeger at labor rallies. 
Ahat is a village in the Azdavay district of Kastamonu province in Turkey. As of 2018, it has a population of 66. 
This geographical article about a location in Kastamonu Province, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Christopher Wren Fussell (born May 19, 1976 in Oregon, Ohio) is a retired Major League Baseball pitcher. 
After attending Clay High School, Fussell was drafted in the 9th round of the 1994 MLB draft and he signed with the Orioles on June 14, 1994. 
He began his professional career with the Gulf Coast Orioles in 1994 and began a slow, but steady, rise through the Orioles farm system with stops at Bluefield (rookie leagues), Frederick ("A" ball), Bowie ("AA") and Rochester ("AAA"). 
In 1999 he was traded to the Kansas City Royals for Jeff Conine. He Spent most of the next two seasons on the Royals roster, primarily as a reliever with occasional starts. In 2001, he had surgery to remove bone spurs in his right elbow. He returned to the Royals in 2002 and spent the spring in big league camp and the 2002 season in Omaha. 
After his release from the Astros in 2005, he played with the Independent League team the Camden Riversharks from 2005 until he was picked up by the Los Angeles Dodgers to provide bullpen depth for their "AAA" team, the Las Vegas 51s in 2007. 
(c. 1700 - c. 1735) Naples, Italy. As a youth, Alessandro worked in the shops of famed luthiers Nicolo Amati and Antonio Stradivari. After returning to Naples from Cremona, he became the founder of the Neapolitan school. Authentic examples of his instruments in good condition are scarce. A few violas, cellos, one double bass, and several violins have survived. 
(active ca. 1740 - ca. 1780) Naples, Italy. The second son of Alessandro, Gennaro (also known by his latinised name Januarius) created some well-made instruments and had a prominent position in the family. 
1020 Arcadia, provisional designation 1924 QV, is a stony Agnia asteroid from the central regions of the asteroid belt, approximately 11 kilometers (7 miles) in diameter. It was discovered on 7 March 1924, by German astronomer Karl Reinmuth at the Heidelberg Observatory in Heidelberg, Germany. The asteroid was named after the Greek region of Arcadia. 
In the SMASS classification, Arcadia is a common, stony S-type asteroid. It has been characterized as an S-type by Pan-STARRS photometric survey, as well as by SDSS-MFB (Masi Foglia Bus). 
In November 2011, a fragmentary rotational lightcurve of Arcadia was obtained from photometric observations by Gordon Gartrelle at the University of North Dakota. Lightcurve analysis gave a rotation period of 17.02 hours with a brightness amplitude of 0.05 magnitude (U=1). As of 2018, no secure period has been obtained. 
This minor planet was named after the Greek region of Arcadia in central Peloponnese. It is also a celebrated mythological region, where the shepherd god Pan lived. The official naming citation was mentioned in The Names of the Minor Planets by Paul Herget in 1955 (H 97). 
Vrienden (English: "Friends") is a studio album by Dutch artist Jan Smit. It was released on 13 August 2012 through Vosound Records. 
Brian Sterling-Vete (aka Brian Sterling, Brian Vete) (born 22 August 1958) is an English author, Guinness World Record Holder, motivational speaker, TV broadcaster, Director, Stage, Film and Television actor, stunt performer, martial arts expert, fitness expert and entrepreneur. 
Brian Sterling-Vete was born in the Rusholme/Moss Side district of Manchester, England. He attended school at Heald Place County Primary and then Burnage High School (listed as notable alumni) before taking a 3-year degree course at Manchester Polytechnic, now Manchester Metropolitan University. 
Prior to working in the TV and film industry, Sterling worked at multiple jobs including: selling books, as a demolition rigger, a nightclub bouncer, builder's apprentice, insurance sales, as a martial arts instructor, and as a gym instructor.  Sterling bought a derelict gym in Rochdale, England and opened it as the Olympic Gym in 1980.  This was successful until it was lost due to divorce in 1983. 
Sterling began martial arts training in 1970 at the Chi Yun Kung Fu Woy club in the Houldsworth Hall on Deansgate in Manchester under Sifu George Taylor (later under Master Chan), as part of the British Kung Fu Council. Sterling began training Muay Thai under Master Sken and Toddy from 1975 to 1980 and during that time he was instructor at Master Toddy's club in Rochdale, England.  Sterling also trained in Aikdo, Dim Mak, Yawara and Karate. 
In 1988, Sterling formed the MajorVision organisation and began pioneering specialist documentary films.  Sterling has produced 58 independent film productions, including the merited Porsche Cars 50th Anniversary documentary, The Power to Win, Fitness on the Move, The Ultimate Self Defence, The Mighty Steam Roller and the award-winning Giants of Steam. 
As a producer/director of sports coaching and fitness instructional films, Sterling produced: Pro Boxing Heavy Bag Drills, Thai Bag Drills, Focus Pad Drills, Swiss-Ball Drills and Medicine Ball Drills all through the UK's National Coaching Foundation's publications division, Coachwise-1st 4Sport,.  These followed on from Sterling's production of the Dictionary of Weight Training in 1991 for the same organisation. 
2010, March 12, Sterling published his first book, Mental Martial Arts.  Mental Martial Arts is a system of intellectual life-combat skills which uses the same strategies and principles of the physical martial arts, such as Kung Fu.  The book is published through MajorVision Ltd. 
2015, August 6, Sterling published the book Tuxedo Warriors. which is his autobiography and also the biography of author, music composer, actor, and cult film producer, Cliff Twemlow, between 1977 and Twemlow's death in 1993. The book is published through MajorVision Ltd. 
2015, September, Sterling was published as a contributing author in the book, Get in Shape Fast, by Josh Simmons, through Sociaverse publishing.  The publisher listed Sterling, who wrote chapter 3 of the book, as being one to the top 10 fitness experts in the USA selected to contribute. 
2016, 3 October, Sterling released the book: The 70 Second Difference.  It is about exercise, fitness, and nutrition, and focuses heavily on the science of isometric exercise and functional isokinetic exercises. sessions.  The book is published through MajorVision Ltd. and ISOfitness, and it is co-authored with bikini fitness bodybuilder competition winner, Helen Renee Wuorio. 
2017, 15 April, Sterling published the book: The ISO90 Course, which is a 90-day/12-week strength training/bodybuilding course based on the isometric exercise system.  The book is published through MajorVision Ltd. and ISOfitness, and it is co-authored with Helen Renee Wuorio. 
2017, 18 April, Helen Renee Wuorio and Sterling co-authored the book: The Sixty Second Ass Workout.  Primarily aimed at women, the book is about how to exercise the muscles of the buttocks using the isometric exercise system.  The book is published through MajorVision Ltd. and ISOfitness. 
2017, 29 April, Sterling published the book: Fitness on the Move.  It is about how to exercise without a gym or gym equipment, in particular while travelling as a passenger in a car, on a train, or on a plane.  The exercises are based on the isometric system.  The book is published through MajorVision Ltd. and ISOfitness, and it is co-authored with Helen Renee Wuorio. 
2017, 10 July, Sterling published the book: The Bullworker Bible.  It is about the exercises, the history, function, and the correct use of the Bullworker exercise device as both an isometric, and isotonic exerciser.  The book is published through MajorVision Ltd. and ISOfitness, and it is co-authored with Helen Renee Wuorio. 
2017, 26 October, Sterling published the book: The Bullworker 90 Course.  It is a 90-day/12-week strength and bodybuilding course using the Bullworker, the Steel Bow, and the Iso-Bow exercise devices.  The course incorporates both isometric and isotonic exercises.  The book is published through MajorVision Ltd. and ISOfitness, and it is co-authored with Helen Renee Wuorio. 
2017, 12 December, Sterling re-published the book: The Tuxedo Warrior.  This the re-published biography of cult movie-maker Cliff Twemlow, which includes an extended prologue and epilogue section by Sterling.  The book is published through MajorVision Ltd. 
2017, 12 December, Sterling re-published the book: The Pike.  This is a horror novel written by cult movie-maker Cliff Twemlow, which includes an extended prologue and epilogue section by Sterling. The book is published through MajorVision Ltd. 
2017, 27 December, Sterling re-published the book: The Beast of Kane.  This is a horror novel written by cult movie-maker Cliff Twemlow, which includes an extended prologue and epilogue section by Sterling.  The book is published through MajorVision Ltd. 
2017, 27 December, Sterling published the book: Workout at Work.  It is about how to exercise while at work in a typical office environment over the course of an average working day, without a gym or gym equipment.  The exercises are based on the isometric system. The book is published through MajorVision Ltd. and ISOfitness, and it is co-authored with Helen Renee Wuorio. 
2018, 26 March, Sterling published the book: Being American Married to a Brit: An Amusing Guide for Anglo-American Couples Divided by a Common Language and Culture. The book is about life, culture, and language in the UK and USA focussing on the humorous and interesting similarities, the differences. It is co-authored with Helen Renee Wuorio. 
2018, 3 May, Sterling published the book: The Bullworker Compendium: The Bullworker Bible and Bullworker 90 Course Combined. This book is a combination of both The Bullworker Bible and The Bullworker 90 Course. The exercises are based predominantly on the isometric system. The book is published through MajorVision Ltd., and it is co-authored with Helen Renee Wuorio. 
2018, 11 May, Sterling published the book: The Doorway to Strength: Turn a Door into a Strength-Building Multigym. The book is about how to improvise the use of a door and door jamb to perform exercises using an Iso-Bow. The exercises are based on the isometric system. The book is published through MajorVision Ltd., and it is co-authored with Helen Renee Wuorio. 
2018, 16 May, Sterling published the book: TRISOmetrics: Advanced Science-Based High-Intensity Strength and Muscle Building. The book is about a hybrid exercise system created by Sterling called TRISOmetrics, or the TRISOmetric exercise system. It combines three scientific approaches into one technique. The exercises are based on a specific combination of the isometric system and super-slow training. The book is published through MajorVision Ltd., and it is co-authored with Helen Renee Wuorio. 
2018, 11 July, Sterling published the book: The ISOmetric Bible: Exercise Anywhere with Scientifically Proven Isometrics. The book is a comprehensive guide to isometric exercise, including the history, science, popular proprietary equipment, and common ways to effectively improvise equipment. The exercises are based on the isometric system. The book is published through MajorVision Ltd., and it is co-authored with Helen Renee Wuorio. 
2019, 19 November, Sterling published the book: Isometric Exercises for Nordic Walking and Trekking: Part 1. Exercises for Individuals - Strength, Muscle and Stamina Building Exercises to Improve ... and to Perform During Walking Breaks Anywhere. The book is about how an individual can perform isometric exercises using a Nordic Walking Pole as an improvised isometric exercise device. The book is published through MajorVision Ltd., and it is co-authored with Helen Renee Wuorio. 
2020, 12 January, Sterling published the book: Isometric Exercises for Golf: Part 1. Exercises for Individuals Strength, Muscle and Stamina Building Exercises to Improve Your Game and to Perform During Your Game. The book is about how an individual can perform isometric exercises using a golf club as an improvised isometric exercise device. The book is published through MajorVision Ltd., and it is co-authored with Helen Renee Wuorio. 
2020, 16 January 16, Sterling published the book: Isometric Exercises for Golf: Part 2. Exercises for Partner-Pairs - Strength, Muscle and Stamina Building Exercises to Improve Your Game and to Perform During Your Game. The book is about how two people working together as a partner-pair can perform isometric exercises using a golf club as an improvised isometric exercise device. The book is published through MajorVision Ltd., and it is co-authored with Helen Renee Wuorio. 
2020, 26 March, Sterling published the book: Feel Better In 70 Seconds: Help Beat Depression and Feel Better With 10 Easy to Perform Exercises For a Total-Body Workout With Scientifically Proven Isometrics. The book is about how performing a specific series of simple exercises each day can release feel-good hormones, improve mood, and help to beat depression. The book is published through MajorVision Ltd., and it is co-authored with Helen Renee Wuorio. 
The Darling River is the outback's most famous waterway. The Darling is in poor health, suffering from over-allocation of its waters to irrigators, pollution from pesticide runoff, and prolonged drought. During drought periods in 2019 it has barely flowed at all. The river has a high salt content and declining water quality.  Increased rainfall in its catchment in 2010 has improved flow, but the health of the river will depend on long-term management. 
The Division of Darling, Division of Riverina-Darling, Electoral district of Darling and Electoral district of Lachlan and Lower Darling were named after the river. 
Aboriginal peoples have lived along the Darling River for tens of thousands of years. The Barkindji people called it Baaka or Barka, "Barkindji" meaning "people of the Barka". 
In 1856, the Blandowski Expedition set off for the junction of the Darling and Murray Rivers to discover and collect fish species for the National Museum. The expedition was a success with 17,400 specimens arriving in Adelaide the next year. 
Although its flow is extraordinarily irregular (the river dried up forty-five times between 1885 and 1960), in the later 19th century the Darling became a major transportation route, the pastoralists of western New South Wales using it to send their wool by shallow-draft paddle steamer from busy river ports such as Bourke and Wilcannia to the South Australian railheads at Morgan and Murray Bridge. But over the past century the river's importance as a transportation route has declined. 
In 1992, the Darling River suffered from severe cyanobacterial bloom that stretched the length of the river. The presence of phosphorus was essential for the toxic algae to flourish. Flow rates, turbulence, turbidity and temperature were other contributing factors. 
South east of Broken Hill, the Menindee Lakes are a series of lakes that were once connected to the Darling River by short creeks. The Menindee Lake Scheme has reduced the frequency of flooding in the Menindee Lakes. As a result, about 13,800 hectares of lignum and 8,700 hectares of Black box have been destroyed. Weirs and constant low flows have fragmented the river system and blocked fish passage. 
The Barrier Highway at Wilcannia, the Silver City Highway at Wentworth and the Broken Hill railway line at Menindee, all cross the Darling River. Part of the river north of Menindee marks the border of Kinchega National Park. In response to the 1956 Murray River flood, a weir was constructed at Menindee to mitigate flows from the Darling River. 
The north of the Darling River is in the Southeast Australia temperate savanna ecoregion and the southwest of the Darling is part of the Murray Darling Depression ecoregion. 
Major settlements along the river include Brewarrina, Bourke, Louth, Tilpa, Wilcannia, Menindee, Pooncarie and Wentworth. Wentworth was Australia's busiest inland port in the late 1880s. 
Navigation by steamboat to Brewarrina was first achieved in 1859. Brewarrina was also the location of intertribal meetings for Indigenous Australians who speak Darling and live in the river basin. Ancient fish traps in the river provided food for feasts.  These heritage listed rock formations have been estimated at more than 40,000 years old making them the oldest man-made structure on the planet. 
Australian poet Henry Lawson wrote a well-known ironic tribute to the Darling River. To quote another Henry Lawson poem: 
The skies are brass and the plains are bare, Death and ruin are everywhere;And all that is left of the last year's floodIs a sickly stream on the grey-black mud;The salt-springs bubble and the quagmires quiver,And this is the dirge of the Darling River.
The 1967 NCAA University Division Wrestling Championships were the 37th NCAA University Division Wrestling Championships to be held. Kent State University in Kent, Ohio hosted the tournament at Memorial Gym. 
Rick Sanders of Portland State was named the Most Outstanding Wrestler and Curley Culp of Arizona State received the Gorriaran Award. 
Carrie Ichikawa Jenkins is a Canadian philosopher who holds a Canada Research Chair and is Professor of Philosophy at the University of British Columbia. She is also a Professor at the Northern Institute of Philosophy, University of Aberdeen. Her primary research areas are epistemology, metaphysics, philosophy of logic, philosophy of language, and philosophy of mathematics. She is one of the principal editors of the journal Thought. 
She has held teaching and research positions at the University of St Andrews, the Australian National University, the University of Michigan and the University of Nottingham. She was head of the department of philosophy at the University of Nottingham from 2010 to 2011. 
Jenkins became involved in a dispute with Brian Leiter, a professor at the University of Chicago and then editor of the Philosophical Gourmet Report. His emailed remarks about Jenkins led to hundreds of philosophers refusing to provide data for the report, and ultimately led to his stepping down as its editor. 
From the late 90s, he regularly goes to New York, and shares his time between the United States of America and France. 
The next year, in 2012, the album Transition Cosmic Power comes out at Black and Blue. In this album, he endorses the roles of author, composer, arranger, singer and pianist. 
Some of the paintings represent animals: horses, deer, moose and even a marine animal (probably a whale)  and they are believed to have had some kind of ritual purpose to improve their hunting. There is also a panel representing female genitalia and it is believed to have had the intention to invoke fertility. The oldest painting in the cave represents an anthropomorphic figure, part male, part female. 
Apart from the paintings, some objects from the Magdalenian period were perfectly preserved. The most important ones are some harpoons made of bone and a carved staghorn of a goat head. 
"Why Don't We Get Drunk" is a novelty song written and performed by American singer-songwriter Jimmy Buffett. It was a B-side to "The Great Filling Station Holdup", the first single from his 1973 album A White Sport Coat and a Pink Crustacean. The song is a fan favorite, and until the 2007 Bama Breeze tour, was almost always performed at Buffett's live concerts.[citation needed] 
Buffett wrote the song under the pseudonym Marvin Gardens, derived from a property on the original Atlantic City version of the Monopoly game board.[citation needed] 
In the 1970s and 1980s, Buffett frequently sang the song in concert with one of the choruses replaced with "why don't we get stoned and screw." This can be heard on the 1978 live album release You Had to Be There, where Buffett declares, "I just bought some Colombian herb and we'll smoke it all, me and you." 
In the 1990s, though, Buffett modified the lyrics to include references to using condoms and getting a designated driver if necessary. He was quoted as saying, "It's my way of saying this is the '90s and that I don't want any of the fans to get drunk and drive, and to remind them about using a condom. By sticking the message in the song, it's a way to get the point across subtly, using some humor." 
Popeye 2 received average reviews with a score of 59% from Gamerankings and 2.95/5 from Nintendo Power. 
The classification of minerals is a process of determining to which of several groups minerals belong based on their chemical characteristics. Since the 1950s, this classification has been carried out by the International Mineralogical Association, which classifies minerals into the following broad classes: 
Elections in Alabama are authorized under the Alabama State Constitution,  which establishes elections for the state level officers, cabinet, and legislature, and the election of county-level officers, including members of school boards. 
The office of the Alabama Secretary of State has an Elections Division that oversees the execution of elections under state law? 
Since 1986, Republicans have won six of the seven gubernatorial elections and become increasingly competitive in Alabama politics at many levels. They currently control two seats of Alabama's U.S. Senate delegation and six out of seven of the state's U.S. Representative delegation. And all 9 seats on the Supreme Court of Alabama are held by Republicans. 
Two Republican lieutenant governors have been elected since Reconstruction, Steve Windom and Kay Ivey, the current governor. Windom served as lieutenant governor under Democratic Gov. Don Siegelman.  Before 2011, the last time that Alabama had a governor and lieutenant governor of the same party was the period between 1983 and 1987 when George Wallace was serving his fourth term as governor and Bill Baxley was serving as lieutenant governor; both were Democrats. 
As of the early 21st century, local elections in most rural counties, many of which are black dominated, are generally decided in the Democratic primary, and local elections in metropolitan and suburban counties, which are generally white majority, are decided in the Republican primary, although there are exceptions. 
In addition, Alabama, considered a "ruby-red" state (frequently supporting the GOP), elected Doug Jones, the Democratic candidate, as opposed to Roy Moore for the US Senator seat on 12 December 2017. 
In 1964, the state swung over dramatically to support Republican Barry Goldwater, who carried the state with an unheard-of 69 percent of the vote, carrying all but five counties. He was the first Republican to carry the state since 1872. Like much of the Deep South, Alabama's voters turned violently on President Lyndon Johnson in the wake of the Civil Rights Act of 1964. 
In the 1968 presidential election, Alabama supported native son and American Independent Party candidate George Wallace over both Richard Nixon and Hubert Humphrey. Wallace was the official Democratic candidate in Alabama, while Humphrey was the National Democratic nominee. In 1976, Democratic candidate Jimmy Carter from Georgia carried the state, the region, and the nation, but Democratic control of the region slipped after that. 
In 2004, George W. Bush won Alabama's nine electoral votes by a margin of 25 percentage points with 62.5% of the vote, mostly white voters. The 11 counties that voted Democratic were Black Belt counties, where African Americans are the majority racial group. 
The state's two U.S. senators are Republican Richard C. Shelby and Democrat Doug Jones. Richard Shelby was first elected in 1986 as a Democrat and switched parties after a Republican wave the 1994 midterm elections. Doug Jones was elected in a special election in 2017 to replace U.S. Attorney General Jeff Sessions, defeating former Alabama Supreme Court Chief Justice Roy Moore.  
In the U.S. House of Representatives, the state is represented by seven members, six Republicans (Bradley Byrne, Mike D. Rogers, Robert Aderholt, Morris J. Brooks, Martha Roby, and Gary Palmer) and one Democrat (Terri Sewell). 
The following table displays, by color, the parties of elected officials in the U.S. state of Alabama from 1817 to the current year. As such, it may indicate the political party strength at any given time. The officers listed include: 
For years in which a presidential election was held, the table indicates which party's nominees received the state's electoral votes. 
In 2006, Seppi made semifinals on hard courts in Sydney and grass in Nottingham, showing that he was able to perform well on other surfaces besides clay. Seppi ended the streak of four consecutive Sydney titles for Lleyton Hewitt and, in the process, saved two match points. Seppi lost against Andre Agassi in his last appearance at Wimbledon. 
At the 2007 Australian Open, Seppi defeated American Bobby Reynolds in five sets, after saving a match point. The match was scheduled for the afternoon, but was put back due to the heat. This match finished at 3:34 am, which was at the time the latest time for a match to be completed until it was surpassed by the Lleyton Hewitt and Marcos Baghdatis match at the 2008 Australian Open which started at 11:47pm and finished at 4:33am because of a two-hour delay. 
In the 2008 season Seppi won his first Challenger title at Bergamo where he defeated Julien Benneteau in the final for the loss of 1 set in the tournament.  
En route the quarterfinals at the 2012 Rome Masters, he defeated Stanislas Wawrinka in the third round, having saved six match points in the process. 
Seppi reached the fourth round of a Grand Slam for the first time in his career at the 2012 French Open, eventually being defeated by world #1 Novak Djokovic in five sets having won the first two sets. He defeated former World No. 3 Nikolay Davydenko in the first round and former top ten player Fernando Verdasco along the way. He did not fare as well at the other Grand Slam tournaments, losing in the first round of the Australian and US Opens as well as Wimbledon. 
Seppi finished the year 2012 ranked World No. 23 in singles, his best year-end ranking in his career. 
At the Sydney International the following week, Seppi reached the semifinals as the third seed, losing to eventual champion Tomic. 
Seppi reached the fourth round of the 2013 Australian Open for the first time at this Major, a result which saw him enter the top 20 in singles for the first time at a career-high of World No. 18 on 28 January 2013. 
Seppi's 2014 season started poorly; losing every match at the Hopman Cup. In the Sydney International, Seppi was seeded 3rd. He was defeated by Marinko Matosevic in the second round (bye first round). In the Australian Open, he beat Lleyton Hewitt in five sets but lost to Donald Young in the second round. 
In January at the 2015 Australian Open, the unseeded Seppi caused a huge upset by beating second seed and four-time champion Roger Federer in the third round in four sets, after having lost to him in ten previous meetings. Seppi was defeated in the next round by Nick Kyrgios in five sets, despite having a match point in the fourth set. 
In June, at the 2015 Gerry Weber Open, Roger Federer took his revenge for the earlier in the year loss over Seppi by winning the title. This was the biggest title championship match thus far for Seppi that he lost in straight sets. 
Seppi's first ATP tournament of the year was the Australian Open. After beating Paul-Henri Mathieu in the first round, he upset No.14 Nick Kyrgios, despite losing the first 2 sets of the match. He then took down Steve Darcis in 4 sets before falling to Stan Wawrinka in a tight 3-set, 3-tiebreak match. This matched Seppi's best result in singles at a Major.  
He then played the Sofia Open where he lost to Steve Darcis in the Round of 16. He lost in the first round of a challenger in Bergamo. He then lost in the first round of the Dubai Duty Free Tennis Championships to an in-form Fernando Verdasco. 
At the Australian Open 2018 he again reached the round of 16 for the fourth time in his career before losing to Kyle Edmund in 4 sets. 
At the 2021 US Open he reached the second round after a five setter with a final set tiebreak 2-6, 7-5, 6-4, 2-6, 7-6(13) where he defeated Marton Fucsovics, saving 5 match points. He then went on to reach the third round for the fourth time in his career defeating tenth seed Hubert Hurkacz in a stunning victory in four sets also with a final set tiebreak 2-6 6-4 6-4 7-6(6). 
Seppi is from the South Tyrol autonomous province in northern Italy. He considers grass and indoor hard courts his favourite surfaces and is coached by Massimo Sartori. Seppi is bilingual in German and Italian. He also speaks English. He supports A.C. Milan and his nicknames are Andy and also Seppio, given to him by his coach. 
Kyung-ja is one of a number of Japanese-style names ending in "ja", like Young-ja and Jeong-ja, that were popular when Korea was under Japanese rule, but declined in popularity afterwards. According to South Korean government data, it was the third-most popular name for newborn girls in 1940. However, by 1950 there were no names ending in "ja" in the top ten. 
The 1987 World Mountain Running Championships was the 3rd edition of the global Mountain running competition, World Mountain Running Championships, organised by the World Mountain Running Association and was held in Lenzerheide, Switzerland on 23 August 1987. 
Sultanabad is a Town in Sultanabad mandal of Peddapalli district in the state of Telangana, India. It was earlier known as Osmannagar. 
This article about a location in the Valencian Community, Spain, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Praga is a manufacturing company based in Prague, Czech Republic. The company produced automobiles, karts and planes. The Praga V3S 5-ton truck was used by the Czechoslovak Army for more than half a century. 
Besides building its own vehicles Praga later also supplied engines and gearboxes for other vehicles, like aircraft and tanks. 
In 1932 Praga added a second motorcycle model, the BC. This had a single overhead camshaft engine of 350cc, shaft drive and a pressed steel frame. Praga ended production of both motorcycle models in 1933. 
The factory was largely destroyed by air raids in 1945. After the Second World War it was rebuilt and resumed truck and bus construction. The firm was nationalized in October 1945. Passenger cars (only the mid-sized Lady) were also manufactured in small numbers until 1947, for use by government officials. 
In 2006 the Praga brand was purchased by the British company International Truck Alliance with the intention to produce trucks under the Praga brand in Lublin, Poland. In 2007 it produced gearboxes and hydraulic machinery. Later, the brand returned to the Czech company Praga-Export s.r.o. 
The Praga R1 from 2012 is a race car which competed in the Dutch Supercar Challenge and Britcar sports car racing. In 2016, the company delivered the first limited edition of the supersport road car Praga R1R, a derivative of the R1 race-car. This marks the first road-legal car under the Praga brand since 1947. 
All Praga automobile production stopped by 1947, but was restarted in 2011 when Praga constructed the R4S. It utilized a 3.2 liter V8 based on the Suzuki Hayabusa engine and produces 530 BHP, with a total weight of only 880 kilograms. A feature on the R4S are the markings for camber and toe, which eliminates the need of advanced tools, with a specific amount of "clicks" representing a certain degree of camber or toe. 
The Belloy Formation is a stratigraphical unit of Permian age in the Western Canadian Sedimentary Basin.  
It takes the name from the hamlet of Belloy, Alberta, and was first described in the Imperial Belloy 12-14-78-1W6M well by H.L. Halbertsma in 1959. 
The Belloy Formation is composed of mixed carbonate-siliciclastic sequences of cherty dolomite and sandstone, glauconitic and quartz sandstones, phosphorite, siltstones and conglomerate with phosphatic chert pebbles.  The Belloy was deposited along a northwest-trending, tidally-influenced, west-prograding shoreline.  
The  Belloy Formation is disconformably overlain by Triassic or younger beds (Montney Formation, Fort St. John Group). It is unconformably overlies Mississippian sediments such as those of the Rundle Group. 
The Belloy Formation is homotaxial with the Belcourt Formation and Kindle Formation of the Rocky Mountains. 
This article about a specific stratigraphic formation in Canada is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Kirby Misperton is a small village and civil parish in the Ryedale district of North Yorkshire, England and has a population of around 370. 
Adjacent to the village lies one of the most popular amusement parks in England, Flamingo Land Theme Park and Zoo. 
A gas field nearby, discovered in 1985, pipes gas to the Knapton Generating Station. The fields were bought by Kelt UK Ltd (owned by Kelt Energy plc and Edinburgh Oil & Gas plc) from Candecca Resources Ltd (owned by BP) in 1992. 
The Domesday Book recorded a total population of 14 households (13 villagers and 1 priest) with a total tax assessed of 2.8 geld units. The Lord in 1066 was recorded as Thorbrand, son of Karli and from 1086 the Canons of York (St. Peter). The Tenant-in-chief in 1086 was Berengar of Tosny. 
The Anglican parish church is dedicated to St Laurence and is part of the Benefice of Kirby Misperton, which is made up of the parishes of Kirby Misperton, Normanby and Salton, and the Benefice of Middleton, which is made up of the parishes of Middleton, Newton and Sinnington. 
The planning application C3/15/00971/CPO (NY/2015/0233/ENV) submitted to North Yorkshire County Council in 2015 for the proposed hydraulic fracturing operation was approved by the Planning Committee on 23 May 2016; Friends of the Earth and a local pressure group, Frack Free Ryedale, applied for judicial review of the decision, but this application was rejected in December 2016. In October 2017, Third Energy Onshore announced its intention to begin fracking within weeks. 
Third Energy began removing equipment from the site in early February 2018, as questions about the company's finances and management continued, including about the September 2017 appointments of former Carillion interim CEO Keith Cochrane as non-executive chairman, and of Jitesh Gadhia, a Conservative party peer and donor, as a non-executive director. Cochrane and Gadhia resigned as directors in September 2018. 
John-Michael Howson OAM (born 8 August 1936) is an Australian writer, reporter and entertainer and Melbourne radio commentator. His involvement in the Australian entertainment scene as a writer, producer and performer spans more than 50 years. 
Howson was born on 8 August 1936 in Elwood, Victoria. His parents separated when he was young and he moved to Western Australia with his mother and step-father (a former policeman and publican). He was educated at St Ildephonsus College, New Norcia, where he was a boarder. 
Howson's book I Found It At The Flickers was published by Horwitz Grahame Books in 1985. Howson has published two collections of horror stories - Once Upon a Nightmare: Ten Tales with a Twist (Pan Macmillan,  1998) and Deadly Dreams: Ten More Tales with Twist (Pan Macmillan, 2000). Howson wrote I Found it at the Flickers a 1985 autobiographical account of his growing up in Melbourne emphasising his love of the cinema. 
Howson was a regular panelist on 3AW's Sunday morning program, 'Sunday Morning'. During his appearances on 3AW, Howson has adopted vehemently anti-Muslim views, indicating that he would prefer not to talk to Muslims and referring to Muslims as "skilled propagandists". The Australian Broadcasting Corporation's Media Watch program did a segment outlining Howson's behaviour and views in May 2010. 
In February 2011, Howson had an abusive on-air tantrum over the Seven network's treatment of Opposition Leader and future Prime Minister Tony Abbott, in an interview with journalist Mark Riley. He verbally abused his radio 3AW co-presenter Nick McCallum, who was also a Channel Seven reporter and hurled sexist insults at a female producer, Cushla Travers. 
In November 2017, Howson went on a wild rant about "anti-coal nutjobs", suggesting climate change activists should kill themselves. He was forced to apologise later that day and meet management to discuss broadcasting codes and content. He was subsequently dismissed from 3AW. 
Howson was awarded an Order of Australia Medal in the 2009 Queen's Birthday Honours list "for service to the entertainment industry as a writer and performer". 
Howson lived in the Melbourne suburb of Balaclava for many years. He then moved to Los Angeles for 17 years and now holds dual US-Australian citizenship. 
Following the success of Shout he relocated back to Melbourne, Australia in 2006 where he lives with his Guatemalan partner, Alfie, and their three dogs. In recent years, Howson  has been publicly open about his homosexuality, a subject about which he was previously very guarded, mainly due to his conservative Roman Catholic beliefs. 
Howson is a patron of both the Melbourne Gay and Lesbian Chorus and of the St James the Great annual St Francis's Day Blessing of Animals. 
During his time at CIRA Brian together with colleagues at Teesside and worldwide attempted to explore the potential of new media for shaping the development, sustainability and even regeneration of community relations. What they described as community informatics was from the outset concerned with the relationship between geographical places where people lived, worked and socialized and the networked spaces provided by the Internet. 
The Networked Young Citizen: social media, political participation and civic engagement, (edited with Ariadne Vromen and Mike Xenos), New York: Routledge. (2014) 
Social Media and Democracy:  social media innovations in participatory politics, (edited with Dan Mercea) London: Routledge. (2012) 
Digital Welfare for the Third Age: Health and Social Care Informatics for Older People, (edited with Mike Hardey and Leigh Keeble) London: Routledge. (2009) 
Young Citizens in the Digital Age: Political Engagement, Young People and New Media, London: Routledge.  (ed.) (2007) 
Drian Francisco (born November 10, 1982 in Sablayan, Occidental Mindoro, Philippines), nicknamed Gintong Kamao (Golden Fist), is a Filipino professional boxer. Born in the province of Mindoro, Francisco currently resides in Agoncillo, Batangas. His younger brother Lloyd Francisco, like him, is also a professional boxer. 
Francisco is known for his powerful punches and aggressive style. His style was formerly compared to that of Luisito Espinosa. 
Francisco's father, Joe, was a former pro who is now a fireman. Early in his professional career, he was trained by former world flyweight titlist Erbito Salavarria. 
He won the WBO Asia Pacific flyweight title by a 7th round TKO win over Pichitchok Singmanassak on December 30, 2006. On August 4, 2007, he defended it by stopping Wanmeechok Singwancha in one round. 
After a year of inactivity, he was back in the ring on April 19, 2009 where he scored a TKO win over Sharil Fabanyo. This was held at the Araneta Coliseum and was undercard of the Nonito Donaire - Raul Martinez match. 
Francisco won the WBA International super flyweight title on October 3, 2009 by stopping former WBA Flyweight Champion Roberto Vasquez in 10 rounds. 
He fought Duangpetch Kokietgym on November 30, 2010 in Nong Khai, Thailand for the WBA interim superflyweight title. He won the bout with an impressive 10th round knockout.  It was a tough fight for Drian as Kokietgym repeatedly landed low blows. But in the end, Drian Francisco was able to overcome and knockout Kokietgym for the victory and WBA Interim Superflyweight Championship crown. The Thai fighter was down and out for only the second time in 54 fights. 
Drian Francisco will most likely fight the winner of the Dec. 23 fight between WBA superflyweight champion Hugo Cazares and Japanese challenger Hiroyuki Hisataka. The winner of that fight will be mandated to stake the crown against Francisco on March 9. Cazares, 32, is traveling to Osaka to face Hisataka in his third title defense. 
On 1 May 2011 Drian Francisco defensed his WBA interim World Super Flyweight title to Thai boxer Tepparith Singwancha  at Thailand. Francisco was knocked down in the third round. At the end Francisco lost WBA interim World Super Flyweight title for  Thai boxer in Unanimous decision 113-114,113-114,111-117  
He was the son of Sir Thomas Jermyn (died 1552) of Rushbrooke by his wife Anne Spring, the eldest daughter of Thomas Spring of Lavenham, Suffolk. 
He inherited his father's Rushbrooke Hall estate following his death in 1552. A fervent Roman Catholic, he was knighted by Queen Mary I and served as a Justice of the Peace in Suffolk. In this role he was a notable prosecutor and persecutor of Protestants across East Anglia until the accession of Queen Elizabeth I. He served as Sheriff of Norfolk and Suffolk in 1558 and 1572. 
In 1538 he married Anne Heveningham, daughter of George Heveningham of Rushbrooke, by whom he had thirteen children, including: 
Horseshoe Bay is a major ferry terminal owned and operated by BC Ferries in British Columbia, Canada. Located in the village of Horseshoe Bay, a suburb of West Vancouver, the terminal provides a vehicle ferry link from the Lower Mainland to Vancouver Island, the Sunshine Coast, and to Bowen Island, a small island in the southern part of Howe Sound. 
There are currently 3 berths at Horseshoe Bay, making it the third largest BC Ferries terminal, after Tsawwassen and Swartz Bay. 
In 2005, the Queen of Oak Bay ferry lost control and smashed into a number of private boats at the marina in Horseshoe Bay; no fatalities were reported. 
Helicina rostrata is a species of tropical land snail with an operculum, a terrestrial gastropod mollusk in the family Helicinidae. 
Paula Haapakoski (born February 3, 1977) is a Finnish orienteering competitor. She is two times Relay World Champion, from 2006 and 2007, as member of the Finnish winning teams in the World Orienteering Championships. 
This biographical article about a Finnish orienteer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In American Advanced Placement exams, a document-based question (DBQ), also known as data-based question, is an essay or series of short-answer questions that is constructed by students using one's own knowledge combined with support from several provided sources. Usually, it is employed on timed history tests.  
A typical DBQ is a packet of several original sources (anywhere from three to sixteen), labeled by letters (beginning with "Document A" or "Source A") or numbers. Usually all but one or two source(s) are textual, with the other source(s) being graphic (usually a political cartoon, map, or poster if primary and a chart or graph if secondary). In most cases, the sources are selected to provide different perspectives or views on the events or movements being analyzed. 
On the Advanced Placement (AP) exams, only primary sources are provided; on the International Baccalaureate (IB) exams, both primary and secondary sources are provided. AP exams also require students to construct and defend a thesis based on one prompt, while IB exams focus on a series of questions, with at least one asking students to assess the "value and limitations" of a source, usually "with reference to the documents' origin or purpose." 
The documents contained in the document-based questions are rarely familiar texts (for example, the Emancipation Proclamation and Declaration of Independence are not likely to be on a U.S. history test), though the documents' authors may be major historical figures. The documents vary in length and format. 
On some tests students are not permitted to begin responding to the question or questions in the essay packet until after a mandatory reading time ("planning period"), usually around 10 to 15 minutes. During this time, students read the passage and, if desired, make notes or markings. After this period, students are permitted to respond, usually for around 45 minutes to an hour. 
Clifford Bundy Stearns Sr. (born April 16, 1941) is an American businessman and politician who was the U.S. Representative for Florida's 6th congressional district from 1989 to 2013. He is a member of the Republican Party. 
On August 14, 2012, Stearns lost to veterinarian Ted Yoho in a four-way Republican primary by about one percent of the vote. 
In 2012, Stearns donated a collection of his papers to The George Washington University. The collection largely consists of his committee work, but also includes personal and political correspondence, briefing books, and travel agendas. The collection is currently under the care of GW's Special Collections Research Center, located in the Estelle and Melvin Gelman Library. 
Since leaving Congress, he has worked for APCO Worldwide, a public relations firm headquartered in Washington D.C. Stearns is also a member of APCO Worldwide International Advisory Council. He sits on the boards of the Graduate School of Political Management at The George Washington University, Minority Media & Telecom Council, and the United States Association of Former Members of Congress. 
Stearns was born in Washington, D.C., the son of Emily E. (Newlin) and Clifford Robert Stearns. He was educated at Woodrow Wilson High School, and later earned a degree in electrical engineering from George Washington University. He is also a member of the University's Gamma Beta chapter of Theta Tau, a professional/social engineering fraternity, and participated in the Air Force Reserve Officer Training Corps there and was honored as the Air Force ROTC Distinguished Military Graduate. 
Following graduation, he served four years in the United States Air Force as an aerospace engineer in satellite reconnaissance during the Vietnam War. Stearns owned a small chain of motels and restaurants in northern Florida. Before moving to Florida, he worked with a variety of businesses in Florida, such as CBS, Data Control Systems Inc, and Kutola Advertising. 
He was also a member of the Engineering Honor Society Sigma Tau, which later merged into the Tau Beta Pi Association which recognizes superior scholarship and/or leadership achievement in the fields of engineering. 
Redistricting after the 2010 census shifted Stearns' home in Ocala to the 11th District (the old 5th District), but shifted the bulk of his territory to the Gainesville-based 3rd District.  Rather than challenge freshman Republican Rich Nugent in the 11th, Stearns opted to run in the 3rd, which contained two-thirds of his former territory. 
Although the White House instituted an internal review of the loan guarantee program, Stearns believes that the review should have occurred before the Obama administration handed out the money. 
Stearns received emails showing that the White House had a major influence on the loan guarantee as well as on the Solyndra loan restructuring that subordinated the taxpayers to two commercial firms in violation of the Energy Policy Act of 2005. 
During the hearing, Stearns stated the outbreak was preventable had the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) acted. The FDA knew of severe quality control violations at NEC as early as 2002, and in 2006 the FDA threatened NECC if it did not comply with regulations. During the hearing, FDA Commissioner Dr. Margaret Hamburg testified that the FDA lacked the authority to close down NECC. 
As Chairman of the Energy & Commerce Subcommittee on Oversight and Investigations, Stearns conducted the first-ever oversight on taxpayer funding of Planned Parenthood, the largest abortion provider in the United States. 
The investigation was sweeping, requesting internal audits dating back 12 years and state audits for the past 20 years for the national organization and all 83 of its affiliates. Representative Henry Waxman questioned the political motivations for the timing of the investigation, saying, "Your fervent ideological opposition to Planned Parenthood does not justify launching this intrusive investigation." 
Stearns was one of only 39 House members to receive an "A" rating from the National Taxpayers Union (NTU). In addition, in 2010 Citizens Against Government Waste once again named Stearns a "Taxpayer Hero." 
Stearns also is a strong opponent of automatic congressional pay raises.  He also offered legislation to prevent a pay increase in a year following a federal budget deficit. 
Stearns voted for Cut, Cap & Balance & the Boehner Debt Ceiling Bill; however, he voted against the final Debt Ceiling compromise bill (The "Budget Control Act of 2011"). 
Stearns has been working on extending privacy protection for about 10 years.  In 2003, the International Association of Privacy Professionals gave Stearns its Privacy Leadership Award for his efforts on leadership, including holding the most extensive hearings on privacy issues as Chairman of the Commerce, Trade & Consumer Protection Subcommittee. 
Stearns is the Chairman of the Energy and Commerce Committee's Oversigh and Investigations Subcommittee. From 2001 until 2007, Stearns was Chairman of the Commerce, Trade, and Consumer Protection Subcommittee and he still serves on the Subcommittee. He helped to create the Do-Not-Call List to protect consumers from unwanted telephone solicitations and legislation to combat spyware, which is software that allows a third party to monitor the computer use of individuals without their knowledge. 
During consideration of cap-and-trade legislation in the Energy and Commerce Committee in May 2009, Stearns offered an amendment to afford existing nuclear power plants the same benefits provided to new nuclear power plants in the bill. The amendment simply recognized that nuclear is carbon free and did not provide any new subsidy to the industry.[citation needed] 
In 2008, Stearns joined in offering a package of bills to increase domestic energy production. This included more domestic oil and gas production, greater use of clean-coal technology, reducing the barriers to new nuclear power plants, and encouraging renewable energy sources. 
During consideration of the health care legislation, Stearns offered the following amendments[citation needed]: 
Prohibit funds to be used by the Internal Revenue Service to implement a Spanish-language version of the "Where's my Refund?" service.[citation needed] 
Cut $25.5 million from AmeriCorps and increase funding for TRIO educational programs and the geriatric program.[citation needed] 
Prohibit use of funds for the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission for litigation expenses incurred in connection with cases against employers on the grounds that such employers require employees to speak English.[citation needed] 
While a Member of Congress, Stearns received the Air Force Association W. Stuart Symington Award, the highest honor presented to a civilian in the field of national security for his work in behalf of the United States Air Force. 
The son of the first-class cricketer Jim Dewes, and the grandson of the Test cricketer John Dewes, he was born at Frimley in August 1995. Dewes played minor counties cricket for Dorset in 2013, making one appearance in the Minor Counties Championship against Wales Minor Counties at Bournemouth. He later studied at Durham University, where he played two first-class matches for Durham MCCU in 2016, against Gloucestershire at Bristol, and Durham at Chester-le-Street. 
Geiser left San Francisco in 1976 and spent two years in Paris, where he studied at the Ecole des Beaux-Arts. He returned to the United States in 1979, settling in SoHo, New York in the early 1980s. At that point, Geiser began concentrating on oil painting and moving into abstract expressionism. His canvases are tactile and deep, often being composed of many layers of shellac, pitch, tar, rope and scrap wood. 
Geiser was married to actress Mercedes Ruehl. In 2001 they moved to East Hampton where they lived with their son, Jake. A son from a previous marriage, Cameron Geiser, lives in Montara, California. They put their Hampton house on the market in 2017; the same year Ruehl was quoted as saying that they were no longer together, but remained close. 
David Geiser died unexpectedly of heart disease in his sleep at home on October 14, 2020, at the age of 73. 
This article about a painter from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This profile of an American comics creator, writer, or artist is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Flora of the Colorado Desert, located in Southern California. The Colorado Desert is a sub-region in the Sonoran Desert ecoregion of southwestern North America. It is also known as the Low Desert, in contrast to the higher elevation Mojave Desert or High Desert, to its north. 
The desert flora comprises terrestrial plant communities including: creosote bush scrub; alkali sink, desert dry wash, mixed scrub; desert saltbush; sandy soil grasslands; desert dunes. The higher elevation Madrean Sky Islands are dominated by pinyon pine and California juniper (Juniperus californica), with areas of Manzanita and Coulter pine (Pinus coulteri).  
More than half of the Colorado Desert's plant species are herbaceous annuals, and appropriately timed winter rains produce abundant early Spring wildflowers. In the southern portion of the region, the additional moisture supplied by summer rainfall fosters the germination of summer annual plants. The summer monsoons also support smoketree, Desert Ironwood, and palo verde trees in desert washes. Hardy perennials and the  
In the Colorado Desert's arid environment, aquatic and wetland habitats are limited in extent but are critically important to wildlife. Runoff from seasonal rains and groundwater emergence flow seasonally in desert bajadas and washes, arroyos, and ephemeral streams, and brine lakes. 
Springs and seeps feed oases, freshwater marshes, and a few foothill perennial streams year round.  desert riparian vegetation communities dominated by cottonwood, willow, and non-native tamarisk. Two of the region's most significant aquatic systems are the Salton Sea and the Colorado River.  
While most desert wildlife depend on aquatic habitats as water sources, a number of species, such as the arroyo toad, desert pupfish, Yuma rail, and southwestern willow flycatcher, are restricted to these habitats. In some places, summer rains produce short-lived seasonal pools that host uncommon species like Couch's spadefoot toad. 
Vegetation types and habitats are differentiated by elevation The higher elevation Madrean Sky Islands support Single-leaf Pinyon pine (Pinus monophylla) and California juniper (Juniperus californica), with areas of Manzanita and Coulter pine (Pinus coulteri).  
Desert riparian habitats support Fremont cottonwood (Populus fremontii), willows (Salix species). Introduced Tamarisk trees are an invasive species in these areas. 
The men's 4 x 400 metres relay event  at the 2000 European Athletics Indoor Championships was held on February 27. 
Burke W. Whitman is an American executive, board director, and former United States Marine Corps general. He serves and leads national and global organizations in business, civil society, and national service. 
Whitman is Chief Executive of Colmar Holdings, which provides capital and governance to enterprises committed to the common good. He is a member of the Boards of Directors of two publicly listed companies: Amicus Therapeutics (Nasdaq: FOLD), a global biotech and biopharma company which provides advanced therapies for rare diseases; and Omega Healthcare Investors (NYSE: OHI), a global health and real estate company which invests capital in the future of senior care. 
Whitman holds masters degrees in business, strategy, and ministry. He is a graduate of Harvard Business School (MBA), the Army War College (MSS), and Nashotah House Theological Seminary (MM 2021). He earned a BA from Dartmouth College on a scholarship, where he was a member of the rugby team and Sphinx Senior Society. Reared in Atlanta, he earned a diploma from The Lovett School. 
Institutional Investor Magazine named him a repeat Best CFO and Best CEO. The Washington Examiner reported on its editorial page that he was worth $580 million to corporate shareholders based on stock market reaction to the announcement of his appointment as CEO. Fortune Magazine recognized Triad as the fastest growing Fortune 500 company in earnings per share (EPS) during the period he was CFO. 
The United States of America awarded him the Distinguished Service Medal, Combat Action Ribbons, Presidential Unit Citation, and other military decorations. 
Thomas Thurston Thomas (born 1948), also writing as Thomas T. Thomas and Thomas Wren, is primarily a science fiction author. 
Thomas was born in Summit, New Jersey, in 1948. He attended Warren Area High School and graduated in 1966. He then attended Pennsylvania State University, graduating with honors in 1970 with a bachelor's degree in English Literature. 
He has also contributed one title, An Honorable Defense (1988), to the Crisis of Empire series (with David Drake), and the novelette Hey Diddle Diddle to the fifth installment of the Man-Kzin Wars series (based in the Known Space Universe of Larry Niven). 
This article about an American science fiction writer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
  Six ships of the Royal Navy have been named HMS Talbot, probably after John Talbot, 1st Earl of Shrewsbury: 
HMS Talbot was also the name of the Royal Navy's submarine base at Manoel Island, Malta during the Second World War. 
It has long been held by the Hawke family. A 1618 transfer of land rights to a Nicholas Hawke refers to the "mansion house, barton and demesnes called Bodgate in North Petherwin" Tithe apportionments produced under the Tithe Commutation Act 1836 show the estate consisted of 326 acres c1840, held by a Richard Hawke. 
Both the 19th century Bodgate farmhouse, and the nearby c. 17th century stable block are Grade II listed buildings. 
This article about a location in the former district of North Cornwall, England is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Boston & Worcester Railroad (B&W), extending outwards from Boston, reached through the West Parish of Needham in mid-1834. North Needham station was the terminus for a few months while construction continued towards Worcester. In 1839, the line was double tracked through the area. 
The station was later renamed Grantvile, then briefly Nehoiden, and finally Wellesley Hills in 1881 when the West Parish was fully separated from Needham as the town of Wellesley. 
Wellesley Hills station was designed by Henry Hobson Richardson in 1885 for the Boston & Albany Railroad, and was the last in a series of stations he designed, all featuring rough-cut light colored stone with dark stone trim around windows and doors, slate roofs, and varying amounts of decorative dark stone carvings. As a B&A station, it originally served both commuter trains in the Boston Metropolitan Area and long distance trains toward Albany, New York. 
In June 2021, the MBTA issued a $28 million design contract for a project to add a third track from Weston to Framingham, including reconstruction of the three Wellesley stations and West Natick station. The project was expected to cost around $400 million, of which rebuilding Wellesley Hills station would be $43-45 million, with completion in 2030. 
A critic of both democracy and totalitarianism, he supported authoritarian rule and German supremacy in Europe. His vision of history was narrowed to German interests and of little sympathy to foreign nations but full of disdain for Catholicism. He cooperated with Nazi historians on anti-Polish propaganda.[citation needed] Eventually, his conflict with the Nazi regime got him arrested by it in 1944. 
Following World War II, Professor Ritter worked to restore German nationalism by attempting to separate it from Nazi ideology, and favored pursuit of German national interests rather than reconciliation with victims of German aggression. At the end of his career, he argued against theories of the German historian Fritz Fischer. Ritter was an honorary member of the American Historical Association from 1959. 
His studies were continued at the Universities of Munich, Heidelberg, and Leipzig. Ritter began serving as a teacher in 1912. While studying at Heidelberg, Ritter was a research assistant to the national-liberal historian Hermann Oncken, who was a major influence on Ritter. Professor Oncken opposed the Nazis, and was later forced to resign in 1935. 
Ritter fought as an infantryman in the First World War. Ritter was strongly committed to a German victory. While he criticized the ideology of Pan-German League as chauvinistic nationalism, he found it difficult to come to terms with the German defeat. 
He regarded the German defeat of 1918 as a great disaster. Ritter believed that the monarchy had been the best form of government for Germany and that the Weimar Republic was a grave mistake since Germany did not have a tradition of republicanism. Ritter subscribed to the 19th-century view of history as a form of political education for the elite, and contemporary politics were always a pressing concern for him. 
Ritter's Luther biography was written in large part under the impact of the defeat of 1918 and so Ritter went to great lengths to defend what he regarded as the unique German spirit against what Ritter saw as the corrupt, materialist spiritual outlook of the West. Throughout his life, Lutheranism was a major influence on Ritter's writings. 
Already, at midday on January 30, 1933, in a fateful step, the German President Paul von Hindenburg had confirmed the leader of the Nazi party as the new German chancellor, to lead for a time a minority government. 
Ritter publicly referred to the Nazi Reich as the "peaceful center of Europe" that would form a "bulwark against Bolshevism", and he praised the German Anschluss (union) with Austria. Having supported well before 1933 the idea of Greater Germany, Ritter at first defended the Nazi invasion as a realization of the German hopes. He went on record praising the Anschluss as the "boldest and most felicitous foreign policy feat of our new government." 
The deep belief which Ritter had in a Rechtsstaat (a state upheld by law) made him increasingly concerned at Nazi violations of legal codes. In 1935, while remaining very cautious about his public comments on Nazism generally, he attempted to defend his mentor, Oncken, against attacks by Nazis. The NSDAP officials had objected to a paper by Oncken which implied that the Nazi revolution was not the greatest revolution of all time. 
Ritter's 1936 short interpretive biography of Frederick the Great has been described by the American military historian Peter Paret as one of the finest military biographies ever written. 
Historian Russell Weigley called it "the best introduction to Frederick the Great and indeed to European warfare in his time". James J. Sheehan says it is the best book in English on the famous king. 
Ritter's biography was designed as a challenge to Nazi ideology which said there was a continuity between Frederick and Hitler. Dorpalen says, "The book was indeed a very courageous indictment of Hitler's irrationalism and recklessness, his ideological fanaticism and insatiable lust for power." Dorpalen nevertheless criticized Ritter's historiography as apologetic of Prussian militarism, German past and figures like Frederick the Great and Bismarck 
In March 1936, upon witnessing the Remilitarization of the Rhineland, Ritter wrote in a letter to his mother that for his children "who had never seen German soldiers from close up, this is one of the greatest experiences ever.... Truly a great and magnificent experience. May God grant that it does not lead to some international catastrophe". 
Ritter was a devout Lutheran and became a member of the Confessing Church, a group of dissenting Lutherans who resisted the Nazi inspired and Nazi imposed "Aryan Christianity" in the 1930s. 
In 1938, Ritter was the only faculty member at Freiburg to attend the funeral of Edmund Husserl, considered the founder of the modern philosophical school of phenomenology. Husserl had been on the faculty at the University of Freiburg until the Nazis in 1933 caused him to be dismissed because of his Jewish origins. 
Husserl was then also prevented from publishing his works. Ritter's presence at the funeral of Husserl was widely interpreted at the time (and since) as an act of quiet courage and political protest against the Nazi regime. After the Kristallnacht pogrom, Ritter wrote in a letter to his mother: "What we have experienced over the last two weeks all over the country is the most shameful and most dreadful thing that has happened for a long time". 
In 1938, Ritter delivered a series of lectures in Jena attacking Friedrich Nietzsche. These lectures were intended by Ritter to be a form of indirect protest against the Nazi regime. 
Later, Ritter worked as an advisor to the German conservative politician Carl Goerdeler. Together they considered a future constitution after the overthrow of the Nazis. Both were involved in the secret plans to take down Hitler (see below "In assassination plot"). 
In a Denkschrift submitted to Goerdeler in January 1943, Ritter wrote that "Hundreds of thousands of human beings have been systematically murdered solely because of their Jewish ancestry." Although urging that the Holocaust should be immediately ended, Ritter went on in the same memo to suggest that, in a future post-Nazi government, the modern civil rights of Jews should be restricted. 
In 1940, Ritter published Machtstaat und Utopie (National Power and Utopia). In this book, Ritter argued that democracy was a luxury that only militarily-secure states could afford. Ritter argued that because Great Britain was an island, this provided a degree of security that allows democracy. By contrast, Ritter argued that Germany with its location in Central Europe needed an authoritarian government as the only way of maintaining  security. 
Ritter praised Machiavelli as the ideal thinker who understood the "paradox of power"; namely, state power to be effective always involves the use of or threat of violence. Accordingly, society could not function without an armed police power to hold it together (and a military against foreign threats). Ritter criticized More for refusing to acknowledge this paradox of power; instead, More seems to pretend that morality could function in politics without the threat of and/or use of violence. 
During World War II, Ritter became involved in work on a study of civilian-military relations in Germany from the 18th century to the 20th century. The original intent behind this work was to offer a critique of the "total war" philosophy of General Erich Ludendorff as a form of indirect protest against Nazi Germany. Censorship prevented the book from being published during the war and, after 1945, Ritter revised his work to publish it as a four-volume study of German militarism. 
Ritter saw his main task after 1945 of seeking to restore German nationalism against what he regarded as unjust slurs. Ritter argued that Germans needed a positive view of their past but warned against the appeal of "false concepts of honor and national power". He belonged to group of German historians who rejected reconciliation with victim of Nazi German aggression in favor of Germany pursuing national interests. 
He railed against the fact that the Allies occupational authorities had confiscated German archives at the end of World War II and had begun to publish a critical edition of German foreign policy records without the participation of German historians. He used his official position as the first postwar head of the German Historical Association to demand the return of the records and held the opinion that their absence hurt his own research projects the most. 
Besides defending German nationalism, Ritter became active in the ecumenical movement after 1945 and urged conservative Catholics and Protestants to come together in the Christian Democratic Union, arguing that based on his experience in Nazi Germany, Christians regardless of their church needed to work together against totalitarianism. 
During the war, as a result of his underground work, Ritter came to know a number of Catholic and Calvinist members of the German opposition, which caused Ritter to abandon his former prejudices against Calvinists and Catholics. Ritter came to the conclusion that whatever differences divided Lutherans, Catholics and Calvinists, member of three churches had more in common, to unite them against the Nazis. 
In 1954, Ritter published an acclaimed biography of Carl Goerdeler, a close friend, a conservative politician who was executed by the Nazis in 1945. Goerdeler was a devout Lutheran, and himself the son of a conservative Prussian politician. Ritter pushed for the translation of his Goerdeler biography into English to counter the publication of John W. Wheeler-Bennett's book Nemesis of Power which, in his view, vilified the German resistance. 
Ritter specialized in German political, military, and cultural history. Ritter always drew a sharp distinction between what he regarded as the Machtpolitik (power politics) of Bismarck where military policy was subjected to carefully limited political goals and the endless expansionism motivated by militarism and bizarre racial theories of the Nazis. 
Ritter was well known for his assertions denying that there was a uniquely aggressive German version of militarism. For Ritter, militarism was the "one-sided determination of political decisions on the basis of technical military considerations", and foreign expansionism, and had nothing to do with values of a society. 
In a paper presented to the German Historical Convention in 1953, "The Problem of Militarism in Germany", Ritter argued traditional Prussian leaders such as Frederick the Great were a Machtpolitiker (power politician), not a militarist since in Ritter's view, Frederick was opposed to "the ruthless sacrifice of all life to the purposes of war" and instead was interested in creating "a lasting order of laws and peace, to further general welfare, and to moderate the conflict of interests". 
Though many regarded Ritter's work as an apologia for German nationalism and conservatism, Ritter was at times critical of aspects of the German past. Though Ritter commented that many nations had bent their knees in submission to false values, "the Germans accepted all of that with special ardor when it was now preached to them by National Socialism, and their nationalism had in general displayed from its beginning a particularly intense, combative quality". 
"We constantly run the risk not only of being condemned by the world as nationalists, but actually being misused as expert witnesses by all those circles and tendencies that, in their impatient and blind nationalism, have shut their ears to the teachings of the most recent past. Never was our political responsibility greater, not only to Germany, but also to Europe and the world. And yet never has our path been so dangerously narrow between Scylla and Charybdis as today".
In 1953, Ritter found a copy of the "Great Memorandum" relating to German military planning written by General Alfred Graf von Schlieffen in 1905. The following year, Ritter published the "Great Memorandum" together with his observations about the Schlieffen Plan as Der Schlieffen-Plan: Kritik Eines Mythos (The Schlieffen Plan: Critique of a Myth). 
In his last years, Ritter emerged as the leading critic of the left-wing historian Fritz Fischer, who claimed that there were powerful lines of continuity between the German Empire and Nazi Germany and that it was Germany that caused World War I. During the ferocious "Fischer Controversy" that engulfed the West German historical profession in the 1960s, Ritter was the best known of Fischer's critics. 
Likewise, in reference to the order by Bethmann Hollweg to Siegfried von Roedern, the State Secretary for Alsace-Lorraine, to end Francophobic remarks in the German-language press in Alsace, Ritter claimed it was proof of Germany's desire not to have a wider war in 1914; Ritter accordingly claimed also that Fischer's contrary interpretation of Bethmann Hollweg's order was not supported by the facts. 
Ritter strongly disagreed with Fischer's interpretation of the meeting of Moltke, Bethmann Hollweg and General Erich von Falkenhayn (the Prussian War Minister) on 30 July 1914. Rather than a conscious decision to wage an aggressive war, as Fischer argued, Ritter's claim was that news of Russia's mobilization led the German generals into persuading a reluctant Bethmann Hollweg to activate the Schlieffen Plan. 
According to Richard J. Evans, the outcome of the Fischer Controversy and of Ritter's role in it "only succeeded in giving Fischer's massive, scholarly and extremely detailed book a national prominence it would probably not otherwise have achieved". Evans notes that after his death, Ritter was usually cast as the "villain of this affair, as Fischer's views, at least in their more moderate forms, gained widespread acceptance among a younger generation of historians". 
A history book on Imperial Germany by Hans-Ulrich Wehler published in 1973 held that as a result of Fischer's theories, "two opposing schools of thought" formed. The first agreed with Fischer. The second, while admitting Fischer shows much political talk in high circles that sounds quite war-like, held that Fischer failed to find the actual political decisions and military actions that he claimed. 
Niall Ferguson, a British historian, served as a professor at Oxford University, and currently at Harvard University. In his 1998 work on World War I entitled The Pity of War, Ferguson reviews Fischer's claims about German objectives in a European war. 
Born in Richmond, Missouri, Milligan received his bachelor's and law degrees from the University of Missouri. He practiced law and became Richmond city attorney and then probate judge for Ray County, Missouri. He was a federal prosecutor from 1934 to 1945. 
After toppling Pendergast, Milligan ran in 1940 for the US Senate seat held by Harry S. Truman. Milligan and Missouri Governor Lloyd C. Stark split the anti-Pendergast vote in the Democratic primary and so Truman won. Truman had defeated Milligan's brother, Jacob "Tuck" Milligan, in the Democratic primary for Truman's first Senate term in 1934. 
Maurice Milligan began his assault on the Pendergast machine after the 1936 election and got convictions on 259 of 278 defendants. Milligan's case against Pendergast centered on a $750,000 insurance payoff scam and a failure to pay federal income taxes from 1927 to 1937. Pendergast ultimately pleaded guilty to two charges of income tax evasion and was fined $10,000 and sentenced to 15 months in federal prison. 
This biography of a state judge in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Henri Krasucki's father, Izaak, a worker and activist, emigrated from Poland with his wife, a textile worker and communist activist, in 1926. During the German occupation, his father was arrested on charges of sabotage on 20 January 1943 and interned at Drancy internment camp, before being deported on 13 February to Birkenau concentration camp where he was gassed at his arrival. 
France is renowned for its strikes in which almost all the workforce put down tools. On one occasion a protest march was held by consumers protesting against the strikes. Among their slogans was "Krasucki en Russie", a call for Krasucki to be exiled to Russia, then part of the Soviet Union.[citation needed] 
A roundabout in the 20th arrondissement of Paris was given the name Place Henri Krasucki in his honor on 23 June 2005. It is located at the intersection of Rue des Couronnes, Rue de la Mare, Rue Des Envierges and Rue des Cascades near Belleville. For a long time Krasucki lived just off the roundabout at 107 Rue des Couronnes.[citation needed] 
Haakon Stephen Bruun-Hanssen (born 8 July 1960, in Bergen) is a Norwegian officer with the rank of Admiral and Inspector General of the Navy. He was appointed  head of the operational headquarters of the Norwegian Armed Forces and Chief of Defence from 2013 to 2020. He retired in August 2020, and Eirik Kristoffersen was appointed as his replacement. 
Bruun-Hanssen holds The Defence Service Medal with Laurel Branch, Defence Medal with one star and The Royal Norwegian Navy's Prowess Medal with three stars. In 2009 Bruun-Hanssen was appointed Grand Officer of the Order of Merit of the Italian Republic. In April 2011 Bruun-Hanssen was awarded the American decoration Legion of Merit. 
The film released on 29 April 2011 across Karnataka to positive response. However critics noted that the remake version could not match up to its original Tamil version. The film was also dubbed into Hindi as Dildaar in 2013. The film collected 1,00,00,000 rupees at box office. 
The audio was launched on Akshaya Audio label. The audio launch event was held at Bangalore with actor Yogesh presence. Actress Aindrita Ray was absent at the event as she was away on a trip. There was a row between actress and director over her absence which was amicably solved later. The song "Amma Loosa" was hugely popular among the masses and was on top of the dance charts for many weeks. 
Sadhana better known by her stage name Shari is an Indian film and television actress. She was a prominent lead actress from 1982 to 1995 in Malayalam, Tamil, Kannada, and Telugu films. Currently she is active in South Indian TV serials, mainly in Tamil. 
Sadhana was born to Vishwanathan and Saraswathi in Andhra Pradesh. She is a trained classical dancer who learned Bharata Natyam from Padma Subrahmanyam and Kuchipudi from Vempati Chinna Satyam. She had her primary education from Saraswathi Vidyalaya Matriculation Higher Secondary School, Chennai. She is the grand daughter of famous Kannada actress B. Ramadevi. 
She married Kumar, a businessman, in 1991. They have a daughter, Kalyani born in 1993. Sadhana is currently acting in Tamil TV serials. She resides with her family in Chennai. 
She rose to fame after Namukku Parkkan Munthiri Thoppukal (1986). She received a Kerala State film award for the same. In the Tamil industry, she is known as Sadhana. She received her first offer in a supporting role in Hitler Umanath in 1982 where she played Sivaji Ganesan's daughter. However she gained attention in her role as the heroine in Nenjathai Allitha (1984) where she was paired with actor Mohan.  
Pazze di me (English: Crazy About Me) is a 2013 Italian comedy film co-written and directed by Fausto Brizzi. 
As the end credits roll, Andrea's phone receives several text messages from his family, announcing new disasters: Matilde hit a cop with her electric wheelchair and escaped, Federica has forgotten her baby at the supermarket (right after the message arrives, a loudspeaker announcement about an abandoned baby is heard in the background), Beatrice announces suicide after discovering a white hair, Veronica has fallen in love with Roberta's father, Andrea's father has returned to the family. 
This article about a location in Western Australia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a location in the Community of Madrid, Spain is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Indigenous Literacy Foundation (ILF) is an Australian not-for-profit founded in 2011 that works to address the educational disadvantages faced by Indigenous Australian children and young people by providing access to books and literacy programs. 
ILF was set up in 2011, taking over from the Indigenous Literacy Project (ILP) which had been associated with The Fred Hollows Foundation. In 2010 the ILP had raised $607,000. Juliet Rogers, formerly CEO of Murdoch Books, was the inaugural chair. 
Patrons of the ILF, as of 2021, are Quentin Bryce AD CVO (appointed February 2015) and June Oscar AO (appointed September 2019). 
Lifetime ambassadors of the ILF include Justine Clarke, Andy Griffiths, Kate Grenville, Anita Heiss, Alison Lester, David Malouf and Josh Pyke. 
In September 2021 Karen Williams, who had been member of the ILP and executive director of the ILF, stepped down and was replaced by Ben Bowen as Chief Executive Officer, with Mike Milnes appointed Chief Operating Officer. 
The ILF was nominated for the Astrid Lindgren Memorial Award in 2021 in which it was unsuccessful, and is a nominee again 2022. 
Each year the ILF organises and promotes Indigenous Literacy Day, held in the first week of September. 
Opossum Branch is a stream in Montgomery County in the U.S. state of Missouri. It is a tributary of Elkhorn Creek. 
This Montgomery County, Missouri state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Acrobasis dulcella is a species of snout moth in the genus Acrobasis. It was described by Zeller in 1848. It is found in most of Europe, except the north. 
Waly is a village and a commune in the Meuse department in Grand Est in north-eastern France. It is the only village in the commune. 
The Church of St. Catherine in Waly was consecrated September 26, 1897 by the Bishop of Verdun. In Gothic Revival style, the building contains some carved furniture. The church is disproportionately large, considering the small size of the village. 
Pterostichus costatus is a species of woodland ground beetle in the family Carabidae. It is found in Europe and Northern Asia (excluding China) and North America. 
Dr. Bala Ram Joshi was a Nepalese scientist and professor of physics who made significant contributions to the fields of science and technology of Nepal. His Ph.D. thesis at The University of Glasgow, Studies of orbital electron capture by scintillation counter methods, thesis earned him the Thomson Prize at the University of Glasgow. 
Joshi was born to Himalaya Raj Joshi and Chandra Kumari Joshi in 1987 BS in Dillibazaar, Kathmandu. His father died when he was just eight months old and his mother was just 15 years old. After the death of his father, Joshi was raised at his maternal grandparents' house in Dhoka Tole, Kathmandu where he completed his primary education. Later he was admitted to Durbar High School, Ranipokhari, Kathmandu. He secured high ranks in his class and received many accolades.  
Dr. Bala Ram Joshi's award was initiated in his memory by his wife in 1996. The award honors outstanding contributions in the field of Science and Knowledge in Nepal. 
Scrophularia umbrosa, the  green figwort, is a perennial herbaceous plant found in Europe and Asia. It grows in moist and cultivated waste ground. 
The species looks very similar to the closely related Scrophularia auriculata (water figwort). Green figwort has a greener stem than water figwort, and lacks the leaf auricles which give water figwort its Latin name. 
The plant is probably poisonous to cows. It is pollinated by bees and wasps. It can grow in semi-shade (light woodland) or no shade, but requires moist or wet soil. 
The global conservation status of this species, as of 2013, is least concern. In the United Kingdom it is a very locally distributed species though increasingly abundant. 
The plant was thought, by the doctrine of signatures to be able to cure the throat disease scrofula because of the throat-like shape of its flowers. 
Julie Freeman (born 1972 in Halton, UK) is an artist whose work spans visual, audio and digital art forms and explores the relationship between science, nature and how humans interact with it. 
She was artist-in-residence at the Microsystems and Nanotechnology Centre at Cranfield University (2007-9) where, with Professor Jeremy J. Ramsden, she created works that aimed to increase public understanding of self-assembly and organising processes at the nanoscale, and their potential social impacts and consequences.[citation needed] 
Freeman is a graduate of the MA in Digital Arts at the Centre for Electronic Arts, Middlesex University, London and Board Member of nonprofit collective MzTEK (which encourages women artists to pick up technical skills).  She earned a PhD from Queen Mary University of London. She was a Nesta Arts Fellow and is the recipient of a Wellcome Trust, Arts Council award. Additionally, she is a TED senior fellow. 
She has been featured on the BBC World Service programme The Science Hour and The Guardian's online Tech Weekly podcast. 
Mangataboahangy is a town and commune in Madagascar. It belongs to the district of Ambatofinandrahana, which is a part of Amoron'i Mania Region. The population of the commune was estimated to be approximately 8,000 in 2001 commune census. 
Only primary schooling is available. It is also a site of industrial-scale  mining. The majority 95% of the population of the commune are farmers.  The most important crop is rice, while other important products are peanuts, beans, maize and cassava. Services provide employment for 5% of the population. 
After the war, in 1946 he was discharged from armed forces, and turned to writing in Moscow. He was awarded the Order of Lenin and Order of the Red Banner four times each and the Order of the Patriotic War 1st class. 
Many children grew up with his book "The polar pilot" that has described not only his path to aviation, but also the further adventures of his plane in revolutionary Spain, as well as the description of the Cheliuskin rescue and his participation in the War. 
This done, the shepherds and shepherdesses made merry with these cakes and fine grapes, and sported themselves together at the sound of the pretty small pipe, scoffing and laughing at those vainglorious cake-bakers, who had that day met with a mischief for want of crossing themselves with a good hand in the morning. Nor did they forget to apply to Forgier's leg some fat chenin grapes, and so handsomely dressed it and bound it up that he was quickly cured.
From France the grape spread to South Africa where it was most likely included among the vine cuttings sent to Jan van Riebeeck in the Cape Colony by the Dutch East India Company. In the 20th century it was discovered that a sub-variety of Chenin planted in the Loire was not actually Chenin blanc at all but rather the grape Verdelho, which is banned from French AOC regulations in the Loire. 
Over the years, Chenin blanc has also been frequently confused with other grape varieties with whom it does not seem to have a close genetic relationship. This includes the Portuguese wine grape Verdelho grown on the island of Madeira Machupiclait and in the Azores as well as the Spanish wine grape Albillo which was confused for Chenin blanc in Australia. 
Among the viticultural hazards to which Chenin is susceptible (apart from botrytis in less than ideal conditions) are damage from spring time frost, powdery mildew, and fungal disease (such as Dead arm of grapevine) that affect the wood structures of the grape vine. Some of these hazards can be managed with integrated pest management and rootstock selection. 
Kotov has a career high ATP singles ranking of 245 achieved on 6 January 2020. He also has a career high doubles ranking of 243 achieved on 16 March 2020. 
This biographical article relating to Russian tennis is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Galion Inquirer is an American daily newspaper published in Galion, Ohio. It is owned by AIM Media Midwest. 
In addition to Galion, the newspaper circulates in Crestline and Iberia. Ohio Community Newspapers also owns several weekly newspapers in nearby communities, including the Bellville Star of Bellville, Knox County Citizen of Fredericktown and the Morrow County Sentinel & Independent of Mount Gilead. 
The Inquirer and its sister weeklies were owned by Hirt Publishing of Bellevue, Ohio, until August 2005, when they were purchased by Brown Publishing Company. 
Brown, a Cincinnati-based family business, declared bankruptcy and was reconstituted as Ohio Community Media in 2010.  The company, including the Inquirer, was purchased for an undisclosed sum in 2011 by Philadelphia-based Versa Capital Management. 
In 2012 Versa merged Ohio Community Media, the former Freedom papers it had acquired, Impressions Media, and Heartland Publications into a new company, Civitas Media. Civitas Media sold its Ohio papers to AIM Media Midwest in 2017. 
This was the 10th appearance of the event. Rowing had been on the programme in 1896 but was cancelled due to bad weather. The single sculls has been held every time that rowing has been contested, beginning in 1900. 
Egypt and Greece each made their debut in the event. Great Britain made its ninth appearance, most among nations, having missed only the 1904 Games in St. Louis. 
The format was largely similar to the 1936 Games, though with the three-boats-per-race limit. There were four rounds: quarterfinals, a repechage, semifinals, and a final. 
The first rower in each heat advanced directly to the semifinals. The others competed again in the repechage for remaining spots in the semifinals. 
The ODYSSEE MURE is a program coordinated by ADEME and supported under the Intelligent Energy Europe Programme of the European Commission. 
The British plan sets a target that all new buildings will be zero-carbon from 2011 in Wales and make all homes in England zero carbon by 2016. 
According to the German plan energy efficiency constitutes a key competitive factor, greater security of supply of the exhaustible energy sources and the most effective means, from the point of view of costs, of reducing greenhouse gas emissions. The German target by 2020 is energy productivity double compared with 1990.
Austria (6/2007),   Bulgaria (6/2007),  Cyprus (6/2007),  Denmark (9/2005),  Estonia (11/2007),  France (2/2008),  Finland (7/2007),  Germany (9/2007),  Greece (6/2008), Hungary (2/2008), Ireland,  Italy (7/2007),  Latvia (2008), Luxembourg (2007) Malta (10/2007) Netherlands (9/2007), Poland (6/2007) Romania (2007) Spain a short newsletter June 2007 Sweden (2/2008)and UK (2007). 
Energy efficiency in the EU-27 improved by about 13% between 1996 and 2007, corresponding to 160 Mtoe energy savings in 2007. 
In households, energy efficiency improved by 1.1%/year since 1990. Space heating and large appliances experienced the greatest energy efficiency improvement: since 1990, close to 1.5%/year each. 
The ODEX index is used in the ODYSSEE-MURE project to measure the progress of energy efficiency by main sector (industry, transport, households) and for the whole economy (all final consumers). For each sector, the index is calculated as a weighted average of sub-sectoral indices of energy efficiency progress; sub-sectors being industrial or service sector branches or end-uses for households or transport modes. 
Jefferies Financial Group Inc. is an American financial services company based in New York City and listed on the Fortune 1000. 
In 1970, Ian Cumming and Joseph S. Steinberg both graduated in from Harvard Business School and went to work for Carl Marks & Company, an investment bank. 
In 1979, they gained control of Talcott National Corporation, sold the James Talcott Factors division, and, in 1980, they renamed the company Leucadia. 
In 1984, the company made a $61 million profit on its $77 million investment in Avco Corporation by forcing the sale of the company to Textron. 
In 1997, the company sold the life insurance division of Colonial Penn to Conseco for $460 million and sold the auto insurance division of Colonial Penn to GE Capital for $950 million. 
In 1998, the company sold Charter National Life Insurance and Intramerica Life Insurance to Allstate. 
In 2002, the company received a 44% stake in WilTel Communications Group as a result of a bankruptcy reorganization. 
In May 2003, the company made an offer to acquire the remaining shares of WilTel Communications Group that it did not already own. 
In August 2003, after increasing its offer, the company acquired the remaining shares of  WilTel Communications Group. 
In January 2004, the company financed Pershing Square Capital Management, a hedge fund managed by Bill Ackman. 
In July 2004, the company sought, but failed, to buy a controlling stake in MCI Communications. In September 2004, the company sold its stake in MCI for a $20 million profit. 
In 2005, the company sold WilTel Communications Group to Level 3 Communications for a $180 million profit. 
In 2009, the company entered into a 50/50 joint venture with Berkshire Hathaway called Berkadia, which acquired the North American loan origination and servicing business of Capmark Financial Group. 
In 2012, the company proposed building a $3 billion syngas facility in south Chicago to convert coal and petroleum waste into natural gas; however, the plant never received legislative approval. 
In 2013, the company merged with Jefferies Group and Richard Handler became chief executive officer of the company. 
In 2015, the company made an investment in FXCM after FXCM suffered losses due to the appreciation of the Swiss Franc. 
This Arras arrondissement, Pas-de-Calais geographical article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This geographical article about a location in Kastamonu Province, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The league champions for the fourth time in their history, and the fourth season in succession, were Falmouth Town. They became the first club to win the Western League four times in a row. The champions of Division One were Keynsham Town. 
This season was the first in which goal difference decided places for teams which were level on points. 
The Premier Division remained at eighteen clubs after Taunton Town left to join the Southern League, and Westland-Yeovil were relegated to the First Division. Two clubs joined: 
The First Division was increased from eighteen to nineteen clubs, after Saltash United and Shepton Mallet Town were promoted to the Premier Division. Three clubs joined: 
Liam Williams (born 26 May 1992) is a Welsh professional boxer who challenged for the WBO interim light-middleweight title in 2017 and the WBO middleweight title in 2021. At regional level, he held the British and Commonwealth light-middleweight titles between 2014 and 2016 and the British middleweight title from 2018 to October 2020. 
Williams turned professional as a light-middleweight in 2011. Aged 18, he won every round against the more experienced Ryan Clark and won the vacant Commonwealth light-middleweight title in November 2014 with a 2nd-round-stoppage win over Michael Lomax. The following year, he added the vacant British national title by stopping Kris Carslaw in the second round of their bout at Manchester Arena. 
He retained both titles in defeating a previously unbeaten Gary Corcoran at the Ice Arena Wales on 16 July 2016 with an 11th-round stoppage in what has been described as a gruesome grudge match. 
This biographical article related to boxing in Wales is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The song "Wanda (You're My Only Love)", although originally written as a Weezer song for the movie Angus, is considered to be a Homie song since it was played during the Homie shows. The song "Wanda (You're My Only Love)" was released on Alone - The Home Recordings of Rivers Cuomo,. The song "I'll Think About You" was released on Alone II: The Home Recordings of Rivers Cuomo. 
According to Cuomo's blog,[citation needed] master tapes of recording sessions made during the Homie-era exist, but are largely unfinished, having only drum tracks laid down. Bootlegs of their live shows have been available online since 1997 and played a small role in Weezer's resurgence following their second album, Pinkerton. 
On February 20, 2009, a fan-made tribute was distributed by two members of a Weezer fan community, Jack Mergist (The Lifetaker) and Ryan Rowland (runnersdialzero). The tribute features an album worth of high-quality recordings of interpretations of Homie and Rivers Cuomo solo songs from this era. 
In November 2020, a bunch of unreleased songs were released on Rivers Cuomo's website, and some of these songs, such as "Hot Tub" or "Rosemary," were possibly originally by Homie. 
Acraea ntebiae is a butterfly in the family Nymphalidae. It is found in the Democratic Republic of the Congo, Uganda, Tanzania and Zambia. The habitat consists of forests. 
Gwangju were relegated following the completion of the 2012 K-League season. In January 2013, Lee transferred to Jeonbuk Hyundai Motors. 
In 2015, Lee Seung-Gi moved the team Jeonbuk Hyundai Motors to Sangju Sangmu FC, because he was to enlist within 2 years. Also, he was supposed to return to Jeonbuk Hyundai Motors  in 2017. 
In 2011, Lee was selected in the Republic of Korea squad for the AFC third round of the qualification matches for the 2014 World Cup. He made his international debut as a substitute in Korea's win over the United Arab Emirates on 11 November 2011. 
This biographical article related to a South Korean association football midfielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Rojas received numerous distinctions in Cuba, including an award by the UNEAC (National Union of Writers and Artists of Cuba) in 1994. 
The Providence Rugby Football Club (PRFC) is a rugby union club based in Providence, Rhode Island. Founded in 1969, the club consist of both a men's and women's (PWRFC) rugby teams. PRFC competes in Division III of the New England Rugby Football Union (NERFU). 
Providence RFC was founded in the fall of 1969 by several local athletes with rugby experience and players from the Brown University rugby team. 
The 2005 season saw the club make the National Sweet 16's for the second time in club history, doing so by virtue of hard fought wins in the North East Regional Playoffs against Union, NJ and a highly regarded Hartford team. Unfortunately the successful campaign of 2005 led to a number of retirements, which, when combined with injuries to key players, left Providence with a disappointing 4-4 2006 season. 
After finishing just out of playoff competition due to tiebreaker criteria in the fall of 2004 Providence placed second in the Spring NERFU. In 2002, PRFC captured the regular season New England Division II championship by virtue of a 7-1 record. 
Following a trip to the National Round of 16 in 2009, Providence underwent a brief rebuilding process that seems to be coming to fruition.  With a mix of local and international talent, PRFC has shown to be advancing back to the top of New England  Rugby once again. 
The 2011 season saw the club achieve a 6-3 record while playing some of the areas toughest competition.  The collective club efforts culminated in a 50-0 victory over rival Newport to retain the Rhode Island  Cup. 
After 2011 Providence had a long stretch of seasons where commitment became an issue and they posted a stretch of sub .500 seasons and a low number of new players coming... in the future did not look bright. 
Providence Rugby has a history dating back to 1969. The club has many former members who play with the Rhody Old Cocks. 
Providence Women's Rugby Football Club was founded in January 2004 by a group of local college graduates and then Providence College coach Richard Ashfield. The women - who were primarily from Providence College, URI, Stonehill College and Brown University - decided to work with the established men's team in Providence start a sister club. 
In 2006, the women rose to the challenge of a tough league schedule to finish with a 4-1 record in league play, and a 5-1 record overall. The season ended in a disappointing fashion: despite completing the season with the same record (4-1) as the other top teams in the division, Providence lost the playoff seed due to the scoring system tiebreaker. 
In 2008, the women won a second NERFU championship and placed second in the Northeast Championship, giving them a chance to go for a National Championship. The women placed 5th in the Nation. 
The women have made a name for themselves as a top club in NERFU DII, only losing 2 league games in the last 3 years, in a short period of time and with a young core group the team should be a top contender for the league title for years to come. 
William David McKenzie, Baron McKenzie of Luton (born 24 July 1946) is a British Labour Party politician. Until the 2010 general election, he was Parliamentary Under-Secretary of State at the Department for Work and Pensions and the Department for Communities and Local Government. He was also a former partner at accounting firm Price Waterhouse which became PricewaterhouseCoopers following a 1998 merger. 
McKenzie twice contested the seat of Luton South in the 1987 and 1992 general elections respectively. However, both attempts were unsuccessful. 
After the 2010 General Election, Lord McKenzie shadowed his former roles in the House of Lords, as opposition spokesman on both Work and Pensions, and Communities and Local Government. He remained in this position after the election of Ed Miliband as Labour Party leader. 
McKenzie married Diana Joyce Angliss in 1972 and lives in Luton. She became Lady McKenzie of Luton when her husband was elevated to the peerage in 2004. 
The name of the zone derives from an estate, the Tenuta di Cerbaro, that was used in the Middle Age as a hunting ground for deers (cervi in Latin and in Italian). The core of the estate was the Casale di Tor Cervara, that currently houses a private hospital. 
The territory of Tor Cervara includes the urban zone 5F Tor Cervara and the eastern part of the urban zone 5D Tiburtino Sud (namely, the area called Colli Aniene). 
Northward, Tor Cervara borders with Quartiere Ponte Mammolo (Q. XXIX), from which is separated by the stretch of the river Aniene between Via Tiburtina and Via di Tor Cervara, and by Via di Tor Cervara itself; and also borders with Quartiere San Basilio (Q. XXX), whose border is marked by the stretch of Via Tiburtina between Via di Tor Cervara and the GRA. 
Eastward, Tor Cervara borders with Zona Settecamini (Z. VI), whose border is marked by the stretch of the GRA between Via Tiburtina and the river Aniene. To the east, Tor Cervara also shares a short border with Zona Acqua Vergine (Z. IX), which is outlined by the stretch of the GRA between the river Aniene and the A24. 
Southward, the zone borders with Zona Tor Sapienza (Z. VIII), from which is separated by the stretch of the A24 between the GRA and Viale Palmiro Togliatti. 
Westward, Tor Cervara borders with Quartiere Collatino (Q. XXII), from which is separated by the stretch of Viale Palmiro Togliatti between the A24 and Via Tiburtina. 
Odonyms of the zone mainly refer to Italian politicians (in the area of Colli Aniene), artists and characters of Virgil's poems. In the northern part of the zone, near the border with Quartiere San Basilio, a few streets are named after towns of Lazio and local industrialists. Odonyms of the zone can be categorized as follows: 
Jovellar was born in Palma de Mallorca. After his studies at military academy he was appointed sub-lieutenant, went to Cuba as captain in 1842. He returned to the War Office in 1851, was promoted major in 1853, and went to Morocco as private secretary to O'Donnell, who made him colonel in 1860, after Jovellar had been wounded at the battle of Wadel Ras. 
Joanna Braithwaite (born 1962) is a New Zealand painter. Braithwaite has been interested in exploring exchanges between people and animals since studying at the School of Fine Arts, in Canterbury in the mid-1980s. She has said her work has always tended toward the autobiographical, so what is happening in her environment creeps into the work. 
Braithwaite was born in Halifax, England, in 1962 and immigrated to New Zealand with her family in 1965. She grew up in the township of Pleasant Point in rural south Canterbury. Since the mid-1990s, when Braithwaite spent two years living in Melbourne, she has exhibited regularly in Australia as well as New Zealand. She returned to Australia in 1999 and continue to live and work in Sydney. 
Braithwaite has been described as a "realist, though of an edgy an sceptical sort. Braithwaite's eloquently phrased paintings occupy that point where the traditions of animal painting and Vanitas painting intersect." A painting of a slaughtered sheep's head she exhibited in 1991 epitomised New Zealand: "our farming history, the idea of agricultural imperialism, the Christian symbolism of it and the distaste so many have for the display of powerful and raw emotion." 
Braithwaite's work has seven times been a finalist in the Sulman Prize and three times in the Archibald Prize, most recently in 2018 with her portrait of businessman, art collector and philanthropist Pat Corrigan. 
Braithwaite is a graduate of the Canterbury School of Fine Arts in Christchurch, where she received a BFA in 1985, and of the College of Fine Arts Sydney, where she received an MFA in 2000. 
Pseudomonas  pseudoalcaligenes subsp. konjaci  Pseudomonas pseudoalcaligenes subsp. citrulli Acidovorax avenae subsp. citrulli 
Puchong Town Centre is a township under the Subang Jaya Municipal Council in Puchong, Selangor, Malaysia. 
Puchong Town Centre has 2 primary schools and 1 secondary school. Primary:  Sekolah Kebangsaan Pusat Bandar Puchong (1) Sekolah Kebangsaan Pusat Bandar Puchong (2)  Secondary: Sekolah Menengah Kebangsaan Pusat Bandar Puchong (1) 
He obtained his first degree with honours, his master's degree in education in 1959 and his PhD in 1966. His doctoral thesis was on the children of Israel in the al-Quran and al-Sunnah. 
In 1986, Tantawy was appointed as Grand Mufti of Egypt on his 58th birthday, 28 October 1986. He held this position for almost ten years, until he was appointed Grand Imam of Al-Azhar Mosque and Grand Sheikh of Al-Azhar University by the President of Egypt, Hosni Mubarak, on 27 March 1996. The Al-Azhar Mosque is one of the most influential and important Sunni Muslim institutions. 
Tantawy completed a seven thousand page exegesis of the Qur'an (Al-tafser al-waset). This Tafsir took over ten years to complete. 
Tantawy led the funeral prayers at the funeral of Yasser Arafat in 2004, during which he said that "Arafat has done his duty as a defender of the Palestinian cause, with courage and honesty". 
His views on this issue have been very controversial among his fellow Muslim scholars. Despite years of friendship with Tantawy, well-known Egyptian scholar Yusuf al-Qaradawi has sharply criticized his position on interest. 
He issued a fatwa which allowed abortion in cases where a woman had become pregnant as a result of rape, though this created controversy and Mufti Ali Gomaa said Tantawy was wrong, and that irrespective of how the life was created, after 120 days an abortion becomes impermissible,[note 1] forbidden. 
Tantawy opposed female circumcision calling it un-Islamic, especially in 1997, when he said "The ulema (theologians) of Islam are unanimous in agreeing that female circumcision has nothing to do with religion" and revealed his own daughter had not been circumcised. 
In response to the Pope Benedict XVI Islam controversy, he stated "We have no objection if the Pope holds another speech and declares publicly that what the Byzantine emperor had said was wrong. At the same time, the Pope has to apologize frankly and justify what he said". 
Speaking after the September 11, 2001 attacks, Tantawy said "It's not courage in any way to kill an innocent person, or to kill thousands of people, including men and women and children." He said that Osama bin Laden's call for a Jihad against the west was "invalid and not binding on Muslims", adding "Killing innocent civilians is a horrific, hideous act that no religion can approve". He said the Qur'an "specifically forbids the kinds of things the Taliban and al-Qaeda are guilty of". 
In the 1960s Tantawy wrote a 700-page treatise on the children of Israel in the Quran and Sunnah (Jews in the Qur'an and the Traditions), in which he summarized: 
"[The] Qur'an describes the Jews with their own particular degenerate characteristics, i.e. killing the prophets of Allah, corrupting His words by putting them in the wrong places, consuming the people's wealth frivolously, refusal to distance themselves from the evil they do, and other ugly characteristics caused by their deep-rooted lasciviousness ... only a minority of the Jews keep their word. ... [A]ll Jews are not the same. The good ones become Muslims, the bad ones do not."
 Tantawi also denied that the Western Wall had any Jewish significance and anachronistically claimed, "All of the figures from the [Hebrew] Bible were Muslims." 
Tantawy believes that Saudi Arabia is the model country for respecting human rights stating in June 2000: "Saudi Arabia leads the world in the protection of human rights because it protects them according to the shari'a of God...Everyone knows that Saudi Arabia is the leading country for the application of human rights in Islam in a just and objective fashion, with no aggression and no prejudice." 
Tantawy died on the morning of 10 March 2010, at the age of 81, as result of a heart attack during a visit to Riyadh, Saudi Arabia. Tantawy died as he was about to board his return flight to Egypt at Riyadh's King Khaled International Airport. His heart attack came just after he fell whilst boarding the plane. Tantawy had just attended the prize-giving ceremony for the King Faisal International Prize for Service to Islam. He was officially pronounced dead at the Amir Sultan hospital. 
Condolences were sent to the Egyptian government by several national leaders and scholars. These included Pope Benedict XVI, US President Barack Obama and Secretary of State Hillary Clinton; the Islamic Development Department of Malaysia (Jakim); King Mohammed VI of Morocco; King Abdullah II of Jordan, President Ali Abdullah Saleh of Yemen and President Ilham Aliyev of Azerbaijan. 
The Northern Theater Command Ground Force was officially established on 31 December 2015 with the troops of former Jinan Military Region and Shenyang Military Region. 
Miss Fear (or simply, Fear) was a recurring character in Blackhawk comics (published by Quality Comics, later bought by DC Comics) between 1946 and 1948.  Her first appearance in Modern Comics #49 (May, 1946) told her origin as daughter of the slain leader of an obscure nation in central Asia.  When Blackhawk and his men arrived to investigate the murder, they found Fear always a half-step ahead on her vendetta, ruthlessly avenging her father with a Tommy gun. 
Caracas has one of the highest per capita murder rates in the world, with 76 homicides per 100,000 inhabitants. 
Geologically, Caracas was formed in the Late Cretaceous period, with much of the rest of the Caribbean, and sits on what is mostly metamorphic rock. Deformation of the land in this period formed the region. 
Some areas of the city have a grid layout, either inherited from the colony or developed during the urban projects of the 20th century. Other areas, built on the mountain slopes, do not follow this pattern, but adapt to the irregularities of the terrain. These elevated areas enjoy a temperate temperature throughout the year. 
The region is called Greater Caracas or Metropolitan Region of Caracas (RMC) satellite cities or adjacent bedrooms: the Altos Mirandinos, the Central Coast of La Guaira, Guarenas, Guatire and the Valles del Tuy. This agglomeration had an estimated population of 4.3 million inhabitants in 2011. 
The multiethnic, cultural and racial mix has marked the city throughout history. Its ethnic composition is very diverse. 
A 2009 United Nations survey reported that the cost of living in Caracas was 89% of that of the survey's baseline city, New York. However, this statistic is based upon a fixed currency-exchange-rate of 2003 and might not be completely realistic, due to the elevated inflation rates of the last several years. 
In 2013, the World Economic Forum evaluated countries in terms of how successful they were in advertizing campaigns to attract foreign visitors. Out of the 140 countries evaluated, Venezuela came last. A major factor that has contributed to the lack of foreign visitors has been poor transport for tourists. Venezuela has limited railway systems and airlines. High crime rates and the negative attitude of the Venezuelan population towards tourism also contributed to the poor evaluation. 
In the case of the Libertador Municipality of Caracas, the only member of the Capital District, the executive authority rests with the Head of Government of the Capital District, a position designated by the President of the Republic. 
According to Article 3 of the Capital District Law, the legislative function is exercised directly by the Republic through the National Assembly of Venezuela. 
Article 3. The special regime of the Capital District is a government system constituted by an executive body exercised by a Head of Government, and the legislative function will be in charge of the National Assembly. 
Article 156. It is the competence of the National Public Power: 10. The organization and regime of the Capital District and federal dependencies. 
The city of Caracas occupies the entirety of the Libertador municipality of the Capital District and part of the state of Miranda, specifically the municipalities of Baruta, Chacao, El Hatillo and Sucre, which until 2011 formed the Metropolitan District of Caracas, which enjoyed legal personality and autonomy within the limits of the Constitution and the law. 
Until that year, the Metropolitan Mayor was the first civil, political and administrative authority of the city of Caracas, as well as the municipal mayors in each of the municipalities comprising it. The Metropolitan District of Caracas was organized in a system of municipal government at two levels: the metropolitan or district and the municipalities. 
Caracas is Venezuela's cultural capital, with many restaurants, theaters, museums, and shopping centers. The city is home to many immigrants from Spain, Italy, Portugal, the Middle East, Germany, China, and other Latin American countries. 
Caracas is the seat of the National Institute of Sports and of the Venezuelan Olympic Committee. The city hosted the 1983 Pan American Games. 
Traffic in the Caracas Region is very congested, since it is the city with the largest number of cars in the country, causing traffic jams at any time in the city and being over-saturated at peak hours, where Caracas residents last up to 3 hours to get out of congestion. 
The system inaugurated in 1983 has 71 km and with five lines, being one of the longest in Latin America and expansions of it are being built towards the towns of Guarenas and Guatire. The expansion plans also include the extension to the Baruta and Hatillo municipalities, as well as other metrocable systems in the city center. 
The Caracas Metrocable is a cable car system integrated into the Caracas Metro, conceived in such a way that residents of Caracas neighborhoods usually located in mountainous areas can travel faster and safer to the city center. It works like a feeder route in the style of the metrobus. 
Caracas is part of the Union of Ibero-American Capital Cities from 12 October 1982 establishing brotherly relations with the following cities: 
 In a 2018 Practice Note, the NEC states that the benefits obtained from offsite construction mainly relate to the creation of components in a factory setting, protected from the weather and using manufacturing techniques such as assembly lines with dedicated and specialist equipment. Through the use of appropriate technology, modular construction can: 
Modular construction can help eliminate or reduce many hazards associated with traditional construction, and they can be avoided including:  
The use of modular construction methods is encouraged by proponents of Prevention through Design techniques in construction. It is included as a recommended hazard control for construction projects in the "PtD - Architectural Design and Construction Education Module" published by the National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health. 
Open-source and commercial hardware components used in modular construction include: Open beam, Bit beam, Maker beam, Grid beam, Contraptor, OpenStructures components, ... Space frame systems (such as Mero, Unistrut, Delta Structures, ...) also tend to be modular in design. Other materials used in construction which are interlocking and thus reusable/modular in nature include interlocking bricks. 
Bernard Yeoh Cheng Han (born April 11, 1969 in Kuala Lumpur) is a Malaysian sport shooter. He was selected to compete for Malaysia in trap shooting at the 2004 Summer Olympics, finishing in thirty-fourth place. Yeoh is a member of the A1 Shooting Ground in Barnet, England, United Kingdom, where he trains full-time under Italian-born coach Claudio Capaldo. 
Yeoh qualified for the Malaysian squad, as a 35-year-old, in the men's trap at the 2004 Summer Olympics in Athens after having accepted a wildcard entry invitation from the International Shooting Sport Federation. He fired 107 out of 125 targets to finish thirty-fourth in the qualifying phase, failing to advance to the final. 
This biographical article relating to sport shooting in Malaysia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A BASIC interpreter is an interpreter that enables users to enter and run programs in the BASIC language and was, for the first part of the microcomputer era, the default application that computers would launch. Users were expected to use the BASIC interpreter to type in programs or to load programs from storage (initially cassette tapes then floppy disks). 
BASIC helped jumpstart the time-sharing era, became mainstream in the microcomputer era, then faded to become just another application in the DOS and GUI era, and today survives in a few niches related to game development, retrocomputing, and teaching. 
In January 1975, the Altair 8800 was announced and sparked the microcomputer revolution. One of the first microcomputer versions of BASIC was co-written by Gates, Allen, and Monte Davidoff for their newly formed company, Micro-Soft. This was released by MITS in punch tape format for the Altair 8800 shortly after the machine itself, showcasing BASIC as the primary language for early microcomputers. 
Many firms developed BASIC interpreters. In 1976, SCELBI introduced SCELBAL for the 8008 and the University of Idaho and Lawrence Livermore Laboratory announced that they would be publishing to the public domain LLL BASIC, which included floating-point support. In 1977, the Apple II and TRS-80 Model I each had two versions of BASIC, a smaller version introduced with the initial releases of the machines and a licensed Microsoft version introduced later as interest in the platforms increased. 
In 1978, David Lien published the first edition of The BASIC Handbook: An Encyclopedia of the BASIC Computer Language, documenting keywords across over 78 different computers. By 1981, the second edition documented keywords from over 250 different computers, showcasing the explosive growth of the microcomputer era. 
With the rise of disk operating systems and later graphical user interfaces, BASIC interpreters became just one application among many, rather than providing the first prompt a user might see when turning on a computer. 
In 1983, the TRS-80 Model 100 portable computer debuted, with its Microsoft BASIC implementation noteworthy for two reasons. First, programs were edited using the simple text editor, TEXT, rather than typed in line by line (but line numbers were still required). Second, this was the last Microsoft product that Bill Gates developed personally. 
In 1993, Microsoft released Visual Basic for Applications, a scripting language for Microsoft Office applications, which supersedes and expands on the abilities of earlier application-specific macro programming languages such as Word's WordBASIC (which had been introduced in 1989). 
In 1996, Microsoft released VBScript as an alternative to JavaScript for adding interactive client-side functionality to web pages viewed with Internet Explorer. 
In 2000, Lee Bamber and Richard Vanner released DarkBASIC, a game creation system for Microsoft Windows, with accompanying IDE and development tools. 
In 2001, SmallBASIC was released for the Palm PDA. Another BASIC interpreter for Palm was HotPaw BASIC, an offshoot of Chipmunk Basic. 
In 2002, Emmanuel Chailloux, Pascal Manoury and Bruno Pagano published a Tiny BASIC as an example of developing applications with Objective Caml. 
In 2014, Robin H. Edwards released Arduino BASIC for the Arduino, and now a widely forked implementation. Another implementation using the same name was adapted from Palo Alto Tiny BASIC in 1984 by Gordon Brandly for his 68000 Tiny BASIC, later ported to C by Mike Field. 
Many BASIC interpreters are now available for smartphones and tablets via the Apple App Store, or Google Play store for Android. 
Today, coding BASIC interpreters has become part of the retrocomputing hobby. Higher level programming languages on systems with extensive RAM have simplified implementing BASIC interpreters. For instance, line management is simple if your implementation language supports sparse matrixes, variable management is simple with associative arrays, and program execution is easy with eval functions. As examples, see the open-source project Vintage BASIC, written in Haskell or the OCaml Tiny BASIC. 
Initially, interpreters were either bundled with computer hardware or developed as a custom service, before an industry producing independently packaged software for organizations came about in the late 1960s. BASIC interpreters were first sold separately from microcomputers, then built-in, before becoming sold as applications again in the DOS era. 
The first implementation of BASIC, Dartmouth BASIC, was a compiler. Generally, compilers examine the entire program in a multi-step process and produce a second file that is directly executable in the host computer's underlying machine language without reference to the source code. This code is often made up of calls to pre-written routines in the language's runtime system. The executable will normally be smaller than the source code that created it. 
Producing a language with all of these components that can fit into a small amount of memory and still has room for user's source code is a major challenge, but it eliminates the need for secondary storage and was the only practical solution for early minicomputers and most of the history of the home computer revolution. 
This syntax, as simple as it was, added one innovation: GOTO and GOSUB could take an expression rather than a line number, providing an assigned GOTO rather than the switch statement of the ON-GOTO/GOSUB structure more typical of BASIC. 
Sinclair BASIC used as its language definition the 1978 American National Standards Institute (ANSI) Minimal BASIC standard, but was itself an incomplete implementation with integer arithmetic only. The ANSI standard was published after the design of the first generation of interpreters for microcomputers. 
Not that Allen couldn't handcode in machine language. While on final approach into the Albuquerque airport on a trip to demonstrate the interpreter, Allen realized he had forgotten to write a bootstrap program to read the tape into memory. Writing in 8080 machine language, Allen finished the program before the plane landed. Only when he loaded the program onto an Altair and saw a prompt asking for the system's memory size did he know that the interpreter worked on the Altair hardware. 
One of the most popular of the many versions of Tiny BASIC was Palo Alto Tiny BASIC, or PATB for short. PATB first appeared in the May 1976 edition of Dr. Dobbs, written in a custom assembler language with non-standard mnemonics. Li-Chen Wang had coded his interpreter on a time-share system with a generic assembler. 
One exception to the use of assembly was the use of ALGOL 60 for the Paisley XBASIC interpreter for Burroughs large systems. Another exception, and type-in program, was Classic BASIC, written by Lennart Benschop in Forth and published in the Dutch Forth magazine Vijgeblad (issue #42, 1993). 
The source code of interpreters was often open source (as with Tiny BASIC) or published later by the authors. The complete annotated source code and design specifications of Atari BASIC were published as The Atari BASIC Source Book in 1983. 
Some BASIC interpreters were coded in the intermediate representation of a virtual machine to add a layer of abstraction and conciseness above native machine language. 
For its TI-99, Texas Instruments designed a virtual machine with a language called GPL, for "Graphic Programming Language". (Although widely blamed for the slow performance of TI-BASIC, part of the problem was that the virtual machine was stored in graphics ROM, which had a slow 8-bit interface.) 
Most BASIC implementations of the era acted as both the language interpreter as well as the line editor. When BASIC was running, a > command prompt was displayed where the user could enter statements. This was known as "direct mode". Upon boot, a BASIC interpreter defaulted to direct mode. 
Statements that were entered with leading numbers are entered into the program storage for "deferred execution", either as new lines or replacing any that might have had the same number previously. Statements that were entered without a line number were referred to as commands, and ran immediately. Line numbers without statements (i.e., followed by a carriage return) deleted a previously stored line.  
When a program was present in memory and the user types in the RUN command, the system enters "indirect mode". In this mode, a pointer is set to point to the first line of the program, for instance, line 10. The original text for that line is then retrieved from the store and run as if the user had just typed it in direct mode. The pointer then advances to the next line and the process continues. 
To save RAM, and speed execution, all BASIC interpreters would encode some ASCII characters of lines into other representations. For instance, line numbers were converted into integers stored as bytes or words, and keywords might be assigned single-byte tokens (for instance, storing PRINT as the byte value 145, in MS-BASIC). These representations would then be converted back to readable text when LISTing the program. 
As an alternative to tokenization, to save RAM, early Tiny BASIC implementations like Extended Tiny BASIC, Denver Tiny BASIC and MINOL truncated keywords: PR for PRINT, IN for INPUT, RET for RETURN. The full, traditional keywords were not accepted. 
In contrast, Palo Alto Tiny BASIC accepted traditional keywords but allowed any keyword to be abbreviated to its minimal unique string, with a trailing period. For instance, PRINT could be typed P., although PR. and other variations also worked. This system was retained in Level I BASIC for the TRS-80, which used PATB, and was also found in Atari BASIC and the BASIC of various Sharp Pocket Computers. 
To expand an abbreviation, the Atari BASIC tokenizer searches through its list of reserved words to find the first that matches the portion supplied. More commonly used commands occur first in the list of reserved words, with REM at the beginning (it can be typed as .). When the program is later LISTed it will typically write out the full words. MS BASICs also allowed ? as a short-form for PRINT, but did expand it when listing, treating it as an abbreviation, not a synonym. 
Many "pocket computers" similarly use one keystroke (sometimes preceded by various kinds of shift keys) to produce one byte (the keyword token) that represented an entire BASIC keyword, such as "EXP", "SQR", "IF", or "PEEK", such as Sharp pocket computer character sets and TI-BASIC. 
Valid line numbers varied from implementation to implementation, but were typically from 1 to 32767.  
Most of the memory used by BASIC interpreters was to store the program listing itself. Numbered statements were stored in sequential order in a sparse array implemented as a linear collection (technically not a list as no line number could occur more than once). 
The maximum length of a line varied: 64 characters in Palo Alto Tiny BASIC, including the decimal representation of the line number; 120 characters in Atari BASIC; 128 characters in Integer BASIC; and 255 characters in MS-BASIC (not including the line number). 
Interpreters would search the program a line at a time, looking at each line number. If it were lower than the new line number, the later lines would be moved in memory to make room for the space required for the new line. If it were the same line number, and not the exact same length, subsequent lines would need to be moved forward or backward. (Because sequential order was always maintained in memory, these were not linked lists.) 
When the user typed LIST into the command line, the system would loop over the array of lines, using one of these methods, convert the line number back to decimal format, and then print out the rest of the text in the line, decoding any tokens or other encoded representations. 
As developers added structured programming constructs to BASIC, they often removed the need for line numbers altogether and added text editors and, later, integrated development environments. 
Integer BASIC was unusual in supporting any length variable name (e.g., SUM, GAMEPOINTS, PLAYER2), provided it did not contain a reserved word. Keywords could not be used in variables in many early BASICs; "SCORE" would be interpreted as "SC" OR "E", where OR was a keyword. 
String variables are usually distinguished in many microcomputer dialects of BASIC by having $ suffixed to their name, and values are often identified as strings by being delimited by "double quotation marks". Later implementations would use other punctuation to specify the type of a variable: A% for integer, A! for single precision, and A# for double precision. 
With the exception of arrays and (in some implementations) strings, and unlike Pascal and other more structured programming languages, BASIC does not require a variable to be declared before it is referenced. Values will typically default to 0 (of the appropriate precision) or the null string. 
Because Tiny BASIC only used 26 single-letter variables, variables could be stored as an array without storing their corresponding names, using a formula based on the ASCII value of the letter as the index. Palo Alto Tiny BASIC took this a step further: variables 'two-byte values were located in RAM within the program, from bytes 130 (ASCII 65, 'A', times two) to 181 (ASCII 90, 'Z', times two, plus one for the second byte). 
Most BASICs provided for the ability to have far more than 26 variables and so needed symbol tables, which would set aside storage capacity for only those variables used. 
Unlike most BASIC interpreters, UIUC BASIC had a hash function, hashing by the letter of the variable/function/array name, then conducting a linear search from there. In UIUC BASIC, a symbol table entry was: 
One BBC BASIC performance optimization included using multiple linked lists for variable lookup rather than a single long list, as in Microsoft BASIC. 
Some implementations of the Microsoft interpreter, for example those running on the TRS-80 Models I/III, required the user to specify the amount of memory to be used by the interpreter. This was to permit a region of memory to be reserved for the installation of machine language subroutines that could be called by the interpreted program, for greater speed of execution. When the Models I/III are powered up, the user is greeted with the prompt "Memory size?" for this purpose. 
Most Tiny BASIC interpreters (as well as Sinclair BASIC 4K) supported mathematics using integers only, lacking floating-point support. Using integers allowed numbers to be stored in a much more compact 16-bit format that could be more rapidly read and processed than the 32- or 40-bit floating-point formats found in most BASICs of the era. However, this limited its applicability as a general-purpose language. 
Business BASIC implementations, such as Data General Business Basic, were also integer-only, but typically at a higher precision: "double precision", i.e. 32-bit (plus or minus 2,147,483,648) and "triple precision" (plus or minus 1.4x10^14). 
Other computer number formats were sometimes used. For instance, the MINOL Tiny BASIC supported only unsigned bytes, and the MICRO-BASIC Tiny BASIC used Binary Coded Decimal. But floating point would come to predominate. 
In contrast, time-shared systems had often relied on hardware. For instance, the GE-235 was chosen for implementing the first version of Dartmouth BASIC specifically because it featured an "Auxiliary Arithmetic Unit" for floating point and double-precision calculations. 
Early interpreters used 32-bit formats, similar to the IEEE 754 single-precision binary floating-point format, which specifies: 
While 32-bit formats were common in this era, later versions of BASIC, starting with Microsoft BASIC for the MOS 6502, generally adopted a 40-bit (five byte) format for added precision. 
Infix operators typically included + (addition), - (subtraction), * (multiplication), / (division), and exponent using the ^ character. Relative operations included the standard set of =, >, <, >=, <=, and for "not equal" either <> or the HP-TSB-inspired #. Binary operators, such as AND, OR and NOT, weren't in every implementation, and some did Boolean algebra and some did not.  
Dartmouth BASIC's initial edition included the following functions: ABS (absolute value), ATN (arctangent), COS (cosine), EXP (e raised to the power), INT (truncate any fractional value, returning an integer), LOG (logarithm), RND (pseudorandom number generator), SIN (sine), SQR (square root), and TAN (tangent). It also included the DEF FN statement to declare one-line functions, which would then be referred to as FNA(), FNB(), etc. 
The RND function was the most widespread function to be supported in early BASICs, though implementations varied: 
The second version of Dartmouth BASIC supported matrices and matrix operations, useful for the solution of sets of simultaneous linear algebraic equations; MAT matrix operations such as assignment, addition, multiplication (of compatible matrix types) and evaluation of a determinant were supported. 
SCELBAL supported multiple arrays, but taken together these arrays could have no more than 64 items. Integer BASIC supported arrays of a single dimension, limited in size only by the available memory. Tiny BASIC Extended supported two-dimensional arrays of up to 255 by 255. Altair BASIC 4K supported only arrays (one dimension) while the 8K version supported matrices of up to 34 dimensions. 
Many implementations supported the Dartmouth BASIC practice of not requiring an array to be dimensioned, in which case it was assumed to have 11 elements (0 to 10); e.g., {{{1}}} would create the 11-element array as a side effect. 
The dope vector of arrays varied from implementation to implementation. For instance, the dope vector of an Altair BASIC 4K array: 
Implementations that supported matrices had to record the number of dimensions and the upper bound of each dimension. Further, as some interpreters had only one data type (either floating point or integer), the dope vector merely needed to record the number of dimensions and the upper bound of each dimension. Interpreters with multiple data types had to record the data type of the array.  
Even though Microsoft and other BASICs did support matrices, matrix operations were not built in but had to be programmed explicitly on array elements. 
The original Dartmouth BASIC, some of its immediate descendants, and Tiny BASIC implementations lacked string handling. Two competing schools of string-handling evolved, pioneered by HP and DEC, although other approaches came later. These required different strategies for implementation. 
The simplest string handling copied HP Time-Shared BASIC and defined string variables as arrays of characters that had to be DIMensioned prior to use. Strings in HP TSB are treated as an array of characters, up to 72 in total, rather than a single multi-character object. By default, they are allocated one character in memory, and if a string of longer length is needed, they have to be declared. For instance, DIM A$ will set up a string that can hold a maximum of 10 characters. 
Substrings within strings are accessed using a "slicing" notation: A$(L,R) or A$[L,R], where the substring begins with the leftmost character specified by the index L and continues to the rightmost character specified by the index R, or the A$[L] form where the substring starts at the leftmost character specified by the index L and continues to the end of the string. TSB accepts () or [] interchangeably. Array and substring indices start with 1. 
This is in sharp contrast to BASICs following the DEC pattern that use functions such as LEFT$(), MID$(), and RIGHT$() to access substrings. Later adopted by ANSI BASIC, HP's notation can also be used on the destination side of a LET or INPUT statement to modify part of an existing string value, for example 100 A$[3,5]="XYZ" or 120 B$="CHANGE ALL BUT FIRST TWO CHARS", which cannot be done with early implementations of LEFT$/MID$/RIGHT$. 
Integer BASIC, North Star BASIC and Atari BASIC  mimicked HP's approach, which again contrasted with the style found in BASICs derived from DEC, including Microsoft BASIC, where strings are an intrinsic variable-length type. 
Some of the Tiny BASIC implementations supported one or more predefined integer arrays, which could be used to store character codes, provided the language had functionality to input and output character codes (e.g., Astro BASIC had KP and TV for this purpose). 
Most BASIC interpreters differed widely in graphics and sound, which varied dramatically from microcomputer to microcomputer. Altair BASIC lacked any graphics or sound commands, as did the Tiny BASIC implementations, while Integer BASIC provided a rich set. 
Level I BASIC for the TRS-80 had as minimal a set as possible: CLS, for CLear Screen; SET(X,Y), which lit a location on the display; RESET(X,Y), which turned it off; and POINT(X,Y), which returned 1 if a location was lit, 0 if it was not. The coordinates could be any expression and ranged from 0 to 127 for the X-axis and 0 to 47 for the Y-axis. Only black-and-white display was supported. 
Microsoft added many graphics commands to IBM BASIC: LINE, PSET (Pixel SET), PRESET (Pixel RESET), GET (stores a rectangle of the screen to an array), PUT (displays a stored rectangular segment), LOCATE (to move the text cursor), and DRAW,  which sketches shapes using a LOGO-like syntax. Bill Gates and Neil Konzen wrote DONKEY.BAS, a bundled game, to demonstrate the interpreter's color graphics and sound. 
Another area where implementations diverged was in keywords for dealing with media (cassettes and floppy disks), keyboard input, and game controllers (if any). 
Dartmouth BASIC lacked a command for getting input from the keyboard without pausing the program. To support videogames, BASICs added proprietary commands for doing so: INKEY$ was a function in Microsoft BASIC that would return an empty string if no key was pressed or otherwise a single character; KP (for KeyPress) returned the ASCII value of the input in Astro BASIC. 
Some systems supported game controllers. Astro BASIC supported JX() (specified joystick's horizontal position), JY() (joystick vertical position), KN() (knob status), and TR() (trigger status). Integer BASIC supported a game controller, a paddle controller, which had two controllers on a single connector. The position of the controller could be read using the PDL function, passing in the controller number, 0 or 1, like A=PDL(0):PRINT A, returning a value between 0 and 255.[c] 
Of the Tiny BASIC implementations, only National Industrial Basic Language (NIBL) offered a loop command of any sort, DO/UNTIL. This was despite the inventor of Tiny BASIC, Dennis Allison, publicly lamenting the state of BASIC. 
The following example is in Microsoft QBASIC, Microsoft's third implementation of a structured BASIC (following Macintosh BASIC in 1984 and Amiga BASIC in 1985). 
Initial support for object-oriented programming provided only the re-use of objects created with other languages, such as how Visual Basic and PowerBASIC supported the Windows Component Object Model. As BASIC interpreters continued to evolve, they added support for object-oriented features such as methods, constructors, dynamic memory allocation, properties and temporary allocation. 
The Integer BASIC ROMs also included a machine code monitor, "mini-assembler", and disassembler to create and debug assembly language programs. 
For step-by-step execution, the TRON or TRACE instruction could be used at the command prompt or placed within the program itself. When it was turned on, line numbers were printed out for each line the program visited. The feature could be turned off again with TROFF or NOTRACE. 
Some implementations such as the Microsoft interpreters for the various marks of TRS-80 included the command ON ERROR GOSUB. This would redirect program execution to a specified line number for special error handling. 
Unlike most BASICs, Atari BASIC scanned the just-entered program line and reported syntax errors immediately. If an error was found, the editor re-displayed the line, highlighting the text near the error in inverse video. 
In many interpreters, including Atari BASIC, errors are displayed as numeric codes, with the descriptions printed in the manual. Many MS-BASIC used two-character abbreviations (e.g., SN for SYNTAX ERROR). Palo Alto Tiny BASIC and Level I BASIC used three words for error messages: "WHAT?" for syntax errors, "HOW?" for run-time errors like GOTOs to a line that didn't exist or numeric overflows, and "SORRY" for out-of-memory problems. 
While the BASIC language has a simple syntax, mathematical expressions do not, supporting different precedence rules for parentheses and different mathematical operators. To support such expressions requires implementing a recursive descent parser. 
The range of design decisions that went into programming a BASIC interpreter were often revealed through performance differences. 
Source code and design documents, in chronological order of the release of the BASIC implementations: 
Solger was considered by many[who?] as the first American hardcore punk band in Seattle. The name Solger was a misspelling of Soldier, coming from their anti-draft song "Dead Soldier". Their five-song self-titled 7" record and its super lo-fi sound become a collectors item, as well as setting the standard for comparison by other lo-fi punk recordings worldwide. 
Paul Dana (guitar), also known as Paul Solger, started the band after meeting Kyle Nixon (vocals) in May 1980. The rhythm section on the Solger EP was Doug Rockness on bass and Seattle based multi-instrumentalist Tor Midtskog (later of Seattle's Colour Twigs, Nightcaps and currently MoonSpinners) on drums. 
After leaving Solger, Paul joined up with the Fartz. He then started The Fags with Upchuck, he played with Ten Minute Warning a few years later. In 1984, Paul Solger got back together with The Fags and the band moved to New York City. Paul Solger was an influence to both Stone Gossard of Pearl Jam and Steve Turner of Mudhoney. Paul Solger co-wrote "Rehab Doll" with Green River. 
Doug Rockness (bass), started R.P.A. with former members of The Lewd and The Refuzors after Solger broke up - Rockness died in Thailand while on vacation in May 2006 from a suspected, but unconfirmed,  drug overdose. 
Paul Dana was diagnosed with cancer in 2004 but was successfully treated and still lives in the state of Washington. Kyle Nixon was diagnosed with multiple sclerosis in January 2001. 
Duff McKagan has been known to use a white bass with "Solger" written in black marker across it, to show his support for his long-time friend Paul Solger, and his battle with cancer. 
South Imilit Island is one of the uninhabited Arctic islands in the Kivalliq Region, Nunavut, Canada. It is one of several islands in Chesterfield Inlet. 
Anne-Sophie Weyns (born 2 February 1995) is a Belgian field hockey player for the Belgian national team. 
In the 16th century the castle was altered, with a tower added to the southeast angle and, on the west end, a pair of circular gunports set within rectangular openings. Gunports of this type were invented in England in the 1520s. Also in that century, the walls were raised to add a third storey and several windows with hood mouldings were added. In 1530, Gerald FitzGerald, 9th Earl of Kildare garrisoned and fortified the castle. 
Local legend claims that a tunnel linked Woodstock Castle with White's Castle.The inner walls of the castle were removed and the stone used to build Athy Town Hall.[citation needed] 
A tall stone castle of three storeys. It once contained a stone carving of a piper playing the great Irish warpipes; this artwork was later moved to Kilkea Castle. 
Merrilee K. Fullerton is a Canadian politician and physician who is the Ontario Minister of Children, Community and Social Service since June 18, 2021. She represents the riding of Kanata-Carleton in the Legislative Assembly of Ontario as a member of the Progressive Conservative Party since 2018. 
Fullerton served as Minister of Training, Colleges, and Universities from 2018 to 2019 and the Minister of Long-Term Care from 2019 to 2021. On June 18, 2021 she was shuffled from the Minister of Long-Term Care to the Minister of Children, Community and Social Services. 
Fullerton was born in Whitehorse, Yukon and grew up in the Beaverbrook neighbourhood of Kanata, Ontario. She is a graduate of the University of Ottawa's medical school. 
Fullerton initially practiced from the Carleton Place and District Hospital before going into private practice as a family physician in the Ottawa area. She practiced medicine in Ontario for more than 30 years, and also spent time in Alberta during her medical training. She first practiced out of the Carleton Place Hospital, before opening a practice as a family physician at Med-Team Clinic in Kanata. 
The College of Physicians and Surgeons of Ontario website indicates that her licence expired in 2014 when she resigned from membership. 
Fullerton wrote a number of columns in the Ottawa Citizen from 2004 to 2007. Her columns were on a variety of information related to general health and the healthcare system. She also ran a medical blog on her website. 
Fullerton entered provincial politics in 2016, declaring her intention to run against then-Progressive Conservative MPP Jack MacLaren in Kanata-Carleton. MacLaren caused and encountered a number of issues around this time. On May 28, 2017, MacLaren was kicked out of the Ontario PC caucus and barred from being a candidate in the 2018 election, leading to a two-way race between Fullerton and Police Sergeant Rick Keindel. Fullerton won the nomination. 
Fullerton came under fire during the 2018 campaign for her tweets, which were labelled Islamophobic by the Canadian Muslim Public Affairs Committee, as well as for blocking Muslim leaders in her community on Twitter. She was also accused of being in favour of a two-tier healthcare system, a claim which she disputes. 
In May of 2021 Fullerton was widely condemned for her pandemic response as Minister of Long-Term Care and came under fire for dodging questions to do with reports that had recently been released on the showing that the Ontario Conservative government had acted slowly to the pandemic in LTC and that dozens of patients had died of neglect in privately run long term care homes that Fullerton oversaw. 
Fatehpur Sikri railway station is a small railway station in Agra district, Uttar Pradesh. Its code is FTS. It serves Fatehpur Sikri city. The station consists of two platforms. The platforms are not well sheltered. It lacks many facilities including water and sanitation. 
This article about a railway station in the Indian state of Uttar Pradesh is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Conservatives won enough seats to form a government following the election but Harper, who became Prime Minister, only had enough seats to form a minority government meaning the opposition parties had enough seats to defeat a government motion on same-sex marriage. However, a motion could pass if it could attract enough support from individual opposition MPs in a free vote. The government announced that it would introduce a motion before the end of 2006. 
Following the vote, Harper announced that the issue was now settled and that his government would not revisit the matter even if it won a majority government in the next election, held October 14, 2008. 
A majority of votes 154 were needed to ensure the motion passed, although the only formal requirement for passing one is the assent of a majority of members in attendance for the vote. 
May 31, 2006: CTV News Report: "At this stage, we've debated it pretty thoroughly. Once you've reached the optimum, nobody is really happy, but if it's the best that you can do, then it's probably best to just leave it alone." 
"Personally, I have mixed feelings on that ... I recognize that same-sex marriage has been the law in Canada for some time now, and I also recognize the difficulty in reversing it to the point where traditional marriage is the only legal union in Canada. For that reason I would say I'm undecided about it, but I'm thinking seriously about it now." 
November 12, 2006: "It's fundamentally dishonest. If Mr. Harper wants to repeal the marriages that have already gone through, then put that on the table. If he wants to change the law, put that on the table." 
February 1, 2005: Globe And Mail indicates vote forJune 23: While debating Mo.17 to extend the sitting of the House, Martin stated those who are opposed should move on. Said "the horse left the barn" a long time ago and that none of the parties in the House have offered to use the Notwithstanding clause to override the Courts. 
February 16: During 2nd reading debate in Martin's speech, he said he will stand up for the Charter of Rights and Freedoms to protect minority rights. Referred back to when women weren't allowed to vote, and when interracial marriages were illegal. Said society has evolved and that while he supported the traditional definition 6 years ago, he has totally come around to supporting same-sex marriage. 
Leader Gilles Duceppe announced on February 10, 2006 that he would force the caucus to vote against Harper's motion. 
The NDP caucus did not allow a free vote so MPs were obliged to vote against the Conservative motion. 
September 14, 2006: "For me it is not an issue of whether I agree with them or not, it is an issue that these are minority rights that have been guaranteed by the courts. The biggest danger of a slippery slope is allowing the principle that "majority" rights could vote away court guarantees for minorities." 
February 21: In a speech in the House of Commons, he stated how difficult it is for a teen when he/she realizes they are gay, and that they often suffer from depression. Siksay believes C-38 will help to reduce prejudice. 
Judy was absent on the final vote because of her daughter's graduation. Outside a private party, it was said that if the vote was obviously going to be by a razor thin margin, she would have been there to vote in favour. 
HMS Imperieuse (1852) was a wooden screw steam frigate launched in 1852. From 1854 the ship served in the Baltic Sea during the Crimean War. 
This article about a specific naval ship or boat of the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A cataract bog is a rare ecological community formed where a permanent stream flows over a granite outcropping. The sheeting of water keeps the edges of the rock wet without eroding the soil; in this precarious location no tree or large shrub can maintain a roothold. The result is a narrow, permanently wet, sunny habitat. 
While a cataract bog is host to plants typical of a bog, it is technically a fen. Bogs get water from the atmosphere, while fens get their water from groundwater seepage. 
Cataract bogs inhabit a narrow, linear zone next to the stream and are partly shaded by trees and shrubs in the adjacent plant communities. Algae growing on the rocks can make the surface slippery and dangerous for those exploring a cataract bog. 
The plant communities are fragile because of their tenuous attachment to thin soil above the rock substrate. During prolonged drought, the stream may dry up and the edges of the micro-islands curl up. Heavy rainfall can then wash away the micro-islands, so a cataract bog is in a continual state of change and renewal. 
Pterocalla nitidiventris is a species of ulidiid or picture-winged fly in the genus Pterocalla of the family Ulidiidae. 
This article related to members of the insect family Ulidiidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a member of the United States House of Representatives from Virginia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Drug titration is the process of adjusting the dose of a medication for the maximum benefit without adverse effects. 
When a drug has a narrow therapeutic index, titration is especially important, because the range between the dose at which a drug is effective and the dose at which side effects occur is small. Some examples of the types of drugs commonly requiring titration include insulin, anticonvulsants, blood thinners, anti-depressants, and sedatives. 
Titrating off of a medication instead of stopping abruptly is recommended in some situations. Glucocorticoids should be tapered after extended use to avoid adrenal insufficiency. 
Drug titration is also used in phase I of clinical trials. The experimental drug is given in increasing dosages until side effects become intolerable.  A clinical trial in which a suitable dose is found is called a dose-ranging study. 
This article about a property in Pennsylvania on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Dimitrios Nick Rerras (born February 19, 1957) is an American politician from the Commonwealth of Virginia. A Republican, he served in the Senate of Virginia from 2000 to 2008 representing the 6th District. At various times during his term of office, it included parts of Norfolk, Virginia Beach, the Eastern Shore of Virginia, and Mathews County. 
Rerras was born on February 19, 1957 in Norfolk, the son of Greek immigrants. He graduated from Granby High School in Norfolk. His wife is Gayle and they have four children and reside in Norfolk. He has an associate degree in Electronics Technology from Tidewater Community College and graduated with a bachelor's degree from Philadelphia Biblical University. 
Nick served in the United States Army in the 9th Infantry Division and was twice selected as the Soldier of the Quarter. 
In 1995, Rerras challenged longtime Senator Stanley C. Walker, the President pro tempore of the Senate, in the 6th District, based in Norfolk and Virginia Beach. Walker won reelection 55%-45%. However, Republicans gained a 20-20 tie in the Senate statewide, and Walker's position was weakened by a power-sharing agreement. 
Rerras ran again in 1999, this time upsetting Walker 59%-41%. In 2001, Rerras' district was expanded to include the Eastern Shore counties of Accomack and Northampton and Mathews County on the Middle Peninsula. 
In 2003, Rerras was challenged by Norfolk trial lawyer Andrew A. Protogyrou. Rerras won reelection handily, 62%-38%. 
In 2007, Ralph Northam, an Eastern Shore native who worked as a pediatric neurologist in Norfolk, unseated Rerras, 54%-46%. 
The "Gypsy Madonna" is a 19th-century name for the painting, because of the Virgin's supposed "dusky complexion  and her dark hair and eyes".  She seems young even by the standards of Madonnas, and the hands of the Child are unusually engaged, respectively with his mother's fingers and her dress (this is a difference to the Bellini). 
the effect of sensuous existence Titian makes by his command of optical device is of an extreme virtuosity.  No picture before this attains a comparable sense of presences existing palpably within an atmosphere, reflecting coloured light but also absorbing it to saturation point, so that each pore of flesh or drapery makes texture.
  Despite the debts to Bellini and Giorgione, the painting shows Titian, who was then around twenty-one, developing his own independent character and style. 
Technical examinations show that it was originally even closer to the Bellini in Detroit, and that many changes were made in the course of painting. Unlike Bellini's usual careful underdrawing, Titian "used as his guidelines only summary strokes made with a fairly wide brush with thin wash shading".  Among several other changes, the head of the Child originally looked out at the viewer. 
Like several other important early Venetian paintings in Vienna, the work was (very likely) in the Venetian collection of Bartolomeo della Nave and in 1636 sold in Venice to the Duke of Hamilton, who brought it to London.  In 1659, after Hamilton's execution, it was acquired by Archduke Leopold Wilhelm of Austria in Brussels, whose collection soon passed to the imperial collection in Vienna. 
Claire Ferchaud (May 5, 1896 - January 29, 1972), in religion Sister Claire of Jesus Crucified was a French visionary and mystic, whose claims were ultimately rejected by the Catholic Church. She was linked to the Devotion of the Sacred Heart of Jesus during World War I. 
Micraegialia is a genus of beetle in family Scarabaeidae. It belongs to subfamily Aegialiinae. The genus contains only one known species, Micraegialia pusilla. 
A closely related variety called Beni Sheko has been documented by Bender (1997). Beni Sheko speakers consider themselves to be part of the same ethnic groups as Kelo speakers (Bender 1997: 190). 
(Primary Hadith books are those books which are collected, compiled and written by author or their students themselves). 
(Secondary Hadith books are those books which are not collected, compiled and written by author himself but rather they are selected from already existing Hadith books i.e Primary Hadith books) 
These books seek to give a rational account of Shi'a theology in contrast with the Ash'ari, Mu'tazili and other theological schools of Islam. The contents of these books are taken from the 8th to the 13th century (2nd to 7th century of Islam). 
These books seek to give a rational account of Shi'a theology in contrast with modern Western ideologies including Marxism and Liberalism during the 20th century. 
"Waterfalls" is a song by American hip-hop group TLC. It was written by Marqueze Etheridge and Organized Noize along with a verse written by group member Lisa "Left Eye" Lopes for TLC's second album, CrazySexyCool (1994), with production by Organized Noize. The song was released as the third single from the album on May 29, 1995, in the United States, followed by a United Kingdom release on August 5, 1995. 
The song's lyrics refer to 1990s issues such as the HIV/AIDS epidemic and violence associated with the illegal drug trade. Watkins said that it was important for the group to "get the message across without seeming like preaching." 
The TLC song shares elements with Paul McCartney's song of the same name, which opens with the line "Don't go jumping waterfalls, please keep to the lake." McCartney himself noted the resemblance, stating "In fact, somebody had a hit, a few years ago, using the first line...then they go off into another song. It's like, 'Excuse me?'" 
The song was nominated for two Grammys at the 1996 Grammy Awards: Record of the Year and Best Pop Performance by a Duo or Group with Vocal. Billboard named it #11 on their list of 100 Greatest Girl Group Songs of All Time. It was also ranked 13th in VH1's 100 Greatest Songs of the Past 25 Years and 8th on VH1's 100 Greatest Songs of the 1990s. In 2010, Billboard awarded the song the top position of summer songs in 1995. 
The music video visualizes the two verses of the song, particularly during extended instrumental breaks after each verse: 
The video also intercuts scenes of liquefied versions of TLC performing to the song while standing on top of an ocean and performing in front of a real waterfall. 
Remaining members T-Boz and Chilli performed the song along with Alicia Keys and fellow girl groups En Vogue and SWV at the 2008 BET Awards. Thomas and Watkins appeared on Good Morning America on October 15, 2013 to perform the song during promotion for the greatest hits 20 and the VH1 biopic CrazySexyCool: The TLC Story. 
On November 24, 2013, TLC performed at the 2013 American Music Awards with special guest Lil Mama, who performed Left Eye's rap in tribute to her. 
* Sales figures based on certification alone.^ Shipments figures based on certification alone. Sales+streaming figures based on certification alone. 
Stooshe released an official lyric video for the track on October 3, before unveiling the official music video on T4 on October 7. The video, directed by Matt Stawski, features cameo appearances from fellow TLC members T-Boz and Chilli. Hornbuckle commented "The video is perhaps the most colourful promo from a girl group for years, and we love the choreography the girls pull out on the chorus. Stooshe make being cool, classy and fun all at once look effortless." 
In 2010, Racebending.com wrote a letter to Nickelodeon's CEO at the time, Jeff Dunn, regarding the audition restrictions for Power Rangers Samurai, the eighteenth season of the Power Rangers franchise. The producers of the show had restricted auditions for the Red Ranger to only white actors, but the casting was re-opened in June 2010 to actors of all ethnicities. 
The film Exodus: Gods and Kings received significant backlash on social media before its release, due to white actors Christian Bale, Joel Edgerton and others being cast to play the roles of Egyptians, while black actors were only given the roles of slaves and thieves. Director Ridley Scott argued that they cast actors of other ethnicities as well (Iranians, Spaniards, Arabs, etc.) because Egyptians have varied ethnicities, and that the audience shouldn't focus on only the white actors. 
In 2010, Racebending.com and the Media Action Network for Asian Americans, alongside urging boycotts of The Last Airbender, also urged boycotts of Prince of Persia: The Sands of Time as well, due to practices of racebending. Prince of Persia was criticized for casting white actors for the leads instead of actors of Iranian or Middle Eastern descent. 
Usage evolved, and by 2015, media studies academic Kristen J. Warner wrote that the term has "many definitions and contexts", from the film industry practice of color-blind casting to fan fiction. She describes how writers can "change the race and cultural specificity of central characters or pull a secondary character of color from the margins, transforming her into the central protagonist." 
Paste's Abbey White said in 2016 that the term can apply to actors of color being cast in traditionally white roles. White said, "In the last several years, racebending has become a practice used more and more to help networks diversify their ensembles and capture a bigger audience. Not only has it resulted in more racial visibility on the small screen, but in a far more unexpected way, racebending can generate deeper and more significant depictions of characters." 
 The Sustainable Water Programme of Action was established in 2003 to address concerns about fresh water in New Zealand. 
Ghachok is a village and Village Development Committee  in Kaski District in the Gandaki Zone of northern-central Nepal. At the time of the 1991 Nepal census it had a population of 2,322 persons living in 449 individual households. 
This article about a location in the Kaski District of Nepal is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Moody Brothers are an Americana country music trio who gained prominence in 1985 when they were  nominated for a Grammy Award for their instrumental performance of the classic fiddle tune "Cotton Eyed Joe".  This trio of brothers, Carlton Moody, Dave Moody, and Trent Moody were nominated for a second Grammy in 1990 and won three International Country Music Awards in Europe. 
During the 1980s, The Moody Brothers made numerous appearances on the Grand Ole Opry in Nashville, TN and The Nashville Network's Nashville Now, On Stage and other music programs. They also performed at the White House for Presidents Ronald Reagan and George H. W. Bush. 
In 1988, the Moodys recorded a historic album in Prague, Czechoslovakia with Jiri Brabec and Country Beat.  The album Friends was the first such cooperative production between an American company, Lamon Records and what was then a communist state-owned record label Supraphon.  The project earned critical acclaim and won the Moodys, along with the producers, engineers and studios involved in the project the Ampex Golden Reel Award. 
The Walt Disney Company offered the Moodys a featured concert performance role at Disneyland Paris in France when the park and entertainment complex opened in 1992. The trio continued to gain international success with their music throughout the '90s. 
Edrissa Sonko (born 23 March 1980 in Essau[citation needed]) is a Gambian football Forward, currently playing for Ras AlKhaima Club in the United Arab Emirates. 
His previous clubs are Steve Biko F.C., Real de Banjul, Anderlecht, Roda JC, Walsall, Tranmere Rovers and Skoda Xanthi. 
He netted his first Tranmere goal in the win at home to Accrington Stanley in the Football League Trophy in September 2008. His first league goal followed just over a week later away at Huddersfield Town, he scored a stunning long range volley in the 2-1 Tranmere win. 
Scottish side Falkirk F.C were reportedly interested in signing him but on 19 September 2009, Sonko signed a one-year deal with Hereford United. He was released at the end of the season and moved to Cypriot side APEP. In September 2010 he joined Ras AlKhaima Club in the United Arab Emirates. He scored his first goal for Ras AlKhaima Club against Ajman. 
 Carol Montag is an American folk singer-songwriter, who was born in Ames, Iowa, United States.  Referred to by Tom Paxton as "the best to come out of Iowa since Bonnie Koloc", she has opened on several occasions for Arlo Guthrie.  She is also one third of the Cedar Rapids, Iowa-based Christmas-themed trio Tribute, with Nina Swanson and Kathy Donnelly which performs yearly during the season. 
This article about a singer-songwriter from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In addition to acting, Witt has been described as a musical prodigy, as an accomplished pianist, singer, and songwriter. Beginning in 2013, Witt has starred in eight annual Hallmark Christmas movies. On her most recent, 2020's Christmas Tree Lane, she served as executive producer, storywriter, and contributed two original songs that her character sings on-screen. 
Witt's discovery by Lynch led to his casting of the "flame-haired" child in the movie Dune (1984), as Paul Atreides's sister Alia; she turned 8 during filming. She worked with Lynch again when she appeared in an episode of Twin Peaks, playing the younger sister of Lara Flynn Boyle's character Donna. 
Witt made her stage debut in 2001, at Los Angeles' historic Tiffany Theater, in Robbie Fox's musical The Gift, in which she played a high-priced, albeit disease-carrying, stripper. 
While in residence in the UK in 2004, she starred as Evelyn in a stage production of Neil LaBute's The Shape of Things at the New Ambassadors Theatre. In September 2006, Witt returned to the London stage at the Royal Court Theatre, in the critically well-received Piano/Forte, wherein she was "well-cast" in portraying the stammering, emotionally damaged pianist Abigail, sister to "unloved attention-seeker" Louise (Kelly Reilly). 
Witt performed alongside Amber Tamblyn in Neil LaBute's play, Reasons to Be Pretty, at the Geffen Playhouse, which ran until August 31, 2014. 
In addition to acting, Witt is a professional singer-songwriter and pianist, and is reported to have been a musical prodigy. During her work with David Lynch, she supported herself by playing piano at the Beverly Wilshire Hotel. 
Responses to her 2006 stage portrayal of Abigail in Piano/Forte, which included scenes of piano-playing, noted her skill as an "outstanding pianist". 
In 2016, Witt joined the cast of ABC's Nashville in a recurring capacity playing established country singer Autumn Chase. Witt performed several songs throughout season 4. 
In August 2018, Witt released a five-song EP album titled 15,000 Days (a reference to the length of time she had been alive when she recorded the album) working with producer Jacquire King. She is currently finishing recording her new album, which she co-produced with Jordan Lehning and Bill Reynolds. Titled The Conduit, it is scheduled to be released in September (24th, most regions) of 2021. 
In 2020, Witt released two new Christmas songs, as heard in her new Hallmark Christmas movie, Christmas Tree Lane. "Why Christmas" and "Christmas Will Never End" are performed on-screen by her character, music store owner and songwriter Meg.[citation needed] 
On June 14, 2004, Witt modeled what is believed to be the most expensive hat ever made, for Christie's auction house in London. The Chapeau d'Amour, designed by Louis Mariette, is valued at $2.7 million (US) and is encrusted in diamonds. 
On October 5, 2021 Witt released a book called Small Changes: A Rules-Free Guide to Add More Plant-Based Foods, Peace & Power to Your Life. 
His 2021 graphic novel Fictional Father was a shortlisted finalist for the Governor General's Award for English-language fiction at the 2021 Governor General's Awards. 
He died in Victoria, British Columbia in 1990 at the age of 76. He had been suffering from chronic lymphocytic leukemia, nephrotic syndrome and renal failure. 
The 1966 Cornell Big Red football team was an American football team that represented Cornell University during the 1966 NCAA University Division football season. Cornell finished fourth in the Ivy League.  
This biographical article related to an Indian cricket person born in 1996 is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ideally, each of the frequency bursts should produce a group of distinct, black and white vertical bars on the monitor screen.  Due to frequency response roll-off in the signal transmission path, the higher frequency vertical bars tend to blur into a uniform grey.  From this, it is possible to get a quick visual estimate of the overall frequency response of the system, since the frequency of each of the bursts is known. 
Anapisa monotica is a moth of the family Erebidae. It was described by William Jacob Holland in 1893. It is found in Cameroon, the Republic of the Congo, the Democratic Republic of the Congo, Gabon and Nigeria. 
Ilex acutidenticulata is a species of plant in the family Aquifoliaceae. It is endemic to Venezuela. 
Duffield also contributed a note on "The Lost Art of Hardening Copper" to Heinrich Schliemann's Ilios; the City and Country of the Trojans (Leipzig, 1880). 
Shimmering Light is a 1978 Australian television film about an American surfer who travels to Australia in search of the perfect wave. It was one of six TV movies made in Australia by Transatlantic Enterprises. It was directed by Don Chaffey. 
Kevin Pearse is a 29-year-old drop-out who lives off his family trust and spends most of his time surfing. He is seeing two women, young Emily and older Moira. His father Scan arrives. 
On September 23, 1985, Academy Home Entertainment released the film as Mutual Respect on VHS. On March 15, 1988, Video Treasures also released the film on VHS. 
The Sydney Morning Herald wrote "The end product is really half-hearted. The idea was good, the acting similar. But, in the end, the Bridges family and their fellow actors were betrayed by a really ordinary script." Another reviewer in the same paper called it "a first rate telemovie." 
This article related to an Australian made-for-TV movie is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bevans played four years of college soccer at Gonzaga University between 2012 and 2015, scoring 11 goals and tallying 8 assists in 72 appearances. 
In 2014 while at college, Bevans appeared for USL PDL side Lane United FC. He also played in the PDL in 2016 after college, making 7 appearances for Kitsap Soccer Club. 
In the 1970s Brack produced a long series of highly stylised works featuring objects such as pencils in complex patterns. These were intended as allegories of contemporary life. 
Brack's works cover a wide range topics and themes. He often did a series of works on a particular theme over a number of years. His portraits, including self-portraits, and portraits of family, friends and commissions, and his paintings of nudes were produced throughout his career. 
Brack's painting The Bar sold for $3.2 million in April 2006, while in May 2007 his painting The Old Time sold for $3.36 million at auction in Sydney, a record for a painting by an Australian artist. 
Miramar is a suburb of Wellington, New Zealand, south-east of the city centre. It is on the Miramar Peninsula, directly east of the isthmus of Rongotai, the site of Wellington International Airport. 
On 18 November 1904 Miramar Borough was formed. In April 1921, Miramar was incorporated into the City of Wellington. The records of the Miramar Borough Council were transferred to the City of Wellington at the time of amalgamation and can still be accessed today through Wellington City Council. 
Miramar had a population of 9,831 at the 2018 New Zealand census, an increase of 345 people (3.6%) since the 2013 census, and an increase of 621 people (6.7%) since the 2006 census. There were 3,585 households. There were 4,851 males and 4,989 females, giving a sex ratio of 0.97 males per female, with 1,881 people (19.1%) aged under 15 years, 1,770 (18.0%) aged 15 to 29, 4,794 (48.8%) aged 30 to 64, and 1,389 (14.1%) aged 65 or older. 
Although some people objected to giving their religion, 44.6% had no religion, 37.4% were Christian, 5.7% were Hindu, 1.4% were Muslim, 2.8% were Buddhist and 2.3% had other religions. 
Of those at least 15 years old, 2,475 (31.1%) people had a bachelor or higher degree, and 1,206 (15.2%) people had no formal qualifications. The employment status of those at least 15 was that 4,302 (54.1%) people were employed full-time, 1,071 (13.5%) were part-time, and 282 (3.5%) were unemployed. 
Jackson and his colleagues Sir Richard Taylor (VFX) and Jamie Selkirk (Editor) have built a series of multimillion-dollar studios, sound stages, and pre- and post-production facilities in Miramar that include Stone Street Studios, Park Road Post, Weta Digital, and Weta Workshop. Jackson filmed the studio scenes of The Lord of the Rings trilogy and King Kong in Miramar. Miramar has been hailed by Mexican film director Guillermo del Toro as "Hollywood the way God intended it". 
Miramar Central School is a co-educational state primary school for Year 1 to 6 students, with a roll of 214 as of March 2021. 
Miramar North School is also a co-educational state primary school for Year 1 to 8 students, with a roll of 270. 
Holy Cross School is a co-educational state-integrated Catholic primary school for Year 1 to 8 students, with a roll of 198. 
Miramar Christian School is a co-educational state primary school for Year 1 to 8 students, with a roll of 30. 
The Great Pumpkin (Italian: Il grande cocomero) is a 1993 Italian drama film directed by Francesca Archibugi. It was screened in the Un Certain Regard section at the 1993 Cannes Film Festival, and selected as the Italian entry for the Best Foreign Language Film at the 66th Academy Awards, but was not accepted as a nominee. The film focuses on Valentina, a young girl, sent to a psychiatric clinic. 
A literal translation of the title would substitute "watermelon" for "pumpkin"; however, the phrase has pop culture cachet from being an intentional mistranslation of "The Great Pumpkin" from the comic strip, Peanuts. 
Valentina, nicknamed Pippi, is the daughter of two rich spouses. After having had an attack of epilepsy she is admitted to the department of child neuropsychiatry. The doctor who takes care of her is Arturo, who is immediately convinced that the child has these attacks due to psychological and not psychiatric problems and her family is involved. 
This article related to an Italian film of the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Polevoye is located within the Kulunda Plain, 29 km northeast of Galbshtadt (the district's administrative centre) by road. 
He has had numerous solo and group exhibitions in cities such as Paris, London, Avignon, Barcelona, Brussels, Brest, Amsterdam, Heidelberg, Montreal, and Adelaide, Australia.[citation needed] 
A hunter-gatherer is a human living a lifestyle in which most or all food is obtained by foraging (gathering edible wild plants) and hunting (pursuing and killing of wild animals), like what most natural omnivores do. Hunter-gatherer societies stand in contrast to the more sedentary agricultural societies, which rely mainly on cultivating crops and raising domesticated animals for food production, although the boundaries between the two ways of living are not completely distinct. 
Only a few contemporary societies are classified as hunter-gatherers, and many supplement their foraging activity with horticulture or pastoralism. Contrary to common misconception, hunter-gatherers are mostly well-fed rather than starving, and tend to have a more diverse and arguably more healthy diet. 
According to the endurance running hypothesis, long-distance running as in persistence hunting, a method still practiced by some hunter-gatherer groups in modern times, was likely the driving evolutionary force leading to the evolution of certain human characteristics. This hypothesis does not necessarily contradict the scavenging hypothesis: both subsistence strategies could have been in use sequentially, alternating or even simultaneously. 
As the number and size of agricultural societies increased, they expanded into lands traditionally used by hunter-gatherers. This process of agriculture-driven expansion led to the development of the first forms of government in agricultural centers, such as the Fertile Crescent, Ancient India, Ancient China, Olmec, Sub-Saharan Africa and Norte Chico. 
As a result of the now near-universal human reliance upon agriculture, the few contemporary hunter-gatherer cultures usually live in areas unsuitable for agricultural use. 
Archaeologists can use evidence such as stone tool use to track hunter-gatherer activities, including mobility. 
Ethnobotany is the field of study whereby food plants of various peoples and tribes world wide are documented. 
Most hunter-gatherers are nomadic or semi-nomadic and live in temporary settlements. Mobile communities typically construct shelters using impermanent building materials, or they may use natural rock shelters, where they are available. 
The conventional assumption has been that women did most of the gathering, while men concentrated on big game hunting.[citation needed] An illustrative account is Megan Biesele's study of the southern African Ju/'hoan, 'Women Like Meat'. A recent study suggests that the sexual division of labor was the fundamental organizational innovation that gave Homo sapiens the edge over the Neanderthals, allowing our ancestors to migrate from Africa and spread across the globe. 
9000-year-old remains of a female hunter along with a toolkit of projectile points and animal processing implements were discovered at the Andean site of Wilamaya Patjxa, Puno District in Peru. 
At the 1966 "Man the Hunter" conference, anthropologists Richard Borshay Lee and Irven DeVore suggested that egalitarianism was one of several central characteristics of nomadic hunting and gathering societies because mobility requires minimization of material possessions throughout a population. Therefore, no surplus of resources can be accumulated by any single member. Other characteristics Lee and DeVore proposed were flux in territorial boundaries as well as in demographic composition. 
Researchers Gurven and Kaplan have estimated that around 57% of hunter-gatherers reach the age of 15. Of those that reach 15 years of age, 64% continue to live to or past the age of 45. This places the life expectancy between 21 and 37 years. They further estimate that 70% of deaths are due to diseases of some kind, 20% of deaths come from violence or accidents and 10% are due to degenerative diseases. 
Mutual exchange and sharing of resources (i.e., meat gained from hunting) are important in the economic systems of hunter-gatherer societies. Therefore, these societies can be described as based on a "gift economy." 
One way to divide hunter-gatherer groups is by their return systems. James Woodburn uses the categories "immediate return" hunter-gatherers for egalitarianism and "delayed return" for nonegalitarian. Immediate return foragers consume their food within a day or two after they procure it. Delayed return foragers store the surplus food (Kelly, 31). 
Hunting-gathering was the common human mode of subsistence throughout the Paleolithic, but the observation of current-day hunters and gatherers does not necessarily reflect Paleolithic societies; the hunter-gatherer cultures examined today have had much contact with modern civilization and do not represent "pristine" conditions found in uncontacted peoples. 
Nowadays, some scholars speak about the existence within cultural evolution of the so-called mixed-economies or dual economies which imply a combination of food procurement (gathering and hunting) and food production or when foragers have trade relations with farmers. 
California Indians view the idea of wilderness in a negative light. They believe that wilderness is the result of humans losing their knowledge of the natural world and how to care for it. When the earth turns back to wilderness after the connection with humans is lost then the plants and animals will retreat and hide from the humans. 
Fieldoo is a business-oriented social networking service used for professional networking in association football. It was founded in Slovenia in March 2012 and launched on 25 February 2013. As of April 2018, Fieldoo has more than 350,000 members, in over 200 countries and territories. 
The site is available in 7 languages, including English, French, German, Italian, Portuguese, Brazilian Portuguese and Spanish. 
The purpose of the site is to allow registered football players to create their on-line curriculum vitae (CV), connect with other football players, agents, scouts and clubs and apply on market posts posted by agents, scouts and clubs. Registered agents, scouts and clubs can connect with registered football players, other agents, scouts and clubs and publish various market posts. 
Fieldoo, football career network, went public with a beta player platform in August 2012. The platform is free, although players can pay for premium account. 
Fieldoo officially launched with an agent platform in February 2013. The platform has a free trial period of 90-days for agents, scouts and clubs. 
Agents, scouts and clubs can post various market posts in the market section. Football players, agents, scouts and clubs can apply on market posts according to the type of the post. Market posts are divided in: 
In September 2013 Fieldoo launched a challenge to provide their users a chance to sign a contract with a club from the Spanish league. In collaboration with a Spanish football agent Jose Maria Minguella that represented Messi, Maradona, Romario, Rivaldo and Guardiola, Fieldoo reviewed more than 5.000 applicants for the Minguella Challenge. The two finalists went on a trial to Segunda division club Girona FC and the winner Jordi Pascual signed a professional contract with the club. 
The website was featured by many worldwide media outlets, such as France football, Yahoo Eurosport, The Huffington Post. The Next Web  described it as AngelList for soccer professionals, while Goal.com called it a game-changing network for the soccer industry. 
The Common Security and Defence Policy (CSDP) is the European Union's (EU) course of action in the fields of defence and crisis management, and a main component of the EU's Common Foreign and Security Policy (CFSP). 
Decisions relating to the CSDP are proposed by the HR/VP, adopted by the FAC, generally requiring unanimity, and then implemented by the HR/VP. 
In 1970 the European Political Cooperation (EPC) brought about the European Communities' (EC) initial foreign policy coordination. Opposition to the addition of security and defence matters to the EPC led to the reactivation of the WEU in 1984 by its member states, which were also EC member states. 
The EU launched its first maritime CSDP operation on 12 December 2008 (Operation Atalanta).  The concept of the European Union Naval Force (EU NAVFOR) was created on the back of this operation, which is still successfully combatting piracy off the coast of Somalia almost a decade later.  A second such intervention was launched in 2015 to tackle migration problems in the southern Mediterranean (EUNAVFOR Med), working under the name Operation SOPHIA. 
Decisions relating to the CSDP are proposed by the HR/VP, adopted by the FAC, generally requiring unanimity, and then implemented by the HR/VP. 
The EU command and control (C2) structure, as directed by political bodies which are composed of member states's representatives and generally require unanimous decisions, as of April 2019: 
The CSDP is implemented using civilian and military contributions from member states' armed forces, which also are obliged to collective self-defence based on Treaty on European Union (TEU). 
Five EU states host nuclear weapons: France has its own nuclear programmes, while Belgium, Germany, Italy and the Netherlands host US nuclear weapons as part of NATO's nuclear sharing policy. Combined, the EU possesses 300 warheads, and hosts between 90 and 130 US warheads. Italy hosts 70-90 B61 nuclear bombs, while Germany, Belgium, and the Netherlands 10-20 each one. The EU has the third largest arsenal of nuclear weapons, after the United States and Russia. 
The combined component strength of the naval forces of member states is some 514 commissioned warships. Of those in service, 4 are fleet carriers. The EU also has 4 amphibious assault ships and 20 amphibious support ships in service. Of the EU's 49 submarines, 10 are nuclear-powered submarines while 39 are conventional attack submarines. 
Operation Atalanta (formally European Union Naval Force Somalia) is the first ever (and still ongoing) naval operation of the European Union. It is part of a larger global action by the EU in the Horn of Africa to deal with the Somali crisis. As of January 2011 twenty-three EU nations participate in the operation. 
Combined, the member states of the European Union maintain large numbers of various land-based military vehicles and weaponry. 
The EUs air-lift capabilities are evolving with the future introduction of the Airbus A400M (another example of EU defence cooperation). The A400M is a tactical airlifter with strategic capabilities. Around 140 are initially expected to be operated by 5 member states (Luxembourg, France, Germany, Spain and Belgium). 
The Helsinki Headline Goal Catalogue is a listing of rapid reaction forces composed of 60,000 troops managed by the European Union, but under control of the countries who deliver troops for it. 
This section presents an incomplete list of forces and bodies established intergovernmentally amongst a subset of member states. These organisations will deploy forces based on the collective agreement of their member states. They are typically technically listed as being able to be deployed under the auspices of NATO, the United Nations, the European Union (EU) through Article 42.3 of TEU, the Organization for Security and Co-operation in Europe, or any other international entity. 
However, with the exception of the Eurocorps, very few have actually been deployed for any real military operation, and none under the CSDP at any point in its history. 
The Berlin Plus agreement is the short title of a comprehensive package of agreements made between NATO and the EU on 16 December 2002. These agreements were based on conclusions of NATO's 1999 Washington summit, sometimes referred to as the CJTF mechanism, and allowed the EU to draw on some of NATO's military assets in its own peacekeeping operations. 
SPAWN, the Salmon Protection and Watershed Network, is a project of the Turtle Island Restoration Network (TIRN), a United States 501(c)(3) nonprofit environmental organization. 
SPAWN's stated mission is to "protect endangered salmon in the Lagunitas Creek Watershed and the environment on which we all depend."  SPAWN uses a multi-faceted approach to accomplish their mission including grassroots action, habitat restoration, policy development, research and monitoring, citizen training, environmental education, strategic litigation, and collaboration with other organizations and agencies. 
The Lagunitas Creek Watershed in Marin County, California, has been identified as the most important spawning and rearing habitat for wild coho salmon left in California. Coho in the Central California Evolutionarily Significant Unit (CCCESU) are a Federal and State listed Endangered Species considered to be "in imminent danger of extinction." 
SPAWN performs its work with the assistance of volunteer and pro bono contributions. Many dedicated individuals in the San Geronimo Valley, Marin County, and the greater San Francisco Bay Area have made a lasting impact on the accomplishments and history of SPAWN. 
SPAWN has grown from an all-volunteer organization to one with a full-time staff who coordinate the work of hundreds of volunteers and interns. In 1999 SPAWN was incorporated as a program under the umbrella of the non-profit 501(c)(3) environmental organization Turtle Island Restoration Network (TIRN). 
SPAWN drives seven active programs and campaigns that focus on protecting endangered salmon and the Lagunitas Creek Watershed. These include habitat restoration, fish rescue, citizen training, creek monitoring, creek walks, land acquisition and water conservation. 
Each year SPAWN volunteers contribute many hundreds of hours towards restoring streamside habitat in the Lagunitas Creek Watershed. Volunteers work to plant native trees and understory plants, and remove invasive species. In 2005 SPAWN launched a community-based native plant nursery program that serves to grow thousands of native plants to support local restoration programs and provide plants to landowners living along stream corridors in the San Geronimo Valley. 
SPAWN organizes and facilitates a number of citizen training programs that includes a Creek Naturalist Training, native plant collection and propagation, salmon seminar series, spawning salmon surveying and water quality monitoring. 
SPAWN oversees a number of creek monitoring programs including water quality monitoring, out-migrant salmon smolt monitoring, and spawning salmon monitoring. Each year SPAWN also responds to many calls from concerned citizens about problems or emergencies on their property or at large. Staff and volunteers respond to these calls and help refer problems to the appropriate agencies if necessary or find ways to prevent or repair the problem. 
Central High School is a high school in the Phoenix Union High School District, Phoenix, Arizona, United States. The campus is located at 4525 North Central Avenue, just north of downtown. It was established in 1957. 
The school was built in 1957. It was designed by noted Phoenix architect John Sing Tang. The construction of the school was completed by Weeks Construction Co. and D. O. Norton & Son Construction Co. both of Phoenix. 
The school predominantly serves students from partner elementary districts Alhambra, Creighton, Madison, Osborn, and Phoenix Elementary. However, students from across the district come to Central for its Phoenix Union Magnet Program in International Studies. Students zoned to Arthur M. Hamilton School of the Murphy School District, meaning those in the district east of Interstate 17 and north of the Maricopa Freeway, are zoned to Central. 
The Arizona Department of Education has designated Central a "performing" school. Central has had 96 students recognized as National Merit Scholars in the past 15 years. The International Studies program includes foreign exchange programs. 
This biographical article related to association football in Belgium, about a goalkeeper, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Les Arts Florissants has also had a number of successes in the concert repertoire. The organization has performed and recorded a number of oratorios, cantatas, madrigals, masses, motets, and other musical forms typical of early music. Occasionally, the ensemble has made forays into contemporary repertoire, notably performing the world premiere of Betsy Jolas's Motets III - Hunc igitur terrorem at a gala on the occasion of the ensemble's 20th anniversary in 1999. 
The International Congress on Medieval Studies is an annual academic conference held for scholars specializing in, or with an interest in, medieval studies. It is sponsored by Western Michigan University in Kalamazoo, Michigan, and is held during the first half of May. The Congress is the largest annual gathering in the field, regularly attracting over three thousand registered participants from all over the world. The 50th annual conference took place in 2015. 
In 1973, the Institute for Cistercian Studies was established at Western Michigan, and began to hold its annual Cistercian Studies Conference as a sub-set of the International Congress on Medieval Studies. 
The Medieval Academy of America has held its annual meetings at the Congress in 1974 and 1982. The Academy began sponsoring a plenary session in 1992 and maintains a committee for this purpose. 
The Congress is typically held during the first or second week of May, and runs from Thursday morning through Sunday afternoon. Most events are held on the West Campus of Western Michigan University. 
An excerpt[permanent dead link] from the schedule of the 42nd International Congress on Medieval studies, held in May 2007, illustrates the structure and events of the Congress as described below. 
Many sessions have a sponsoring group, although individuals or the Congress may organize sessions. Many of the sessions are sponsored by academic associations, universities, or publishers, while others are arranged by ad hoc groups which are interested in a particular topic. 
Approximately six hundred sessions are held across twelve different time slots during the four days. Each session is scheduled to last ninety minutes. 
Two plenary lectures are given during the conference, at the beginning of the day on Friday and Saturday. 
The exhibits hall is open during the length of the Congress, and is composed primarily of book publishers selling their latest titles in the field of medieval studies. A minority of the hall also features handcrafts, music, and foodstuffs for sale. In 2007, approximately seventy exhibitors participated. 
The Congress serves as a rare chance for international societies of medieval specialists to gather in person, and dozens of business meetings are conducted during breaks between sessions. Many groups use the opportunity to plan for their presentations later in the summer at the International Medieval Congress held at Leeds University. 
The Congress typically features a film festival, screening movies which have a medieval setting or theme. There are also performances of medieval music and theater. 
Some participating organizations sponsor social gatherings in the form of wine hours or open bar receptions. 
There are also demonstrations, to foster an understanding of material culture, that vary from year to year. Past demonstrations have included a trebuchet, a longboat, and most recently, a demonstration of blacksmithing. 
 The annual meeting of medievalists corresponds with the nesting of swans at Goldsworth pond, located at the very heart of the conference. Most years Congress ends before the eggs have hatched, but the 50th Congress was late enough that medievalists got to enjoy watching the cygnets get their sea legs. 
The Congress is very broad in scope, being open to all topics related to the medieval period and to participants from any background. This has served to set it apart from other meetings in the field. Topics may range from discussions of mysticism, numismatics, and medieval Latin, to modern medieval-themed video games, the works of J. R. R. Tolkien, and the teaching of medieval studies in the classroom. 
Such being the case, participants come from a broad variety of educational backgrounds. Most are professors and graduate students, but a significant minority is composed of architects, monks, undergraduate students, fiction authors, and other independent scholars and enthusiasts. Presenters are not necessarily experts in medieval history; scholars of literature, theater, religion, and art frequently give presentations. 
Hungary competed at the 2016 Summer Paralympics in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil, from 7 to 18 September 2016. 
With one pathway for qualification being one highest ranked NPCs on the UCI Para-Cycling male and female Nations Ranking Lists on 31 December 2014, Hungary qualified for the 2016 Summer Paralympics in Rio, assuming they continued to meet all other eligibility requirements. 
Grant Douglas Perdue (born September 13, 1993 in Houston, Texas to parents Brent and Darlene Perdue) is a male gymnast competing for the University of Nebraska - Lincoln. He is a spirited gymnast who currently competes floor, vault, and high bar as he ends his second competitive season with the Nebraska Cornhuskers in the spring of 2013. Perdue signed with the University of Nebraska and then graduated from Elkins High School in 2011. He is the Huskers' first freshman All-American since 1999. 
Grant was coached by 2004 and 2008 U.S. Olympic coach Kevin Mazeika and Nori Iwai as he trained at the Houston Gymnastics Academy. In 2007 he won a national title on floor at JO Nationals. In 2011 at the Junior Olympic National Championships Perdue finished third in the individual event finals on floor. 
At the NCAA Individual Finals Perdue finished fourth with a career-best of a 15.40 on floor. He also had many great performances on still rings and vault. in 2012 he was consistent in putting up scores of 15.00 or better seven times. Furthermore, at the Big Ten Championships Purdue received a score of 14.50 on floor, 13.60 on still rings, and a 14.65 on vault. 
Perdue's head coach, Chuck Chmelka, has high hopes for Perdue in the 2013 season as a leader during practice and at the meets. 
Floor Exercise - 15.40 (at NCAA Championships, April 21, 2012) Vault - 14.85 (vs. Arizona State, March 4, 2012) Still Rings - 13.90 (vs. Illinois/Minnesota, March 11, 2012)  
The municipality is located in the south-western part of Upper Franconia, in Franconian Switzerland. The region is known for growing and processing fruit. Of the approx. 2500 ha total area, 1100 ha are forest. The town of Pretzfeld lies in the west of the municipality, near the confluence of the Trubach and the Wiesent. 
The largest closed sweet cherry growing area in Germany and one of the largest in western Europe extends around the Pretzfeld market. Due to the warm climate and nutrient-rich soils, there are over 200,000 sweet cherry trees on 1700 ha. 
From the semiconductor laboratory initiated by Walter Schottky in 1946, a plant for power semiconductors emerged , which last operated as the Infineon subsidiary eupec (European Power-Semiconductor and Electronic Company) before it was closed in 2002. 
Claims for the existence of paranormal and psychic abilities such as clairvoyance have not been supported by scientific evidence. Parapsychology explores this possibility, but the existence of the paranormal is not accepted by the scientific community. The scientific community widely considers parapsychology, including the study of clairvoyance, a pseudoscience. 
Pertaining to the ability of clear-sightedness, clairvoyance refers to the paranormal ability to see persons and events that are distant in time or space.  It can be divided into roughly three classes: precognition, the ability to perceive or predict future events, retrocognition, the ability to see past events, and remote viewing, the perception of contemporary events happening outside of the range of normal perception. 
Throughout history, there have been numerous places and times in which people have claimed themselves or others to be clairvoyant. 
In several religions, stories of certain individuals being able to see things far removed from their immediate sensory perception are commonplace, especially within pagan religions where oracles were used. Prophecy often involved some degree of clairvoyance, especially when future events were predicted. In most of these cases, however, the ability to see things was attributed to a higher power and not thought of as an ability that lay within the person himself.[citation needed] 
A number of Christian saints were said to be able to see or know things that were far removed from their immediate sensory perception as a kind of gift from God, including Columba of Iona, Padre Pio and Anne Catherine Emmerich. Jesus Christ in the Gospels is also recorded as being able to know things that were far removed from his immediate human perception. 
Rudolf Steiner, famous as a clairvoyant himself, claimed that for a clairvoyant, it is easy to confuse his own emotional and spiritual being with the objective spiritual world. 
Remote viewing, also known as remote sensing, remote perception, telesthesia and travelling clairvoyance is the alleged paranormal ability to perceive a remote or hidden target without support of the senses. 
In 1982 Robert Jahn, then Dean of the School of Engineering at Princeton University wrote a comprehensive review of psychic phenomena from an engineering perspective. His paper included numerous references to remote viewing studies at the time. Statistical flaws in his work have been proposed by others in the parapsychological community and within the general scientific community. 
Skeptics say that if clairvoyance were a reality it would have become abundantly clear. They also contend that those who believe in paranormal phenomena do so for merely psychological reasons. According to David G. Myers (Psychology, 8th ed.): 
There are three types of tools commonly used to tend a small fire, such as an indoor fireplace fire or yule log: the spade, the tongs and the poker itself. These tools make it possible to handle a fire without risk of burns or blisters. 
A slice bar has a flatter tip and can be used to stir up the fire or to clear the grates of ashes.  Other fire irons include the fire rake (not to be confused with the firefighter's tool), fire tongs and fire shovel. 
Edward II of England, popular yet largely-uncorroborated story of how a poker may have led to a monarch's death. 
Maruganj is a village and grampanchyat of Tufanganj subdivision, Cooch Behar district of West Bengal, India on NH31. This has one higher secondary school and several primary schools. There is also has a railway station named "Maradanga Railway Station". 
This article about a location in the Cooch Behar district of West Bengal is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Approved in a referendum on 27 November 1966, it replaced the previous constitutional text, which had been in force since 1952. 
Mr. Patman (also known as Crossover) is a 1980 Ca